



THE BARKING GHOST 
Goosebumps - 32 
R.L. Stine 


1 


For the zillionth time that night, I threw the covers off my legs and bolted up 
from the bed. 

I definitely heard something that time. 

And it wasn’t the wind, either. I’m always hearing things. But no matter 
what I hear, Mom says, “It’s just the wind, Cooper. Just the wind.” 

But the wind doesn’t sound like heavy footsteps crunching through the 
leaves. And that’s what I heard this time. Definitely. 

I stood next to my bedroom window. Then I leaned over and peered out. It 
sure was spooky out there. 

I squinted to see better in the dark. Don’t lean over too far, I thought. Don’t 
let whoever or whatever is out there see you. 

My eyes searched the backyard. I lifted my head—and spotted them. A few 
feet away. Huge, black, gnarly arms. Reaching out toward the window. 

Ready to grab me. 

No. It was only the branches of the old oak tree. 

Well, give me a break. I said it was dark out! 

My eyes swept over the yard again. The sound. There it was! 

I ducked. My legs trembled as I crouched beneath the window. I broke out 
into a cold sweat. 

Crunch. Crunch. 

Even louder than before. 

I swallowed hard and took another peek. Something moved in the shadows. 
Under the oak tree. I held my breath. 

Crunch. Crunch, crunch. 

A gust of wind blew the tree branches furiously. 

Crunch, crunch, crunch. 

The frightening sounds grew louder. Closer to the house. 

As I peered out, two eyes suddenly flashed in the dark. My throat went dry. 
I couldn’t cry out. 

The eyes flashed again. They were even closer to the house this time. Right 
outside my window. 



Staring at me. 

Moving toward me. 

The creature’s dark shape began to take form. It was a— 

—bunny rabbit?? 

I let out a long sigh. 

The first night in my new house—and I was already shaking in terror. 

I shuffled into the bathroom for a towel. As I mopped the sweat from my 
forehead, I stared at my reflection in the medicine chest mirror. 

Whenever I’m scared, my freckles really stand out. There they were. 
Millions of them. 

I ran my fingers through my hair. I wear it long. To help cover my big, 
droopy ears. 

I’ve had these huge ears my whole life. Mom keeps telling me not to worry. 
She says I’ll grow into them. But I’m twelve now, and nothing has changed. My 
ears are still huge. Huge and droopy. 

I wear a cap most of the time to help hide them. It’s my favorite cap from 
my favorite baseball team—the Red Sox. So I don’t mind wearing it. 

A bunny rabbit, I mumbled as I stared at myself in the mirror. Scared by a 
bunny rabbit. 

I’d made it through the entire day without being scared once. That’s pretty 
good for me. 

Back where I used to live—in Boston, Massachusetts—my best friends, 
Gary and Todd, always made fun of me. 

“Cooper,” they’d say, “you probably scare yourself on Halloween!” 

They were right. I get scared a lot. Some people just scare easier than 
others. I’m an easy scarer. 

Take last summer at camp. I got lost in the woods on my way to the 
bathroom cabin. What did I do? 

Nothing. I just stood there. 

When the kids from my bunk finally found me, I was shaking all over. 
Practically in tears. Turns out I was standing a few feet from the dining hall the 
whole time. 

So, okay. I admit it. When it comes to bravery, I’m not exactly Indiana 
Jones! 

When my parents announced we were moving from the city into a house in 
the woods, I was a little tense. 



Maybe even scared. 

Scared to leave the apartment I’d lived in my entire life. 

Scared of a house in the woods. 

And then I learned that our new house was deep in the woods, somewhere 
in Maine. Miles from the nearest town. 

The only two scary books I’d ever read took place in Maine. In the woods. 

But I had no choice. We were moving. Mom’s new job landed us in Maine, 
and there was nothing I could do about it. 

I left the bathroom and crept back to my bed. The floorboards creaked and 
cracked with each step. It was going to be hard getting used to that. 

It was also going to be hard getting used to all the other strange noises this 
old house made. The rattling pipes. The scraping shutters. And some weird noise 
that thumped really loudly every hour. 

At dinner, Mom said that the thumping noise was only the house “settling”. 

Whatever that means. 

At least she didn’t say, “It’s just the wind, Cooper.” 

I jumped into bed and pulled the covers up to my chin. Then I fluffed my 
pillows two or three times, trying hard to get comfortable. I felt a little safer in 
bed. 

I love my bed. Mom wanted to trash it when we moved. She said I needed a 
new one. But I said no way. It had taken me years to break this bed in. The 
mattress had just the right amount of lumps, and they were in all the right spots. 

In the dark, I glanced around my new room. It was so weird seeing all my 
things in this strange place. When the movers carried my stuff in here this 
morning, I had them put the furniture exactly the way it was in my old room. 

Across from my bed, my dad built a really cool bookcase for all my snow 
domes. It has a light in it and everything. 

I can’t wait to unpack my snow domes. I have seventy-seven of them from 
all over the world—even Australia and Hong Kong. I guess you could call me a 
snow dome collector. 

Anyway, I was finally beginning to relax, thinking about my snow domes— 
when I heard another noise. 

Not a bunch of little crunches like before—but one long, drawn-out crunch. 

I shot straight up in bed. This time I was sure. One hundred percent sure. 
Someone—or something—was creeping around out there. Right outside my 
window! 



I threw off the covers. Then I dropped to the floor on my hands and knees. 
Moving slowly, I crawled to the window. Then I carefully pulled myself up and 
peered outside. 

What was it? 

A snake? 

I flung open the window. I grabbed a softball from the floor and tossed it at 
the snake. Then I fell back down to my knees and listened. 

Silence. No crunching. No slithering. 

A direct hit. Great! 

I stood and leaned carefully out the window. I was feeling pretty proud of 
myself. After all, I had just saved my family from a deadly— 

—garden hose! 

I let out a disappointed sigh and shook my head. Get a grip, Cooper. 

If Gary and Todd were here, they would never let me hear the end of this. 
They’d be laughing their heads off. 

“Nice going, Coop!” Gary would say. “Saved your family from a poisonous 
garden hose!” 

“Yeah. Super Cooper strikes again!” Todd would say. Back in bed again, I 
fluffed up my pillows one more time. Then I closed my eyes as tightly as I 
could. 

That’s it, I said to myself. I am not getting up again. I don’t care what I hear 

next. 

I will not get up from this bed again. No matter what. 

And then I heard another noise. A different kind of noise. A sound that 
made my heart pound right through my chest. 

Breathing. 

Deep, heavy breathing. 

In my room. 

Under my bed! 



2 


I didn’t move. 

I couldn’t move. 

I stared at the ceiling. Listening. Listening to the raspy breathing under my 

bed. 

Okay, Cooper, I told myself. Calm down. It’s probably your imagination. 
Playing tricks on you again. 

The breathing grew louder. Raspier. 

I covered my ears and shut my eyes tight. 

It’s nothing. It’s nothing. It’s nothing. 

It’s an old house, I thought, still covering my ears. Old houses have to 
breathe—don’t they? 

Or, what was it that Mom said? Settling? Yeah, that’s what it must be. The 
house settling. 

Or maybe it’s the pipes. We had pipes in our apartment in Boston, and they 
made crazy noises all the time. I’ll bet that’s what it is—the pipes. 

I lowered my hands. 

Silence now. No settling. No pipes. No breathing. 

I must be losing my mind. 

If I told Gary and Todd about this one, they’d really laugh their heads off. 
And then the breathing started again. Raspy and wet. Hoarse breathing. 
Like a sick animal. 

I couldn’t just lie there. I had to see what it was. 

I swung my legs out of bed. I took a deep breath. Then I lowered myself to 
the floor. 

Carefully, I lifted the blanket from the bottom of the bed. Then carefully, 
carefully, I lowered my head and peeked under the bed. 

That’s when the hands darted out—and grabbed me. Two strong, cold 
hands. Slowly tightening their grip around my throat. 



3 


I screamed. 

So loudly, I surprised myself. 

My attacker must have been surprised, too. He quickly let go of my neck. I 
clutched my throat and sputtered for air. 

“Cooper, will you keep it down?” a voice whispered. “You’ll wake Mom 
and Dad!” 

Huh? 

Oh, man. 

It was Mickey. My totally obnoxious older brother. 

“Mickey! You jerk!” I cried. “You scared me to death!” 

Mickey slid out from under the bed and wiped some dust off his pajamas. 
“No big challenge,” he muttered. 

“Shut up,” I snapped, rubbing my sore neck. In the mirror I could see where 
Mickey’s hands had grabbed my throat. Dark red blotches circled my neck. 

“Look what you did!” I cried. “You know I bruise easily!” 

“Oh, don’t be such a baby! I got you, man!” Mickey cried, grinning. 

I stared furiously at my idiot brother. I wished I could wipe that grin off his 
face. And not get in trouble for it. 

“You’re a jerk!” was all I could think to say. 

“Grow up!” Mickey shot back. He headed for the door, then turned around. 
“Would Cooper like a little night-light next to his bed?” he asked in a tiny baby 
voice. 

That’s when I lost it. 

I leaped on to his back and pounded his head with my fists. 

“Hey!” he screamed, trying to shake me off. “What do you think you’re 
doing? Get off me!” 

Mickey’s legs buckled under him, and he fell to the floor. I clung to his 
back. I kept pounding him with my fists. 

Mickey is three years older than me, and he’s a lot bigger. But I had him in 
the right position, and landed a few good punches. 

Then he shifted to the right. 



And started pounding me back. Luckily, he got in only one really good 
wallop before Mom and Dad ran in to break it up. 

“Cooper! Mickey! What’s going on in here?” 

“He started it!” I called out, trying to duck Mickey’s fists. 

My father reached down and pulled Mickey off me. “I don’t care who 
started it!” he said angrily. “This is no way to act on the first night in your new 
house. Mickey, get back to your room!” 

“But, Dad, he—” 

“Never mind who started it. This behavior had better stop—now! Because 
if there is a next time, you’ll both start off the new school year grounded!” 

Grumbling, Mickey stomped out of the room. But not before sticking his 
tongue out at me. Mickey was the baby. Not me. 

“Really, Dad, Mickey started it,” I said when he was gone. 

“And you’re totally innocent, right?” my father asked, rolling his eyes. 

“Yes!” I insisted. 

Dad just shook his head. “Go to sleep, Cooper.” 

When my parents left the room, I paced back and forth, rubbing my neck. 

I was so steamed! 

It wasn’t the first time Mickey’s pulled something like this. For as long as I 
can remember, Mickey has played tricks on me, trying to terrify me. 

He usually succeeds, too. 

Once, when Mom and Dad went away for a weekend, he hid a tape recorder 
in my room. It played horrifying screams all night long. 

And another time, he didn’t come to get me after Little League practice. He 
left me standing there, all alone on the playground, while he hid out and watched 
me panic. 

But hiding under my bed tonight was the worst. He has to be one of the 
biggest jerks alive. 

I climbed back into bed and stared up at the ceiling. I had to think of a way 
to get Mickey back. 

What could I do? Hide outside his window and scream? 

Jump out from behind the shower curtain when he’s brushing his teeth? 

No. Too dumb. It would have to be something totally excellent. Something 
so creepy it would scare me. Even though I was the one doing it. 

I watched the spooky shadows move along my walls and ceiling. And 
listened to the frightening noises of my new house—noises I would have to hear 



for the rest of my life. 

The pipes rattling. The dogs barking. 

Wait a minute. 

Dogs? 

I sat up. We don’t have a dog. And there isn’t another house around here for 
miles. 

But I definitely heard a barking dog. 

I listened closely. The dog barked again. Then started to howl. 

I sighed and pulled off the covers again. I started to climb out of bed. Then 
it hit me. 

Mickey! 

This had to be another one of my brother’s stupid tricks. He was an 
excellent dog-barker. He practiced it all the time. 

Smiling, I settled back on my pillow. I wouldn’t get up. I wouldn’t go to the 
window. 

He wasn’t going to get me this time. No way. 

I lay there listening to Mickey make a fool of himself. Howling and barking 
like a big old dog. 

What a jerk. 

Then, suddenly, I sat up again. Whoa. I heard two dogs howling now. 

Even Mickey couldn’t pull that off. 

The howling turned to piercing cries. So close. Right under my window. 

As I said, I made it through a whole day without being scared. But, boy, 
was I making up for it tonight! 

For the zillionth and third time, I slowly crept to the window. I could hear 
them clearly. Two dogs. Wailing and howling. 

For the zillionth and third time, I gazed out the window. 

But for the first time, I couldn’t believe what I saw. 



4 


I didn’t see anything. 

Nothing at all. No dogs. Not one. 

I squinted into the yard. Empty. 

How could they have vanished so quickly? 

I stood at the window for a few more seconds, but no dogs appeared. 

I shivered. I’ll never sleep again, I thought. Not as long as I have to live 

here. 

I crept back to bed. I pulled the covers up to my chin. And counted the 
green and blue squigglies on the wallpaper by my head. 

I guess I finally fell asleep. When I opened my eyes, light streamed in 
through my window. 

Yawning, I glanced at the clock. Six-thirty. I’m usually an early bird. I like 
to start my day as soon as possible. 

I leaped out of bed and checked the yard. It didn’t seem half as scary in the 
morning light. 

I smiled when I noticed the jungle gym in the far corner. The last owners of 
the house built it. It had a slide and really high monkey bars. Yesterday, Dad 
hung a rope and tire from one of its beams, so now it had a swing, too. 

Behind the jungle gym, the woods stretched all around. Woods thick with 
all different kinds of trees and shrubs and weeds. The woods surrounded our 
house on three sides. It seemed to go on forever. 

I changed quickly, pulling a clean Red Sox T-shirt over my jeans. Grabbing 
my baseball cap, I flew through the house and ran outside. 

A great summer day! Sunny and warm. If I were back home in Boston, I 
would hop on my bike and ride over to Gary’s or Todd’s house. Then we would 
spend the day outdoors, playing softball at the playground. Or just messing 
around. 

But I’m not in Boston anymore. Better get used to that, I told myself. 

I hoped some cool kids lived in this neighborhood. When we drove up to 
our house yesterday, I didn’t see any other houses around. I guessed I’d have to 
spend the next few days alone—until school started next week. 

I wandered over to the jungle gym. I swung on the tire swing for a little 



while. Back and forth. Back and forth. Staring at my bedroom window from the 
outside. Back and forth. Back and forth. Remembering last night. 

Remembering just how brave Super Cooper had been. Yuck! 

Back and forth. Back and forth. 

Remembering the dogs. 

Hey. That’s weird, I thought. Those dogs I heard should have left paw prints 
all over the yard. But I couldn’t see a single one. 

I hopped off the swing and searched the ground all around the house. No 
sign of any dogs. 

That’s funny. I knew there were dogs out here last night. 

I glanced up at the edge of the woods. Maybe those dogs were lost, I 
thought. Maybe they came to the house last night searching for help. 

Maybe I should go track them down. 

I bit my lower lip. A kid could lose his way—forever—in those woods, I 
thought nervously. 

Well, I’m going in, I decided. Today is the first day of the new me. Super 
Cooper—for real. I wanted to find those dogs. To prove to myself that I wasn’t 
going crazy. 

Who knows? If I find the dogs, maybe Dad will let me keep one, I decided. 
It might be fun to have a dog. 

I’d always wanted a puppy. But Mom said the fur made her sneeze. Maybe 
she’d change her mind. 

I took one long, deep breath. Then I stepped into the woods. I saw some 
amazing trees. I saw beautiful old birch trees with smooth, white trunks. And I 
saw sassafras and maple trees. Their trunks were gnarled and thick. 

They could be over a hundred years old, I thought. Awesome. 

Maybe Dad can build a tree house back here, I told myself excitedly. That 
would be so cool. Then when Gary and Todd came to visit, we could hang out in 
it. 

I kept my eyes on the ground as I walked, searching for any sign of dogs. 

Nothing. No prints. No broken branches. 

How weird. I definitely heard dogs last night. 

Or maybe I just thought I’d heard those dogs. It was kind of late, and I was 
pretty sleepy. Maybe it was my imagination. 

Or maybe it was Mickey after all. 

Maybe he tape-recorded another dog and barked along with it. 



He would do something like that. 

He’s that sneaky. 

I really had to pay him back. Something way creepy. Maybe I could do 
something out here in the woods. 

I made my way through the thick trees and tall weeds, the whole time 
thinking of how to scare Mickey. 

I suddenly realized I hadn’t been paying attention to where I was going. 

I spun around and peered through the thick trunks. 

My house! I couldn’t see it! 

Okay, Cooper, keep cool. You can’t be that far away, I told myself. 

But my palms began to sweat. 

I swallowed hard, then tried to remember which way I’d come. 

Definitely the left. 

No, wait. Maybe right. 

I hung my head and moaned. It’s no use, I thought. 

I’m lost. Hopelessly lost. 



5 


I really didn’t want to cry. 

Who needed Mickey seeing me with wet, red eyes? 

I’d never hear the end of it. 

Besides, today was the first day of the new me. The new Super Cooper. 

I took a really deep breath and tried to calm down. 

I decided to walk a little to my right. If I didn’t see my house, I’d turn and 
double back to the left. 

It was worth a try. 

What did I have to lose? I was lost anyway. 

I turned to the right. I tried to take the straightest path possible. 

The snapping of branches behind me made me spin around. 

No one there. 

It’s just a harmless squirrel or something, I told myself. Just keep going. 

I returned to my straight path again. But with my first step, I heard leaves 
mstling behind me. 

I didn’t turn around. I quickened my pace. 

And I heard it again. 

Twigs snapping. Leaves rustling. 

My throat suddenly felt dry. Don’t panic. Don’t panic. “Wh-who’s there?” I 
croaked. 

No answer. 

I turned back. 

Whoa! Which way had I been walking? My head began to spin. I suddenly 
felt dizzy. Too dizzy to remember where I had been. 

Snap. Snap. Crack. Crunch. 

“Who is there?” I called out again. My voice didn’t sound all that steady for 
Super Cooper. 

“Mickey, is that you? This isn’t funny! Mickey?” 

Then I felt something horrible scrape my cheek. Something cold. And 
sharp. 

I couldn’t help it. I started to scream. 



6 


A leaf. A dumb leaf. 

Come on, Cooper! Get a grip! 

I sat down on the ground for a second. I checked my watch. It was almost 
eight. 

Dad would be out in the yard soon. He planned to set up the new barbecue 
grill first thing this morning. I figured I could just wait for the hammering to 
start, then walk in the direction of the noise. 

I’d just sit here. And wait. Wait for the hammering. Good idea, I thought. 

I heard something rustle behind me. 

Just the leaves, I told myself. The dumb leaves. 

I stole a glance up at the trees. I tilted my head way back—and someone 
grabbed my arm. 

I jerked away. Sprang up. Started to run. 

And tripped over my own feet. 

Scrambling up, I gasped in surprise. 

A girl. 

She was about my age and had really long, red hair. It was frizzy, and it 
stuck out in a million directions. She had big green eyes. She wore a bright red 
T-shirt and red shorts. She reminded me of a rag doll Todd’s little sister used to 
carry around. 

“You okay?” she asked, her hands on her waist. 

“Yeah, sure. Fine,” I muttered. 

“Didn’t mean to scare you,” she said. 

“I wasn’t scared,” I lied. 

“Really,” she said. “I would have been scared, too, if someone grabbed me 
like that. I really didn’t mean to.” 

“I told you,” I said sharply, “I wasn’t scared.” 

“Okay. Sorry.” 

“What are you sorry about?” I asked. This had to be the weirdest girl I’d 
ever met. 

“I don’t know,” she replied, shrugging. “I’m just sorry.” 



“Well, you can stop apologizing,” I told her. I brushed the dirt off my 
clothes and picked up my baseball cap. I quickly set it back on my head. To 
cover my ears. 

The girl stared at me. She stood there and stared. Without saying a word. 
Was she staring at my ears? 

“Who are you?” I finally asked. 

“Margaret Ferguson,” she replied. “But people call me Fergie. Like the 
duchess.” 

I didn’t know what duchess she was talking about. But I pretended I did. 

“I live through the woods that way,” she said, pointing behind her. 

“I thought no one lived around here for miles,” I said. 

“Yeah. There are some houses around here, Cooper,” she replied. “They’re 
pretty spread out.” 

“Hey! How did you know my name?” I asked suspiciously. 

Margaret, or Fergie, or whatever her name was, turned beet-red. 

“I, uh, watched you move in yesterday,” she confessed. 

“I didn’t see you,” I replied. 

“That’s because I hid in the woods,” she said. “I heard your father call you 
Cooper. And I know your last name, too. It’s Holmes. I saw it written on all the 
boxes in the moving van. And I know you have a brother, Mickey,” she added. 
“He’s a jerk.” 

I laughed. “You got that right!” I exclaimed. “So how long have you lived 
around here?” 

She didn’t answer. She kept her eyes on the ground. 

“I said, how long have—” 

Suddenly, her head jerked up and she gazed into my eyes. 

“Wh-what’s wrong?” I asked when I saw her frightened face. 

Her face tightened, as if she were in pain. Her lips trembled. 

“Margaret!” I cried. “What? What is it?” 

She opened her mouth, but no words came out. She breathed deeply, 
gulping air. Finally, she clutched my shoulders and shoved her face right up 
close to mine. 

“Dogs,” she whispered. Then she let go of me and darted away. 

I froze for a moment. Then I chased after her. 

She made it to a big tree stump before I caught up. I grabbed hold of the 
back of her T-shirt and spun her around. 



“Margaret, what do you mean ‘dogs’?” I asked. 

“No! No!” she cried. “Just let me go! Let me go!” 

I held her tightly. 

“Let me go! Let me go!” she cried again. 

“Margaret, what did you mean back there?” I repeated. “This is important. 
Why did you say ‘dogs’?” 

“Dogs?” Her eyes grew wide. “I don’t remember saying that.” 

My jaw fell open. “You did!” I insisted. “You looked straight at me and 
said, ‘dogs’! I heard you!” 

She shook her head. “No, I don’t remember that,” she replied thoughtfully. 

Now I’ve met weird kids in my life, but Margaret here takes the cake. She 
almost makes Mickey seem normal. 

Almost. 

“Okay,” I said, trying to sound calm, “here’s what happened. You freaked 
out. Then you grabbed me. Then you said, ‘Dogs’. Then you freaked out again.” 

“Don’t remember,” she replied softly, shaking her head from side to side. 
“Why would I say that?” 

“I don’t know!” I screamed, starting to lose it. “I’m not the one who said 
it!” 

She gazed around in all directions, then focused those green, crazy eyes on 
me. 

“Listen to me, Cooper,” she whispered mysteriously. “Get away from here.” 

“Huh?” 

“I’m warning you, Cooper! Tell your parents they must leave at once!” She 
glanced nervously behind her, then turned back to me. 

“Please—listen to me. Get away from here! As fast as you can!” 



7 


Fergie let go of my shoulders and ran. 

For a few seconds, I stared after her, too shocked to move. Then I decided 
I’d better not let her get away. 

“Fergie!” I called out. “Wait up!” 

For a girl, Fergie ran pretty fast. Actually, most girls I know are fast 
mnners. 

Whoever said they were slower than boys in the first place? It isn’t true. 
Lots of girls in my class last year could beat any guy in a race. 

Anyway, / happen to be a very fast runner. When you’re afraid of 
everything, you learn to run—fast! 

“Fergie!” I called again. “Please! Tell me what’s going on!” But I couldn’t 
catch up. 

Then, to my surprise, she stopped and turned back to me. “Listen, Cooper,” 
she said, calmer than before. “The woods are haunted. Your house is probably 
haunted, too. Go home. Go home and tell your parents to move back to wherever 
you came from.” 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. 

“It’s too dangerous here,” Fergie warned. “Get away, Cooper. As fast as you 
can!” 

With that, she turned and walked away in the direction of her house. 

I didn’t follow her this time. 

I should have. I totally forgot that I was lost. 

I turned around. My house is probably in the opposite direction, I decided. 

She disappeared through the trees. Fine with me, I thought angrily. It would 
be fine with me if I never saw her again. 

Why did she tell me all that? 

Why did she say the woods were haunted? 

Because it was tme? 

Leave it to my parents to buy a haunted house in haunted woods! 

I continued on, unable to shake the creepy feeling I had. I felt as if a 
hundred eyes were stalking me through the trees. 



I wished Fergie had kept her mouth shut. 

The longer I walked, the more frightened I became. Now I was positive that 
the woods were haunted. Haunted by ghosts tracking every step I made. 

Then, in the distance, I heard a faint banging. It startled me at first. When I 
realized it was Dad working on the grill, I shrieked with joy. 

“All right! I’m almost home!” My plan had worked. 

I followed the hammering sounds. 

Something rustled the branches above my head and made me jump. 

I gazed up. 

Just a bird. 

Staring up at the trees, I nearly fell headfirst into a stream. 

The water lapped quietly against the grassy shore. It reflected the pale blue 
morning sky above it. 

Funny, I hadn’t seen this stream here before. 

I bent down to touch the water. Cold. 

This is awesome! I thought. Areal stream, practically in my own backyard. 
Then I remembered that it wouldn’t be my backyard for long. As soon as I 
told my parents what Fergie had said, we’d pack up and move back to Boston. 

As I dried my hand on my shirt, I had that creepy feeling again. The feeling 
of eyes watching me. My head jerked up, and I gasped. 

There were eyes watching me. 

Four dark eyes glared at me from across the stream. 

The eyes of two enormous black Labradors. 

One dog panted loudly, its tongue hanging out. The other dog flashed its 
teeth at me. Ugly, yellow teeth. 

They both uttered low, menacing growls. 

Not friendly. Not friendly at all. 

Run! I urged myself. Run! 

But my legs wouldn’t budge. 

Growling, the dogs eyed me hungrily. 

Then they attacked. 



8 


Their heavy paws thudded the ground as they came bounding toward me. Their 
eyes glowed with excitement. Their large heads bobbed up and down. 

With a terrified cry, I turned and ran. 

If only I could fly! 

“Helllllp!” Was that me letting out that frightened wail? 

Yes. I think it was. 

Suddenly, I caught a glimpse of light through the trees. Sunlight glistening 
off the jungle gym slide! 

Yes! 

Almost home. 

The two black Labs ran at my heels. I could feel their hot breath on the 
backs of my legs. I felt a pair of sharp teeth scrape my ankle. 

With one last gasp of speed, I burst through the trees and out of the woods. 
“Dad!” I yelled, racing toward my father. 

“Help me!” I shrieked. “The dogs! The dogs!” I threw my arms around his 
waist and held on. 

“Cooper, calm down! What’s gotten into you?” my father asked, grabbing 
me by the shoulders. 

“The dogs!” I wailed, refusing to let go of him. 

“Cooper, what dogs?” Dad demanded. 

I blinked at him in confusion. Didn’t he hear them? Couldn’t he see them? 

I let go of him and pointed toward the woods. 

“Wild dogs. Big, black Labs, I think. They chased me, and—” 

I scanned the yard frantically. Dad and I were alone. 

No barking. 

No snarling. 

The sunlight glistened off the slide. 

The tire swung lazily from its rope. 

The dogs had vanished. 



9 


“Cooper, this is a joke—right?” Dad asked, shaking his head. 

“Huh? No way!” I cried. “They were right behind me. One almost bit me, 
and—” 

“And then they disappeared into thin air!” Dad declared. 

“Come into the woods with me,” I pleaded. “They’ve got to be there.” I ran 
to the edge of the woods, desperately searching for some sign of the dogs. Dad 
followed right behind. 

But there was nothing to see. 

I turned and slunk back to the house. 

Dad didn’t say anything until we were back in the yard. He sat down on the 
jungle gym slide. His eyes studied me. 

“Cooper, tell me what’s wrong,” Dad said in a low voice. I could tell he 
thought I had made all this up. 

“I told you, Dad. Two dogs chased me through the woods. They were 
inches from me! One tried to tear my leg off!” 

Dad continued to stare up at me, his expression thoughtful. 

“Dad, listen,” I pleaded. “We have to move. We can’t live here!” 

He climbed to his feet. “What are you talking about, Cooper?” 

“We have to move back to Boston,” I insisted. “We can’t stay here!” 

“Why not?” Dad asked. 

“It’s this house!” I shouted, my voice cracking. “It’s haunted!” 

“Now, Cooper—” 

“Dad! Listen to me,” I begged. “The woods... this house... they’re all 
haunted. Everybody around here knows it already! We never should have moved 
here!” 

“Cooper, you’re not making any sense,” Dad replied, keeping his voice low 
and calm. “You know, walking in the woods by yourself can be scary. Why don’t 
you come inside and calm down? Mom made a big breakfast. Have some French 
toast. You’ll feel better.” He put his arm around my shoulders. 

Now I really felt upset. My own father didn’t believe me. 

“But, Dad, it’s true!” I insisted. “The woods are haunted, and this weird girl 
I met warned me to move out! She—” 



“Cooper, I know you’re unhappy about the move,” Dad said. “But these 
wild stories aren’t going to change anything. This is where we live now.” 

“But—” 

“When school starts, you’ll make some new friends and everything will be 
fine. So come on in and have breakfast. You’ll feel better. You’ll see.” 

He led me back to the house. 

As Dad held the door open for me, I glanced back and took one last look at 
the woods. 

Two big black dogs stared at me from the trees. 



10 


When I blinked, the dogs vanished. 

Shaking my head, I made my way into the kitchen. 

Mickey had already finished half his breakfast when Dad and I entered the 
room. He leaned over his cereal bowl, snickering about something. I ignored 
him. 

“Cooper, have some French toast,” Mom said. “It’s on your plate, waiting 
for you.” 

I sat across from Mickey, trying hard not to look at his dumb face. I was 
still really steamed at him. 

“Mom, do you know who our neighbors are?” I asked, pouring maple syrup 
over the toast. 

“Why, sure,” Mom answered. “Your father and I met some of them a few 
weeks ago when we came to see the house.” 

“Did you meet the Fergusons?” I asked. 

Mom squinted her eyes, thinking. Then she shook her head. “No, I don’t 
think we met them. We met the Martells. Joel and Shirley. Very nice people.” 
Then she asked, “Who are the Fergusons?” 

I didn’t answer. I pressed on. “Did the Martells tell you our house was 
haunted?” 

Mom laughed. “No, Cooper, they didn’t. It must have slipped their minds,” 
she joked. 

“Ha-ha. It’s nothing to laugh about,” I insisted. “Our house is haunted. And 
so are the woods!” 

“Cooper, what are you talking about?” my mother demanded. 

“Enough, Cooper,” my father warned. “Eat your breakfast.” 

“Yeah,” Mickey said with a snort. “Eat your breakfast, Drooper.” 

I could feel my face turn red. I hated when Mickey called me Drooper. He 
called me that because of my big droopy ears. 

“Shut up, Sickey, ” I replied. 

“Cut it out, you two,” Dad snapped. 

I dug my fork into the French toast. How could they not believe me? Did 
they really think I made this story up? 



I lifted a chunk of toast to my mouth and stuffed it in. 

“Aghhhh!” 

Choking and coughing, I spit the food out on my plate. 

“Gross!” Mickey cried, grinning. “Gross! A guy could lose his appetite 
around here.” 

My eyes teared, and I coughed a few more times. 

“You okay, Cooper?” Mom asked. 

“Somebody dumped salt on my French toast!” I exclaimed angrily. 

Mickey started to laugh. 

That creep. 

My father climbed up from the table. Without saying a word, he stomped 
out of the room. 

That’s how my Dad acts when he’s angry. He gets all quiet, then just walks 
away. Punishments come later. 

I gulped down a glass of milk, trying to wash the salt out of my mouth. 
Mom returned to the stove to make another batch of French toast for me. 

“Mickey,” she said, sighing, “you know that wasn’t funny. Now apologize 
to your brother.” 

“Apologize? But it was just a joke!” Mickey complained. 

“We’re all cracking up,” I muttered bitterly, gulping down a second glass of 
milk. “You’re a real riot.” 

“Apologize!” my mother insisted again. 

Mickey hung his head and stared at the floor. 

I folded my arms across my chest. “I’m waiting!” I sang happily. 

Mickey made an ugly face at me. When Mom turned around, he changed 
his expression to an innocent smile. 

“I’m so sorry, Cooper,” Mickey oozed. “It won’t happen again.” He blinked 
innocently. 

Satisfied, Mom turned back to the stove. 

As soon as she did, Mickey pulled on his ears, trying to stretch them as big 
as mine. 

I’d had it with Mickey. I pushed my chair away from the table and hurried 
out of the room. I didn’t want to get into another fight with my stupid brother 
now. 

I had more important things to do. I had to talk to Dad about the dogs. I had 
to make him believe me. 



Dad sat in his favorite chair, which just didn’t look right in our new living 
room. Even he seemed to notice. He kept shifting uncomfortably. 

“Maybe it’s time for a new chair,” he muttered. 

“Dad, can I talk to you for a second?” I asked. 

“What is it, Cooper?” he asked as he moved Great-grandma’s lamp closer 
to the chair. 

“It’s about the dogs,” I said. 

Dad sighed. “Really, Cooper. Aren’t you making too big a deal about this? 
So what if you saw dogs in the woods? They could belong to anybody!” 

“But they chased me!” I replied, getting all worked up again. “And then 
they disappeared into thin air! And after that girl told me the woods were 
haunted—” 

“What girl?” my dad demanded. 

“She said her name was Margaret Ferguson,” I told him. “She said her 
family lived next door.” 

Dad rubbed his chin. “That’s strange,” he said. “The real estate broker 
never mentioned the Fergusons.” 

“Well, I met her this morning, and she told me everyone around here knows 
that our house is haunted!” 

“Maybe that’s why we got such a good deal on the house,” Dad muttered, 
chuckling. 

I didn’t see what was so funny. 

He stopped laughing and stared at me seriously. “Forget about the dogs for 
now, Cooper. We’ll deal with it if you see them again. In the meantime, I’ll ask 
around in town if anyone knows who owns them. Okay?” 

“But what about the house?” I asked. “Margaret said we should move as 
fast as we can.” 

“French toast is ready!” Mom called out, interrupting me. “Come on, 
Cooper. Before it gets cold.” 

“Go eat,” my father urged. “And please. Not another word about dogs or 
the house being haunted.” 

With a sigh, I headed back to the kitchen. As I stepped through the door, 
Mickey jumped in my face and let out a roar. 

Naturally, it scared me to death. 

“Mom!” I cried. 

“Mickey, enough!” my mother screamed. “Stop teasing Cooper. He’s 



having a hard time adjusting to the new house.” 

“No, I’m not!” I yelled at her. Why wasn’t anybody taking me seriously? 
“This house is haunted. You’ll be sorry you didn’t listen to me. You’ll be sorry!” 

Then I stormed out and stomped off to my room. I collapsed on my bed and 
gazed around. Same old stuff, but the room didn’t feel like my own. 

I stayed in there all day. I didn’t want to see Mickey. I didn’t want to see 
Mom and Dad. And I really didn’t want to see those dogs again. 

By dinnertime, I’d unpacked most of my things. The room felt a little better. 
More like my old bedroom back in Boston. 

After dinner, I lugged all seventy-seven snow domes into the bathroom and 
washed them, one by one. People don’t realize that you have to take care of 
snow domes and keep them clean and filled with water or they’ll dry out. 

When they were all sparkling clean, I arranged them carefully on my new 
bookcase. 

They looked awesome! 

I tried to organize them in some sort of size order, but that didn’t work. 
Instead, I alphabetized them—from Annapolis to Washington, D.C. Of course, I 
placed my absolute favorite dome—a Boston Red Sox snow dome—on the 
middle shelf, front and center. 

I finished at eleven, then got ready for bed. All that unpacking had tired me 

out. 

I had closed my eyes and was just drifting off to sleep when I heard it. 

Loud and clear. 

Barking. 

And growling. 

Outside my window. 

I bolted straight up in bed. 

I waited for my parents and Mickey to come running in. This time, they 
must have heard the dogs, too. 

I waited. And waited. 

The barking grew louder. 

No one else in the house stirred. 

I lowered one foot to the floor, then the other. I stood up, listening hard. 
Listening to the two dogs barking. 

And to my horror, I realized that this time the barking wasn’t outside my 
window. 



This time it was coming from inside my house! 



11 


Frantically, I searched for a weapon. Something to protect me from the barking 
dogs. 

I found my aluminum baseball bat in the closet. I gripped it tightly and 
crept across the room to my bedroom door. 

I pushed it open. And listened. 

Yes. 

The barking was definitely coming from inside the house. From the living 
room, I decided. 

I took a deep breath and slipped into the hallway. Where were my parents? 
Their bedroom is directly over the living room on the second floor. They had to 
hear this. 

Why hadn’t they come running out? 

Mickey’s room was on the first floor down the hall from mine. I peered 
down the hall and saw that his bedroom door was closed. 

What’s his problem? I wondered. Where is everyone? 

I crept quietly down the hall, inching my way to the living room. I could 
hear the dogs racing around in there. 

I gasped when I heard a loud crash. 

Something clattered to the floor. Great-grandma’s lamp, I guessed. 

I stared up at the ceiling—to my parents’ bedroom. Were they deaf or 
something? 

Holding the bat in front of me, I jumped into the living room and snapped 
on the ceiling light. 

The dogs were... 

The dogs were... 

NOT THERE! 

The room stood empty. 

“Huh?” I blinked a few times from the sudden brightness of the light, then 
stared around the room. 

No dogs. 

No growling. No barking. 



But, wait! Great-grandma’s lamp lay on its side on the floor. 

I took a step over to the sofa. Something crunched under my bare feet. 
Potato chips? 

Yes. Potato chips. Scattered across the room. 

I spotted the potato chip bag—ripped to shreds on the floor. 

My heart thumped so hard, I thought it might burst out of my chest. 

As I bent to pick up the torn bag, a shadow fell over me. 

I heard heavy breathing. 

And I felt a gust of hot, smelly breath shoot across my neck. 



12 


“Drooper, what are you doing?” 

I straightened up and spun around. 

“Mickey!” 

“That’s my name. Don’t wear it out,” he replied. 

“Mickey! Did you hear them? Did you?” 

Mickey glanced around the room. “Hear who?” he asked. Then, before I 
could answer, he snapped, “Cooper, you jerk, why did you throw potato chips 
around the living room?” 

“The dogs!” I cried. “The dogs did it! Did you hear them?” 

Mickey shook his head. “No way. I didn’t hear anything.” 

I was stunned. “You didn’t hear wild dogs mnning around the room a few 
minutes ago?” 

Mickey rolled his eyes and whistled. “You’re losing it, Cooper. Hearing 
invisible dogs is one thing. But feeding them potato chips? You’re really messed 
up, man.” 

“I didn’t do this!” I said angrily. “I told you. The dogs did.” 

Mickey shook his head. “Just promise me one thing,” he said seriously. 

“What?” I asked. 

“Promise me when school starts next week, you won’t tell anybody you’re 
related to me.” 

I wanted to throw something at him. I wished I had Great-grandma’s lamp 
in my hand, but I didn’t. So I threw what I did have—the empty potato chip bag. 

It flew about three inches, then dropped at my feet. 

“You’re pathetic!” Mickey laughed. “I know why you’re doing this, too. 
You’re trying to make Mom and Dad think the house is haunted. So then they’ll 
move back to Boston, and you can see your dweeby little friends Gary and Todd 
again.” 

He made a face at me. “Dumb, Drooper. Really dumb.” 

He shuffled away, shaking his head. 

Just you wait, Mickey, I thought. I’m going to get even with you. Just you 

wait. 



And I’m going to make everyone believe me about the dogs. I’m going to 
make everyone believe that I’m telling the truth. 

But how? I wondered, gazing around the empty, silent living room. 

How? 



13 


Sunday morning I woke up early as usual. I had only a few more things to 
unpack, and I knew I could finish before breakfast. 

I unrolled my Red Sox poster and tacked it to the wall, over my bed. Same 
place I’d hung it in Boston. 

Then I rummaged through a box, searching for my lucky pair of red socks. 
As I was slipping them on my feet, I heard the doorbell ring. 

“Cooper!” my mother called to me a few seconds later. “There’s someone 
here to see you!” 

Who could it be? I didn’t know anybody here. 

Then I had a thought. Maybe Gary asked his dad to drive him and Todd up 
to Maine to surprise me! 

Wow! What a great surprise! 

I closed the box and charged out of my room, down the hall, and to the 
front door. I was so excited! 

But no Gary and Todd. 

Fergie stared at me from the front doorway. I could see at first glance that 
she was kind of nervous. She kept shifting her weight from one foot to the other. 
And she twirled a lock of her bright red hair between her fingers. 

“Oh. Hi,” I mumbled, unable to hide my disappointment. 

“I need to talk to you,” she said. “Right away.” 

“Okay, sure,” I replied. 

“Not here,” she said, nudging her head toward the den where my mom and 
dad were reading the newspaper. 

I sighed. “Okay, wait a sec.” I ran back to my room and pulled on a pair of 
sneakers. 

“Let’s go out back,” I suggested. She nodded solemnly and followed me 
outside. 

I swung on the tire and listened to Fergie. “It was all your brother’s idea!” 
she blurted out. 

“Excuse me?” I cried. 

“I don’t know why I agreed to do it, but it was really all his idea. Every bit 
of it.” 



“What was?” I asked. 

“Everything I told you yesterday. About your house. And the woods.” 

“You mean they’re not haunted?” I asked, confused. 

Fergie shook her head. “Of course not.” 

“But why did you tell me they were?” I asked. 

“I told you, it was all Mickey’s idea. I met Mickey the day you moved in,” 
Fergie explained. “He told me it would be funny if I played this trick on you.” 

“He what?” I cried. 

“He told me the two of you always played all kinds of tricks on each other,” 
Fergie replied. “He said you would think it was a riot.” 

“A joke?” I asked. “It was all one of Mickey’s jokes?” I couldn’t believe it. 

Fergie bit her bottom lip and nodded. “Mickey said to tell you the woods 
were haunted. He said to tell you the house was haunted, too.” Fergie sighed. 
“So I did it. But when I saw how scared you were, I felt really bad about it. I 
wished I hadn’t listened to your brother.” 

Mickey. That jerk. 

“But how did you know about the dogs?” I asked. 

Fergie stared blankly at me. “Dogs? What dogs?” 

“That’s the word you whispered to me,” I explained. “Dogs.” 

Fergie twisted her face, thinking hard. “No, I don’t remember saying that. 
Are you sure I said ‘dogs’?” 

I nodded. “Definitely. That was all you said. Dogs. And, then, after you ran 
off, two mean-looking black Fabradors chased me through the woods.” 

“Really?” 

I nodded. “They chased me all the way home. Then they just vanished.” 

“Weird,” Fergie mumbled. 

“Tell me about it,” I replied, rolling my eyes. 

“Where did you first see the dogs?” Fergie asked me. 

I pointed into the woods. “Back there. Near a stream.” 

“That’s the stream that leads to the Martells’ house,” Fergie said. “They’re 
friends of my parents. They don’t own any dogs, Cooper.” 

I shrugged, then batted a fly that buzzed in my ear. “Well, someone around 
here must have dogs,” I told her. 

“I’m scared of dogs,” Fergie admitted. “I’m glad I didn’t see them 
yesterday.” 

“They weren’t nice dogs,” I muttered. “You wouldn’t like them.” 



“Hey, did you see a big rock in the shape of an arrowhead when you were 
near the stream?” she asked. 

I shook my head. “No, I didn’t.” 

“It’s really cool,” she gushed. “You should check it out. I go there all the 
time. It’s a great rock for climbing.” 

“Let’s check it out now,” I suggested. I still thought the woods were scary 
—haunted or not. But I didn’t feel like hanging around the house. 

I hopped off the tire and followed Fergie into the woods. I spotted a long, 
thick stick and picked it up. “In case the dogs come back,” I told Fergie. 

We walked a little while until we reached the stream. Fergie searched 
around for her rock. 

“I know it’s here somewhere,” she said, turning to me. “I can never—” 

She stopped short when her eyes met mine. 

“Cooper!” she whispered. “What is it?” 

I stumbled backwards. My hand trembled as I pointed to the trees directly 
behind Fergie. 

“Mar—Margaret!” I whispered in terror. “The dogs! Look out! They’re 
coming! They’re coming right at us!” 



14 


Fergie spun around. She let out a frightened cry. 

“Here they come!” I shrieked. 

Fergie froze in terror. “Oh, no! Help me, Cooper! I told you! I’m afraid of 
dogs!” 

“Run!” I shouted at her. “Run!” 

In a flash, Fergie dashed past me. I’ve never seen anyone run so fast. 

She ran about ten steps. Then her hands flew up as she tripped over a rock. 

She uttered a shrill cry of panic and went sprawling on the ground. 

I had to laugh. “Got you back!” I cried gleefully. 

“Huh?” Fergie lifted her head. 

“I got you back,” I repeated. “For playing that mean trick on me. For 
helping Mickey.” 

I watched as the color slowly returned to Fergie’s face. “You scared me to 
death,” she muttered. “How could you play such a horrible joke?” 

“Easy,” I replied, still grinning. 

Fergie growled at me. “I told you, it wasn’t totally my fault. Your brother 
said you played tricks on each other all the time.” Then she stood up and shook 
her head. “That was mean, Cooper. Really mean.” 

I shrugged. “Yeah. I know. But now we’re even.” 

Fergie brushed some dirt off her jeans and examined a scrape on her elbow. 
“You know, we should both get back at Mickey,” she said. 

“I’ve been thinking about that all morning,” I told her. “And yesterday, too. 
Mickey’s been playing really mean tricks on me since we moved here. And I 
have to get back at him. But it has to be something totally awesome.” 

We walked along the stream a while longer, trying to figure out how to get 
back at Mickey. Then Fergie found the arrowhead rock. 

She climbed up first, and I followed. It was a big, craggy rock, great for 
climbing. 

We hung out on the rock, thinking up ways to get Mickey back. Fergie 
wanted to drag him deep into the woods blindfolded and leave him stranded. But 
I didn’t think that would scare Mickey one bit. 

I jumped off the rock and began circling it. Sometimes I think better on my 



feet. 


On my third trip around, I got my foot caught in a thick, leafy plant. I 
glanced down—and cried out. “Oh, perfect! I’m standing in poison ivy!” 

Fergie laughed. “It only looks like poison ivy,” she assured me. “My 
science teacher checked it out last year. She told us it’s a harmless weed.” 

I smiled a really evil smile. 

“I think I have a great idea. What if we pulled out a bunch of this stuff? 
What if it somehow ended up in Mickey’s bed? Would he freak—or what?” 

“He might,” Fergie agreed, grinning down at me. 

We gathered a bunch of the weeds. They grew all along the stream. So we 
picked some more as we walked slowly back to my house. 

Just past the stream, Fergie showed me a clearing in the trees I hadn’t 
noticed before. A small clearing filled with wildflowers. 

I knew right away Mom would flip out if she saw them. She always bought 
flowers at the Faneuil Hall market back in Boston. I started to pick some for her. 

I reached down for a few pretty violet and yellow flowers when something 
moving through the trees caught my eye. I glanced up just in time to see Mickey 
stagger into the clearing. 

Fergie and I both cried out when we spotted him. 

Mickey’s clothes were ripped and shredded. 

Dark scratches covered his face and arms. And bright red blood trickled 
down his neck. 

“Cooper,” he croaked weakly, barely able to talk. “Cooper—the dogs—” 

Those were the last words he spoke before he crumpled to the ground. 



15 


“Mickey!” I screamed in horror. 

I dropped the wildflowers and weeds and ran to his side. 

Fergie and I knelt down beside him. “Is he okay?” she asked, her voice 
barely above a whisper. 

I leaned over him and, with both hands, tugged on his tattered shirt. But I 
couldn’t pull him up. With each try, his limp body slumped back to the ground. 

“Mickey! Mickey!” I cried his name again and again. “Are you all right? 
The dogs! Did they—?” 

As I leaned in closer, Mickey’s arms shot up and clamped around my neck. 
He yanked me to the ground. Then he jumped up and sat on top of me. 

He was giggling like an idiot. 

“Oh, Mickey! Mickey!” he shrieked in a high voice. “Mickey! Are you all 
right?” 

I started to sputter, but no words came out. 

“What a wimp!” he teased. “Do you have to fall for the fake blood every 
single time?” He let out another long, high-pitched giggle. 

I shut my eyes and prayed that I’d disappear. I couldn’t believe my brother 
had tricked me again. In front of Fergie. 

My face grew hot. “I’ll pound you for this!” I shouted, struggling to push 
him off me. 

“Ooooh! I’m shaking!” Mickey snorted. 

“Don’t you have anything better to do than to try and scare me?” I yelled. 

“I don’t even have to try,” Mickey replied, grinning. 

Fergie stood over us, her arms crossed in front of her. 

“Were you in on this little joke, too?” I demanded angrily. 

“No! No way!” Fergie insisted. 

Mickey pinned my arms to the ground. “Say ‘Uncle’, wimp.” 

I’d never been so embarrassed in my life. 

Never. 

And that includes the time Mickey locked me out of the house in my 
underwear. 



“You’re dead meat!” I shouted in his face. 

“What are you going to do, Drooper? Knock me out with your bouquet of 
violets?” 

He threw his head back and laughed at his stupid joke. Lucky for me, it 
gave me a chance to bite his arm. 

“Ow! You mutant! Look what you did! I’m bleeding!” 

He jumped up and examined the bite mark on his arm. Then he growled at 
me, turned, and trotted away. 

I wanted to chase after him. But Margaret held me back. 

“Let him go,” she said, clutching my shirt. “He’s a creep. Really.” 

Grumbling to myself, I brushed off my clothes. Then I picked up the 
flowers for Mom. I couldn’t face Fergie. 

“Are you going home?” she asked. 

“Uh-huh,” I grunted. 

“Will I see you in school tomorrow?” 

I shrugged. I wished she would leave me alone. I wanted to be by myself. 

I grunted again. I think she got the message. 

“Well, guess I’ll head home now. Don’t worry, Cooper,” she said, starting in 
the direction of her house. “We’ll come up with a plan to get him back. I 
promise.” 

I didn’t answer. 

“See you tomorrow!” she called out, waving. 

I didn’t bother to wave back. I watched her leave. Then I made my way 
over to the stream to take a drink of cold water. The sight of Mickey all bloody 
had made my throat dry. And it was from screaming. 

I leaned over the sparkling, cool water and lowered my hand. I scooped 
some water up to my mouth and drank. 

But when I saw my reflection in the stream, I choked. 

It wasn’t me. 

The face staring back at me in the water was the face of a black dog! 

I jerked my head up. 

No dogs on the shore. 

No dogs anywhere in sight. 

“Whoa!” I cried aloud. 

I leaned over the stream again and peered into the water. 

The dog stared up at me from beneath the surface. 



I raised my head again. No dog on the shore. 

So how could I see a dog’s reflection in the water? 

Once again, I squinted into the clear stream. The dog appeared to ripple 
with the water. 

And as I gaped at the eerie reflection in horror, it pulled back its thin lips 
and bared its ugly yellow teeth in a silent growl. 



16 


I raced home without glancing back. 

I crashed through the front door and charged straight for the bathroom. I 
had to check myself out in the mirror. 

I don’t know what I thought I’d see. 

A dog face staring back at me? 

Even I know how stupid that sounds. 

But I couldn’t explain the dog reflection in the water. I should have seen my 
face in that stream—not the growling face of a black Lab. 

Stepping into the bathroom, I approached the mirror slowly. I peeked in. 
And I saw—my own freckled face. 

Did it make me feel better? 

Not much. 

I didn’t speak to anyone in my family for the rest of the afternoon. And at 
dinnertime, I nibbled a few bites, then asked to be excused. 

“Are you feeling okay, Cooper?” Mom asked, frowning. “Liver and onions 
is your favorite. I’ve never seen you leave liver and onions on your plate.” 

She walked over and felt my forehead. That’s what she always does 
whenever I act a little strange. Leels my forehead. 

“I’m fine, Mom,” I replied. “I’m just not very hungry. That’s all.” 

“Cooper is probably a little nervous about tomorrow. His first day in a new 
school,” Dad said to Mom. He turned to me. “Am I right?” 

“Yeah, that’s it,” I agreed. No sense in bringing up the dogs again. No one 
would believe me, anyway. 

“Aw. Poor little Drooper. Scared of his new school,” Mickey teased. 

Mom and Dad shot Mickey a warning glance. “Mickey—not tonight,” Dad 
muttered. 

I ignored my dumb brother. I climbed up from my chair and headed for my 
room. 

I couldn’t fall asleep that night. Every time I closed my eyes, I saw the face of 
the angry black dog, rippling in the stream. 



I finally dozed off after midnight. 

I awoke to Mom’s impatient cries. “Cooper. Cooper. You’ve overslept. 
Time to get up!” 

I couldn’t believe it. I’m always up early. I never oversleep. 

I’m going to be late for my first day of school! I thought unhappily. And it’s 
all because of those creepy dogs. 

I threw my T-shirt and jeans on and rushed down the hall to the kitchen. No 
time for a big breakfast. I gulped down a glass of milk. Then I opened the fridge 
and reached for the peanut butter and jelly to make a sandwich for lunch. 

As I spread the peanut butter on the bread, I heard whimpering behind me. 

“Cut it out, Mickey,” I said without turning around. 

The whimpering grew louder. 

“Mickey! Quit it! Stop being such a—” 

They sprang out of nowhere. The dogs. 

They were in the kitchen! 



17 


Their jaws hung loose. They drooled hungrily. Thick yellow drool. 

My knees buckled. I clutched for the counter to steady myself. 

Their dark, furry bodies shimmered under the bright kitchen lights. 
Growling, their teeth bared, they stepped side by side away from the wall. 

I moved back slowly. One small step. 

Their dark eyes tracked my move. 

One more step back. Slowly. Then another. 

Their steady gaze followed me. 

The back door stood inches away. If I reached back, I could touch the 
doorknob now. 

I reached back. Slowly. Very slowly. 

My hand fumbled. Then I found it. The small round knob... 

Too late! 

They jumped. 

I screamed as their dark bodies hurtled toward me. 

I shut my eyes. 

I heard the sound of snapping jaws. 

I opened my eyes in time to see one of the dogs snatch my lunch from the 
counter. 

Then they disappeared. 

Through the kitchen door. They dove right through the wooden door. 
Breathing hard, I sank into a kitchen chair. 

I held my head tightly. I shut my eyes and tried to calm myself. 

I had just seen two dogs run right through a door. How could that be? 

Mom raced into the room. Dad followed. 

“Cooper, what’s wrong?” Mom cried. “What was that horrible scream we 
heard?” 

I had to tell them what happened. I had to. This was too weird. Too scary 
and too weird. 

Sol told them the whole story. 

“Two black dogs—they jumped through the wall. Into the kitchen. One of 



them grabbed my lunch. Then they dove through the door.” 

Big mistake. 

Mom and Dad gave me a lecture about the stress of moving. I think I heard 
them mention the word psychiatrist. 

They didn’t believe a word of it. 

I didn’t have the strength to argue. I shuffled out the door and headed for 
school. 

No way I could stop thinking about those dogs. Dogs that only I could see. Dogs 
that stole lunches. Dogs that could walk through doors. 

I didn’t see them again that week. But every morning I’d hear them barking 
somewhere around the house. Nobody else heard them. 

On Friday, I met Fergie after school and we walked home together. She 
talked nonstop about our math teacher, but I wasn’t really paying attention. I 
couldn’t stop thinking about the dogs. 

“What?” I asked Fergie. She’d just asked me something about math 
homework. 

“I said,” she repeated impatiently, “that we can do our math homework 
together this weekend.” 

I shrugged. “Yeah, whatever.” 

Fergie was going to stay at our house Saturday night. Her parents had to go 
to Vermont for the weekend. 

We had become pretty good friends this past week. So had our parents. 
Mom and Dad invited the Fergusons over for dinner on Tuesday, and the 
Fergusons had us over on Wednesday. 

Maybe having Fergie sleep over will be fun, I thought. If I can shut those 
dogs out of my mind. 

“We still have to come up with a trick to play on Mickey,” Fergie pointed 
out. “I’ve been thinking—” 

“Listen, Fergie,” I said, interrupting her. “There’s something I’ve been 
meaning to tell you all week.” 

She waited for me to begin. 

I took a deep breath, then blurted out the whole story. About the dog 
reflection in the stream. And the dogs in the kitchen. 

“I’ve been hearing them all week,” I confessed. “Sometimes outside the 
house, sometimes inside. It’s been a nightmare.” 



Fergie’s jaw dropped open. “How come you didn’t tell me before?” she 
asked. 

I sighed. “Because no one in my family believes me,” I said. “I thought you 
wouldn’t, either.” 

“I believe you, Cooper,” she replied solemnly. 

I smiled. “Thanks, Fergie. That means a lot.” 

Fergie’s expression turned thoughtful. “Well, maybe we’ll both hear them 
on Saturday night. Your parents will have to believe both of us.” 

I nodded. Fergie was right. Mom and Dad couldn’t think the two of us 
needed to see a doctor. I started to feel a little more cheerful. 

“Now about the get-back-at-Mickey plan,” Fergie said. “I have another 
idea.” 

I tried to listen to Fergie’s plan—it had something to do with rats and a rope 
—but I couldn’t concentrate on what she was saying. I could only think about 
the dogs. 

Would they turn up again this weekend? 



18 


I watched each minute tick away on the alarm clock near my bed. Finally— 
midnight. Time to get moving. 

I tiptoed down the hall to the guest room where Fergie slept. I knocked on 
the door. 

“Fergie,” I whispered. “Fergie, get up!” 

She appeared at the door in an instant, fully dressed. “The dogs? Are the 
dogs here?” she asked, eyes wide with fright. 

She seemed really spooked. And she had awful pillow-hair static. 

“No, dope.” I whispered. “It’s time to scare Mickey.” 

Fergie rubbed her eyes. “Oh, yeah, right.” 

Without saying another word, she slid under the bed and came out with a 
shoe box and some string. 

“Let me see it again,” I said eagerly. 

Fergie smiled, then opened the box. Inside sat a huge, hairy, totally gross, 
disgusting black rat. 

A fake, of course. But it looked so real! Real enough to fool another rat. A 
rat like Mickey. 

I lifted the rat from the box and shook it in Fergie’s face. 

She backed away and let out a yelp, even though she knew it was made of 
mbber or something. 

I tied the string around the rat’s neck and waved at Fergie to follow me. We 
crept silently into the hall and headed for Mickey’s room. 

This was going to be totally awesome! I couldn’t wait to see the look on 
Mickey’s face when our hairy rat slithered across his bed! 

We stopped in the hall outside Mickey’s room. His door stood slightly open. 
I poked my head in and checked out his bedroom. 

By the dim light in the hallway, I could see Mickey in bed, all covered up, 
fast asleep. Mickey never sleeps with a pillow. He always tosses it on the floor 
when he climbs into bed. There it was, next to his shoes. 

I stepped back from the door and pulled Fergie aside. 

“Okay, here’s the plan,” I whispered. “When we’re inside the room, go to 
the left. That’s where the closet is. I’ll tiptoe over to the bed and put the rat on 



Mickey. Then I’ll meet you in the closet.” 

“Check,” Fergie whispered solemnly. 

“And, remember,” I warned her, “be quiet!” 

“Check,” Fergie said again. 

With the rat in one hand, I carefully made my way into Mickey’s room. I 
glimpsed Fergie heading left to the closet. I headed right. 

I had nearly reached Mickey’s bed when I heard a loud crack. 

My heart jumped to my throat. I spun around and stared at Fergie in horror. 

I saw instantly what had happened. She had stepped on Mickey’s 
skateboard. 

We both turned to the bed. 

Mickey didn’t move a muscle. 

He hadn’t heard the noise. 

I let out a quiet sigh of relief, then shot Fergie a warning glance. 

She nodded nervously. 

I watched as she opened the closet door and ducked inside. 

I held the rat out in front of me and edged closer to Mickey’s bed. My hand 
shook, but I gripped the hairy creature tightly. 

I stared down at Mickey under the covers. He slept soundly. 

I crept closer. 

Bundled under the blankets, it was impossible to tell where Mickey’s body 
started. I set the rat down gently, near his stomach, I think. 

Then I tiptoed to the closet. Inside, I knelt next to Fergie and gave her a 
thumbs-up sign. 

Operation “Scare Mickey” was in effect. 

And I couldn’t be more excited. 

It served him right. 

I quietly pulled the closet door toward me, leaving it open just a crack. I 
held tightly onto the end of the string. 

“Ready?” I whispered. 

“Ready,” she whispered back. 

“Okay,” I said. “On three. One... two... uh, Fergie, stop kicking me.” 

“I’m not touching you,” she whispered sharply. 

“You are, too. Stop it, okay?” 

“No way. My feet are all the way over here,” Fergie protested. 



“Ow! You kicked me again!” I whispered. 

She raised her voice. “I did not!” 

I clamped my hand over her mouth. 

We both froze. 

I heard breathing. 

Heavy breathing. 

Not my breathing. Not Fergie’s breathing. 

I swallowed hard. 

“F-Fergie,” I stammered. “We’re not alone in here!” 



19 


A low, steady growl proved me right. 

Someone—or something —was hiding in the closet with us. 

We listened to the low growls for another second or two. 

Then we both flew out of the closet, screaming in horror. 

I only made it a few feet. I tripped over Mickey’s skateboard. Went 
sprawling headfirst. Landed flat on my face. 

As I struggled to my feet, I saw a dark figure step out of the closet. 

“You!” I screamed in a hoarse, frightened voice. 

Mickey grinned back at Fergie and me. “Oooohhh! Ooooooohhh! Look at 
me!” he cried. “I’m a killer poodle!” 

Fergie and I stared at him in disbelief. He had been in the closet the entire 

time. 

I dove to the bed and pulled down the blanket. 

“Oh, wow!” I cried out when I saw a bunch of rolled up sheets and towels. 
“But how did you know?” Fergie asked him. “How did you know we were 
coming?” 

Mickey flashed us both a smug smirk. “When you showed up this morning 
clutching that dumb box and whispering to Cooper, I knew something was up. 
I’ve been spying on you two jerks all day.” 

“You sneak!” I cried. 

“A sneak? Me?” Mickey replied innocently. “What do you call what you’re 
doing, prowling around my room and hiding in my closet?” 

I was so angry. So disappointed. Our great revenge plan—totally ruined. 

I grabbed Fergie by the arm. “Come on. Let’s get out of here.” 

“That’s right!” Mickey called gleefully after us. “Running away with your 
tails between your legs!” Then he howled and barked some more. 

Great guy—huh? 

Fergie and I sat in the hall outside my room. We had really wanted to give 
Mickey a good scare. So he could see how it felt. 

But we had messed up. Totally. 

“We’ll get him next time,” Fergie offered. “We’ll come up with an even 



better plan. Maybe something with knives and fake blood.” 

I shrugged. I didn’t want to wait. I wanted to scare Mickey out of his skin 
— tonight! 

Not much chance of that. 

Fergie and I yawned at the same time. Then we both stood up. “Guess we 
should go back to bed. Maybe—” 

“Did you hear that?” I asked, cutting Fergie off. 

She nodded. “Yeah. I hear it. Barking.” 

“That’s not my brother,” I whispered. “It’s definitely the dogs!” 



20 


“I don’t get it!” Fergie cried in a trembling voice. “Where are your parents? 
Where’s Mickey?” 

I led her down the hall, in the direction of the barking. 

“I told you,” I whispered. “They can’t hear the dogs. I don’t know why. No 
one can hear them but us!” 

We turned into the living room and gasped. 

Two sets of red eyes glowed in the dark. 

I reached for Great-grandma’s lamp, but knocked it over. It crashed loudly 
to the floor. 

The dogs barked. 

Fergie clutched my shoulder. Her hand trembled. “Turn on the lights! 
Please!” she pleaded. 

But before I could reach the switch, the lights snapped on. 

We spun around. And there stood Mom on the stairway, glaring down at us. 
“Cooper! Margaret! What on earth are you two doing?” 

“It’s the dogs, Mom!” I cried. “See? They’re—” 

“What dogs?” Mom called. I spun around. 

No glaring red eyes. No dogs. Except for Fergie and me, the room stood 
empty. 

“Wow, your mom sure was upset,” Fergie whispered as we trudged back down 
the hall to our rooms. 

“But now you believe me, right, Fergie?” I asked. “You heard the dogs 
yourself!” 

Fergie nodded. “For sure. There were definitely dogs here.” 

“Go to sleep!” Mom called sternly. “Immediately!” 

“Okay, Mom!” I called back. I turned to Fergie. “We’ll check out the woods 
in the morning,” I told her. “Those dogs have to be somewhere!” 

“Good idea,” Fergie agreed. “See you in the morning.” 

Back in my room, I couldn’t fall asleep. I sat on my bed and tossed a 
baseball into the air. I watched the numbers slowly click by on my alarm clock. 



I thought about the dogs. They were definitely here tonight. Fergie had 
heard them, too. 

But how do they get in and out of my house? I wondered. 

And how do they vanish into thin air like that? 

And why do they keep bothering me? Why? 

I tossed down the baseball and crept into the hall. 

I knocked softly on Fergie’s door. “It’s me. Can I come in?” 

“What’s wrong?” she whispered, opening the door. 

“Listen,” I said. “I don’t think I can wait until tomorrow. Let’s search for 
those dogs now. ” 

Fergie narrowed her eyes thoughtfully. “It—it might be dangerous,” she 
stammered. 

“I don’t care,” I told her. “Let’s go.” 



21 


A few minutes later, Fergie and I skulked around the backyard with our 
flashlights. 

No moon tonight. No stars. A chilly mist hung in the air. 

We both shivered. 

I pointed my flashlight at the ground and searched for paw prints. 

None. As usual. 

“How come they never leave prints?” I muttered under my breath. 

Fergie shrugged, but didn’t answer. I could tell she was as scared as I was. 
She stuck close by my side. 

The beam of my flashlight fell on the jungle gym. As I stared down at the 
ground ahead of me, something suddenly grabbed my ankle. 

“Hey!” I yelled, tumbling in the dirt. 

I twisted and squirmed, trying to break free. “Help!” 

Fergie rushed over to help. Why was she laughing? 

“What a klutz! You’re all tangled up in the lawn sprinkler!” she exclaimed. 

“It’s not funny,” I insisted. I was glad she couldn’t see me blush in the 
darkness. “I could have broken my leg or something!” 

Fergie bent down to help free me. Then she stopped. “Did you hear that?” 
she asked. 

“Hear what?” 

“Listen.” 

We waited silently in the dark. Hardly breathing. 

Then I heard it, too. A soft creaking coming from the house. It sounded like 
an old door swinging open and shut. 

We carefully made our way toward the sound. To my surprise, we found a 
small window low to the ground. I’d never noticed it before. 

The window was open, swinging back and forth, making the creaking noise. 

“It leads to the basement,” I said, poking my head in. “Do you think this is 
how the dogs get into the house?” 

Fergie didn’t answer me. 

“Fergie?” I called. 



No reply. 

A chill of fear shot down my back. 

I spun around. 

In time to see a dark form come charging at me. 

Startled, I stumbled. The back of my head hit the house with a hard thwack. 
The dark creature leaped on top of me. 

Pinned me to the ground. 

A sour smell filled my nostrils as I struggled to get up. 

But I couldn’t move. 

The creature panted. Its jaws opened wide. Hot saliva dripped on to my 

face. 

The big dog held me prisoner. 

What did it plan to do next? 



22 


“Get off me!” I choked out. 

I reached up both hands—and shoved with all my might. 

To my surprise, the big dog toppled off. 

I jumped to my feet, my heart pounding. Spinning around, I saw Fergie. 
Trapped. Backed up against the house by the other dog. 

“Go home!” she cried meekly to the dog. “Go home!” 

The dog didn’t budge. 

I picked up a stick. I waved it furiously in front of me to keep the dogs a 
good distance away. 

As I approached the animals, Fergie shook her arms wildly at them. 

They lowered their heads and growled softly. 

Then, one of them came running at me. The stick didn’t seem to bother him 
at all. 

I lost my balance and crashed into Fergie. 

Both dogs curled their lips into fierce, ugly snarls. 

My legs were shaking so hard, I could barely stand. 

Growling and snapping their jaws, the dogs backed Fergie and me against 
the house. 

“Now what?” Fergie cried, grabbing my arm. 

“G-good question,” I stammered as the dogs lowered their heads and moved 
closer. 



23 


I shut my eyes. 

I had this crazy idea that if I made them disappear, I’d disappear, too. 

Guess what? It didn’t work. 

I felt a sudden burst of hot, sour dog breath on my face. 

Then I felt tugging. On my sweatpants. 

I opened my eyes. The dog pulled furiously at my sweats. Not biting. 
Tugging. 

Fergie appeared as confused as I was. The other dog tugged at the hem of 
her T-shirt. 

“What do they want?” Fergie whispered. 

“I... I... I don’t know,” I answered. “They—they’re not biting or 
attacking!” 

“Cooper, I think they want us to go with them,” Fergie said. 

“That’s crazy!” I cried. The dog tugged harder on my sweatpants. “I saw 
this on a Lassie show once!” 

“I don’t think it’s crazy, Cooper,” Fergie said. “Watch.” She stepped 
forward slowly, and the dog’s tail began to wag. “See? They want us to go with 
them!” 

I hesitated. It seemed ridiculous. 

But when I edged forward, the dog that had been tugging on my pants 
began wagging his tail, too. 

“See?” Fergie whispered. 

Sorry, but I wasn’t buying it. I turned and started to run. 

“Cooper, don’t!” Fergie cried. 

Too late. 

The big creature took off after me. Leaped high. And knocked me to the 
ground. 

When I climbed to my feet, he started tugging again. 

“Come on. Let’s see what they want,” Fergie pleaded with me. “We don’t 
have much of a choice, anyway. They’re not going to leave us alone.” 

We followed the dogs through the woods. They stayed close by, never 



getting too far ahead. And always glancing back. 

I pointed my flashlight along the path. The dim light didn’t help very much 
at all. I had no idea where we were going. All I knew was that it was very dark 
out—and we were headed deeper and deeper into the woods. 

“I hope we can find our way back, ” I muttered to myself. 

Then, without warning, the dogs sped up. Their big paws trod heavily on 
the soft ground. 

A few seconds later, they began barking and scratching wildly at something 
between the trees. 

I lifted my flashlight and aimed it in their direction. 

In the center of a small clearing stood a broken-down wooden shack. The 
dogs clawed at the door. When they had pushed it open, they came back for us. 
They began tugging again, pulling us toward the shack. 

“Wha—what is this place?” I cried. “Where are we?” 

“I don’t know,” Fergie whispered. “I’ve never seen this shack before.” 

The dogs tugged—furiously now. They really wanted us to go in there. 

“What can be inside?” I whispered to Fergie. 

Fergie swallowed hard. “I don’t know,” she whispered back. “But I think 
we’re going to find out!” 



24 


“Fergie, I don’t like this,” I whispered. “Let’s get away from here—fast!” 

I felt the dog clamp its jaw tighter on my ankle. 

Had he understood what I’d said? 

“They’re not going to let us get away,” Fergie said softly. 

Snarling and growling, the dogs backed us up against the door to the shack. 
“Whoa!” I cried out as the dogs leaped at the side of the shack. 

“I don’t believe it!” Fergie screamed. 

The dogs jumped right through the wooden wall. They disappeared inside. 
“That’s impossible!” Fergie cried. 

“Tell that to the dogs,” I murmured. 

I had seen them do it before—in my own kitchen. 

“They’re ghosts or something!” Fergie cried. 

I grabbed her arm. “Let’s get out of here! Whatever happens... we can’t go 
in that shack!” 

We’d taken only a few steps when the dogs came tearing out through the 
shack wall. 

They edged in close, pressing us up against the shack again. Before we 
could struggle or try to get away, the dogs rose up on their hind legs. 

Standing up, they were taller than us! Fergie and I exchanged terrified 
glances. 

The dogs staggered forward. Pressed their front paws against our chests. 
And shoved us backwards into the shack. 

We screamed as we started to fall. 

The shack had no floor. 

We fell, hurtling down. Tumbling as we fell. 

Down, down, down. 

Into a deep, black hole. 

A deep, black hole that didn’t seem to end. 



25 


I landed softly on my feet. I didn’t even feel it. 

Had we fallen into some kind of well? Or a tunnel dug deep under the 
shack? 

I couldn’t tell. 

I took a deep breath and gazed around the heavy blackness. “Fergie—are 
you okay?” I called. My voice came out tiny and shrill. 

“I—I guess,” she replied after a few seconds. “Cooper— look!” 

I started to reply that it was too dark to see anything. But then I glimpsed 
the two pairs of red eyes, glaring at us through the darkness. 

I gasped. 

“Don ’t move! ” instructed a dry whisper of a voice. 

“Who are you?” I managed to choke out. “What do you want?” 

“Why did you dogs bring us here?” Fergie demanded. 

“We are not dogs,” the voice growled. “We are people.” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. 

“Silence!” the voice commanded. “Silence while you are in the Changing 
Room.” 

“The what?” I cried. 

The red eyes flared. 

“Centuries ago, my friend and I had an evil spell cast upon us,” the voice 
continued, ignoring my question. “The spell forced us to roam these woods as 
dogs. Ghost dogs.” 

“Too bad,” I muttered. “But what do you want us for?” 

The dogs snickered. It sounded more like dry coughing than laughter. 

“You are in the Changing Room,” the voice told us. “For nearly a hundred 
years, we have tried to get two people in here. And now we have succeeded.” 

“And—?” I demanded. 

“We’re going to change places with you,” the voice said casually. 

“Excuse me?” Fergie cried. “You’re going to what?” 

“We will take your places,” the voice repeated. “And you shall take ours. 
You will be the ghost dogs. You will roam these woods as we did—forever!” 



“No way!” I cried. I wanted to run. 

But where? 

I was surrounded by heavy blackness on all sides. 

“Fergie—” I started. 

But I heard her gasp. And then I began to feel warm. As if someone had 
covered me with a heavy blanket. 

The warmth swept over my body. 

Simmering heat. As if I were in an oven. 

Warmer. Warmer. Until sweat dripped down my face, and I was panting in 
the heat. 

I can’t stand it anymore! I thought. I’m going to melt! 

I opened my mouth to scream. But the sounds that escaped my throat 
weren’t mine. 

In fact, they didn’t sound human at all. 



26 


I opened my eyes to bright sunshine. 

The woods around me appeared fuzzy. I struggled to focus. 

I yawned. Then I stretched my entire body and shook myself awake. 

Yes! That stretch felt good. 

I sniffed the air and shook myself again. Wow! Something smelled 
delicious. 

My stomach growled. I suddenly realized I must be starving. 

Still trying to focus, I took two steps and fell on my face. 

I stood again, feeling unsteady. What’s wrong? I wondered. 

I gazed around the woods. Why were the trees suddenly all black and 
white? Why was the sky gray? The grass gray? 

What had happened to all the color? 

Was this a dream? 

I heard a gruff sound behind me. Someone clearing his throat. 

I turned—and saw a black Labrador. 

I started to cry out—but hoarse barks escaped my throat. 

Startled, I glanced down at my own body. My own fur-covered body. 
“Ohhhh.” I dug my front paws into the dirt. I shook myself hard, trying to shake 
the dog body off. Trying to shake it away so I could see my real body. Cooper’s 
body. 

And as I shook, I jerked my head back. And saw a long, black tail! 

My tail! 

I let out a startled yip. I’m a dog, too, I realized. 

The ghosts in the Changing Room weren’t kidding around. They changed 
places with us. Fergie and I are dogs. 

Fergie whimpered. 

Trembling, we both began to trot, our tails hanging between our legs. 
Fergie’s whimpers turned into mournful howls. 

What was that? Strange! I thought Fergie said something. 

“I did say something,” she insisted. “Well, actually, I thought something. I 
think we can read each other’s thoughts, Cooper.” 



Okay, Fergie, then what am I thinking now? 

“You’re thinking of that leftover fried liver from last night that your mom 
put in the fridge,” Fergie thought. 

That’s right! 

We could read each other’s mind! Cool! 

I licked my lips a few times, thinking about the liver. I loved liver so much, 
Mom made it for me once a week. Man, did I want that liver now! 

Then I remembered I had other things to worry about. 

“Fergie, what are we going to do? We’re dogs!” 

“I can see that, Cooper,” she replied, swatting a fly from behind her floppy, 
black ear. 

“Well, we’ve got to do something!” I cried. “We can’t trot around like this 
forever. Those ghost dogs stole our bodies! They’re probably fooling my parents 
this very minute!” 

Fergie didn’t reply. Instead, she ran around in circles, chasing her tail. 
“Hey! This is fun!” 

“Fergie! Quit messing around! We’re in major trouble!” 

“Okay, okay! I’m sorry! I’m upset about this, too, you know!” 

Fergie dropped to the dirt. She buried her snout in her front paws. Deep in 
thought. “You know what, Cooper?” 

“What?” I asked as I paced back and forth, trying to think of a way to get us 
out of this mess. 

“Your droopy ears look pretty good—now that you’re a dog.” 

“Fergie! Get serious!” I growled. 

Then it hit me. 

“I know!” I cried. “I know what we can do. We have to drag those ghosts 
back to the shack and trade places with them again!” 

“Oh, sure, Cooper. No problem,” Fergie barked. “And how do you suppose 
we do that? Walk up to them and say, ‘Uh, excuse me, but can you come back to 
the shack with us? It’ll only be for a second.’” 

I stared at Fergie. She had become a dog. But her personality hadn’t 
changed one bit! 

“I heard that,” she mumbled. 

I sighed. “Well, do you have a better plan?” I asked, scratching furiously at 
my neck. 

“I’m thinking, I’m thinking,” Fergie answered with a yawn. “I’m really so 



tired. Maybe after a nap—” 

“No! No naps! We have to do something—now! Listen to me. We’ll get my 
parents to help. All we have to do is convince them that we’re the real Cooper 
and Margaret, and that those kids in the house are imposters.” 

“And how are we going to do that?” Fergie asked. 

Good question. Real good question. 



27 


Fergie and I trotted through the woods. I sniffed the ground. Sniffed the weeds. 
So many great smells! 

We stopped at the edge of the woods behind my house. I heard laughing, 
shouting voices. Then I saw my parents. In the backyard. Throwing a Frisbee 
around with Fergie and Cooper! 

Those fakes! 

I growled with anger. 

I bared my teeth. Prepared to attack. 

“Whoa!” Fergie cried. “Cooper, wait! You can’t just barge over there and 
attack them!” 

Fergie was right. That wouldn’t solve anything. 

I watched my dad send the Frisbee flying across the yard. 

I had a strong urge to jump up and go for that Frisbee. 

But I stopped myself. This was no time for playing. 

Then I had an idea. The greatest idea. The idea of a lifetime. 

“Come on!” I urged Fergie. I began loping toward the side of my house. 

“Cooper, where are you going?” she asked. 

I didn’t answer. I stopped outside the wall to Mickey’s room. “This will just 
take a second,” I told Fergie. 

She read my mind. She knew what I planned to do. 

Side by side, we leaped through the wall of the house. 

And burst into Mickey’s room. 

He was standing in his underwear. Leaning over his dresser, sorting out his 
T-shirts. He cried out and spun around as Fergie and I started to growl. 

My brother uttered a short, terrified whimper. He started backing up, his 
eyes wide with fright. 

Fergie and I began barking and jumping up on our hind legs. 

“How—how did you—?” Mickey stammered. 

Those were the only words he could choke out. 

Then he let out another whimper, stumbled past us, and bolted out through 
the bedroom door. “Mommy! Daddy! Help!” I heard him scream. “Mommy! 



Daddy!” 

Fergie and I didn’t want to miss seeing him run through the yard in his 
underwear. We trotted through the wall and watched until he disappeared around 
the garage. 

“Did you see his face?” I yelped happily. “Was that awesome?!” 

“Man, that was excellent!” Fergie cheered. 

“Hey, you two!” a stern voice called. 

I turned around. 

Dad! 

“How did you dogs get in this yard?” my father demanded sharply. “Come 
on. Out! Out!” 

“But, wait! Dad! It’s me, Cooper!” I tried to yell. But all that came out was 
Woof! Woof! Woof! 

“Out! Out!” Dad repeated angrily. 

“Dad! Wait! It’s really me! Listen! You’ve got to listen!” 

“Woof! Woof! Woof, woof, woof! Woof! Woof, woof, woof, woof!” 

My father armed himself with a broom and waved it wildly at Fergie and 
me. ♦Out!^ he cried, shaking the broom at us. 

“What’s going on?” Mom called from the doorway. 

“Mom! It’s me. Cooper!” I barked furiously. 

“Oh, Sam. Please get rid of those animals! You know I’m allergic to dogs!” 

“But, Mom!” I cried. “Can’t you tell it’s me?” 

Woof, woof! Woof, woof, woof, woof, woof! 

“Please, Sam! Call the pound! These dogs look dangerous. They might 
have to be put to sleep! Call the pound. They’ll know what to do.” 

I watched in horror as my dad picked up the phone and dialed. 



28 


Fergie and I bolted into the woods as fast as we could. Even as a dog, Fergie ran 
faster than I did. 

We hid among the trees and watched my parents and the fake Cooper and 
Fergie toss the Frisbee around in the backyard. 

The guys from the pound never showed up. But things still looked pretty 
bad. My parents thought we were stray dogs. And I couldn’t tell them who I was. 

All I could do was bark. 

Hey. Wait a minute. Maybe I could do more than bark. 

“Fergie, I have another idea!” I said, wagging my tail. “Follow me!” 

Fergie and I sneaked around the side of the house and stepped through the 
wall into the living room. I sniffed around, searching for a pen and some paper. 

“I’ll write them a note,” I explained to Fergie. “Mom will definitely 
recognize my handwriting.” 

I found a pen lying on the coffee table, next to some notepaper. 

I tried to lift the pen. 

It slipped out from under my paw. I couldn’t wrap my paw around it. 

Fergie tried to help me. She nosed the pen in my direction, but I still 
couldn’t pick it up. 

Impossible. Dogs can’t hold pens. 

I felt so disappointed. I pushed the pen away, then ripped the paper to 
shreds. That’s when my dad burst in. 

“Hey! I thought I told you two dogs to beat it!” my father yelled. 

My mother and the two phonies came running into the room. 

I started barking, trying to communicate with Dad. But that seemed to 
annoy him even more. 

“Stand up on your hind legs!” I instructed Fergie. “Maybe he’ll think we’re 
trying to tell him something!” 

I hopped up, trying to balance on my back legs. But I wasn’t very good at it. 
I mean, give me a break. I’d only been a dog for a few hours. 

I toppled over onto my stomach. 

I must have looked pretty stupid, because everyone started laughing. 



“Weird dogs,” the Cooper imposter said. 

Fergie and I hopped up again and again. But nobody understood what we 
were doing. And after a while, they grew bored with our little act. Dad picked up 
the broom again. 

I probably could have yanked that stupid broom right out of his hands and 
pinned him to the ground. But what would that prove? 

Dad chased Fergie and me out the back door and into the woods. 

“You’re right,” I told her when we were safely hidden by the trees. “We’re 
going to be dogs for the rest of our lives. And not even real dogs. Ghost dogs.” 

“Don’t worry, Cooper,” Fergie replied, reading my mind. “We’ll convince 
them. There’s got to be a way to show them who we are.” 

I sighed, then rolled on to my back. 

If only Gary and Todd were here. They’d know what to do. 

I rolled back again. And, suddenly, I felt hot. Burning hot. I sprang up on all 
fours. 

“What is it?” Fergie cried out. “What’s wrong?” 

I shook violently from head to tail. Out of control. I couldn’t stop shaking. 
Something had taken over my body. 



29 


“Fleas!” I shrieked. 

There must have been thousands of them! Clinging all over my body! And I 
couldn’t reach them. 

“My back!” I cried helplessly. “My back!” 

Fergie lifted her front paws and scratched the part of my back I couldn’t 
reach. 

“Higher,” I pleaded. “Higher. Aaaaahhhhh, that’s it!” 

My ears drooped low, and I sighed with relief. 

Fergie found us a nice spot under a tall birch tree. I stretched out my body 
and rested my face on my paws. Fergie curled up into a tight ball. It was time to 
think up another plan. 

And time to nap. I couldn’t believe how tired I’d suddenly become. 

The day passed slowly. I think we both dozed off once or twice. 

Around lunchtime, we ran to the stream in the woods for water. Some fleas 
still nipped at my skin. And I thought a cool dip in the stream might help. 

We returned to our spot under the shady birch. Now we were both starving. 

“Maybe we can find some scraps of food at my house—in the garbage,” I 
suggested. 

“Yuck! I’m not eating garbage,” Fergie wailed. “No way.” But she knew we 
had no choice. 

We returned to my house and quietly made our way to the side door, where 
Dad stored the garbage pails. 

As we sniffed around for some food, Mickey and my parents opened the 
back door and stepped out into the yard. 

“I’m telling you, Mom!” Mickey cried. “They’re ghost dogs! They walked 
right through my bedroom wall! They’re not normal!” 

“Save your jokes for Cooper,” my father snapped. 

“Hey, Fergie, maybe Mickey can help us,” I suggested, watching my 
brother. “He’s the only one who believes we’re not normal dogs. Maybe we can 
find a way to tell him who we are.” 

Fergie sighed. “For sure,” she said sarcastically. “Then what? Can you see 
your parents’ faces when Mickey tells them the two dogs hanging around their 



house are really Cooper and Margaret Ferguson?” 

I hung my head. Fergie was right. They’d never believe Mickey, either. 

“Well, we have to do something!” I said, scratching behind my ear. “These 
fleas are driving me crazy! I can’t live like this!” 

“Maybe we can get you a flea collar,” Fergie suggested. 

“Oh, right. I’ll just trot into the Main Street drugstore, put five dollars on 
the counter, and ask for a flea collar. Nobody will think that’s weird.” I rolled my 
eyes. 

Fergie snapped at me. “Well, excuse me, Cooper. I was only trying to help!” 

Fergie and I spent the rest of the day snapping at each other, getting on each 
other’s nerves. 

When dinnertime rolled around, my stomach rumbled loudly. Then I 
smelled the most wonderful smell. 

I raised my nose high in the air and sniffed excitedly. 

I’d know that aroma anywhere. 

Liver! The leftover liver from last night! 

“Come on!” I barked to Fergie. “I’ve got to get some of that liver!” 

We trotted over to the back door and peered inside. My whole family had 
gathered around the table, ready to eat. 

“You’re drooling,” Fergie said to me in disgust. “Gross.” 

Like I cared. 

I couldn’t take my eyes off the plate of liver Mom carried to the table. I 
watched hungrily as she placed a big slab on my father’s plate. 

Then she served some to Mickey. Mickey seemed edgy, nervous. I hoped he 
was still upset from my little trick this morning. 

Then Mom placed a piece of liver on the phony Cooper’s plate. He jumped 
from his seat. “Yuck!” he cried out in disgust. “I hate liver!” 

Mom’s jaw dropped. “Cooper! What are you saying? You love liver!” 

The phony Cooper began to stutter. 

“Oh, uh, did I say I hated it? Oh, no. I’m, uh, just joking, Mom. I love liver. 
Everyone knows that!” 

Mom stared at him suspiciously. “Really, Cooper. You haven’t been 
yourself all day!” 

My eyes widened. 

This was my chance! 

Now was the perfect time to show Mom he wasn’t himself! He was a total 



phony! 

“I’m going in!” I told Fergie. 

I burst through the kitchen door and headed straight for the plate of liver. 
I’ll show Mom who the real Cooper is, I thought happily. The Cooper who loves 
liver. She’ll know it’s me instantly! 

This has got to work. 

It’s our last chance, I knew. Our only chance. 



30 


Panting excitedly, I charged into the kitchen and leaped up at the table. 

Mom screamed and dropped the plate of liver on the floor. 

In a flash, I bent down and began lapping it up. Delicious! 

“See, Mom? Look, it’s me! Your son, Cooper!” I yelped in between bites. 

“Sam! Do something! That animal is eating our dinner!” 

Huh? Animal? “No, Mom! It’s me! Your son! Look, I love liver!” 

But it was no use. 

All Mom heard was, “Woof, woof! Woof, woof! Woof, woof! Woof, woof, 
woof, woof! ” 

Dad shoved his chair away from the table and grabbed a newspaper from 
the counter. He rolled it up, then swatted my nose. 

“Ow!” 

That hurt! 

“I’ll see if the line to the pound is still busy,” Mom said, picking up the 
phone. “Try to chase the dogs into the pantry and lock the door. We’ll hold them 
in there until the pound can come get them.” 

The fake Cooper and Margaret helped Dad back us toward the pantry. “Bad 
dogs! Bad!” the phony Margaret shouted. 

“Dad, do you think the pound will use a tranquilizer gun on them?” the 
phony Cooper asked. 

“Maybe,” Dad replied. 

I glanced over at Fergie. 

Tranquilizer guns? No thank you! 

I never ran so fast in all my life. I even ran faster than Fergie. 

“Got any other bright ideas, fleabag?” she asked when we were safely in the 
woods. 

I growled at her and turned away. The sun was setting over the trees. The 
air felt cool. It would be dark soon. 

“And thanks for saving some of that liver for me,” Fergie snapped. “I’m 
hungry, too, you know!” 



I ignored her. 

I gazed longingly through the trees. Through the window of my house as 
Mom and Dad washed the dishes. 

I couldn’t help myself. I felt so bad. I started whimpering. 

If only I could be inside my warm, comfortable house right now. In a short 
while, it would be dark. I didn’t want to spend a night in the woods. 

Think, Cooper! Think! I urged myself. There must be a way to get our 
human bodies back. 

“Whoa! Wait a minute!” I cried. “I just thought of something!” 

Fergie awoke from a nap. “What?” she asked lazily. 

“We’re dogs, right?” 

“Right.” 

“So we should act like dogs!” 

Fergie narrowed her eyes. “Cooper, what are you talking about?” 

I took a deep breath. “Okay, listen,” I explained. “Remember how those 
ghost dogs got us out to the shack?” 

Fergie nodded. 

“That’s what we should do! We should pull those kids back there, the way 
they pulled us! That’s what dogs would do!” 

Fergie raised her head. Her ears perked up. “Not bad! Not bad at all!” 

“We’re dogs,” I continued. “We have sharp teeth, right? Very sharp teeth. 
We’ll drag them into the woods and into the Changing Room—and before you 
know it, we’ll be Cooper and Fergie again!” 

Fergie bounced up and began panting happily and wagging her tail. 
“Excellent!” she cried. 

“Okay, here’s the plan.” With my paw, I drew a diagram in the dirt. “The 
phonies are here, in the den. We’ll walk through the wall and haul them out 
through the kitchen door. It’s okay if Mom and Dad follow. We can outrun 
them.” 

“I’m ready. Let’s do it!” Fergie exclaimed. 

We trotted to the house and pushed through the wall, as planned. 

Inside, the fake Cooper and Fergie were watching MTV on the den TV. We 
burst through the den wall and surprised them. 

“Mom!” the fake Cooper screamed at the top of his lungs. “Dad! Help! It’s 
the dogs!” 

Fergie and I moved in on them, snarling as ferociously as we knew how. 



I clamped on to the fake Cooper’s ankle just as my parents and Mickey 
burst into the room. I motioned to Fergie to get on with it. In a flash, she leaped 
on to the phony Fergie and clamped her jaws around her wrist. 

Then we tugged. 

“Mom! Dad! Help!” the phony Cooper yelled. 

“Mr. Holmes!” the phony Fergie cried. “Do something! They’re attacking 

us!” 

Mom ran for the broom. But before Dad could swing into action, Fergie and 
I had dragged the imposters through the kitchen. 

I caught a glimpse of Mickey as I tugged. He was hiding in the corner, 
shaking all over. 

Too bad I didn’t have time to enjoy that picture. 

We were out the door now. Everything was working perfectly. Fergie and I 
would be back to normal in no time. 

The phonies knew where we were taking them. But there was nothing they 
could do about it. Fergie and I were too strong, too ferocious. 

“Dad! Help!” the fake Cooper cried again. 

“Don’t worry!” Dad called out to him. “The dogs don’t seem to want to hurt 
you! I think they want us to follow them!” 

Way to go, Dad! 

A short while later, I spotted the clearing where the old shack stood. It 
won’t be long now, I thought happily. In a few minutes, Fergie and I will walk 
home with my parents. On two legs. No more fleas. No more food from garbage 
pails. I couldn’t wait! 

We panted wildly as the struggling imposters attempted to break free. But 
Fergie and I held on to them for dear life, tugging them, tugging with all our 
canine strength. 

And, then, finally, we were there. The old shack. We pushed the phonies up 
against the door. 

I released the fake Cooper from my grip for a second. I had no choice. I had 
to scratch a flea. 

The phony tried to make a run for it. 

“Cooper! He’s getting away!” Fergie barked. 

“No way!” I barked back. I bounded off after him and clamped my jaws 
down on the hem of his shirt. Then I dragged him back to the shack. 

The fake Fergie screamed with all her might. “No! No! Not in there again!” 



I glared up at her. 

“Hold on, Margaret,” I heard Mom call. “Don’t be afraid. Let’s see what the 
dogs are trying to show us.” 

It was time. Time to make the switch. 

“Now!” I yelped. 

Fergie and I jumped on the imposters and sent them tumbling into the 
shack. Then we leaped in after them. 

All four of us fell down, down, down. Down into the solid blackness. 

Once again, I felt dizzy and warm. 

Warmer. Warmer. As if the warm blanket were being pulled over me. 

I could feel myself changing. Changing in the darkness, in the sweltering 

heat. 

I gazed above my head. A glowing shadow hovered over me. A shadow 
with tiny red eyes. 

My body shuddered. I began to shake. 

And all at once I knew. Something wasn’t right. 

“Fergie!” I cried out in a harsh whisper. “It’s not working! Something is 
wrong! Something is very wrong!” 



31 


“Cooper!” my mom cried happily, running toward the shack with outstretched 
arms. “Are you okay?” 

“Margaret, what happened in there?” Dad called. “What happened to the 
dogs?” 

“We’re okay,” Margaret muttered. “It’s just an empty shack. That’s all.” 

“I’m going to call the pound again as soon as we get home,” Mom 
announced. “Those dogs shouldn’t be allowed to roam free. They’re dangerous!” 

“Let’s just get out of here, okay, Dad?” Cooper said. 

Fergie nodded in agreement. “We’re okay, Let’s go home.” 

“What an adventure!” Mom sighed. 

“At least it isn’t boring up here in our new home,” Dad added. 

“For sure,” Cooper agreed. 


* * * 


“What happened?” I asked, rubbing my eyes. 

I watched my parents walking away from the shack, their arms around two 

kids. 

“Hey! Those kids!” I cried. “They’re not us!” 

The door to the shack opened, and two black Labs stumbled out in a daze. 
Their eyes met, then they bolted away, barking frantically. 

What’s their problem? I wondered. 

I watched the dogs disappear into the trees. 

What’s going on? I asked myself, totally confused. 

I’m not a kid—and I’m not a dog, either! 

“Hey, Fergie? Fergie?” 

Where was she? 

When she popped up next to me, we both gasped. 

“Oh, no! Please—no! No! No! Noooo!” she wailed. 

Her head cocked to one side, and her little brown nose twitched furiously. 
“Tell me we’re not!” I begged her. “Please, Fergie—tell me we’re not...” 



“We are!” Fergie squeaked. “We... we’re chipmunks !” 

We both squeaked and chittered our surprise. 

Fergie gazed down at her furry little body. “How did this happen, Cooper? 
How did this happen?” 

“The woods are filled with chipmunks,” I sighed. “Two of them must have 
wandered into the Changing Room. And we—” 

“We switched with the chipmunks—not the kids!” Fergie cried. Her bushy 
tail thumped furiously on the ground. 

I examined my tiny black paws. I moved my teeny little fingers. I twitched 
my button nose. 

Cute. I was so cute! 

“Now what?” Fergie wailed. “What do we do now?” 

“Uh... hunt for acorns?” I suggested. 

Fergie’s beady little eyes squinted into mine. “Excuse me?” 

“Let’s hunt for acorns!” I said. “I’m starving!” 




THE HORROR AT 
CAMP JELLY JAM 

Goosebumps - 33 
R.L. Stine 


1 


Mom pointed excitedly out the car window. “Look! A cow!” 

My brother, Elliot, and I both groaned. We had been driving through 
farmland for four hours, and Mom had pointed out every single cow and horse. 

“Look out your side, Wendy!” Mom cried from the front seat. “Sheep!” 

I stared out the window and saw about a dozen gray sheep—fat, woolly 
ones—grazing on a grassy green hill. “Nice sheep, Mom,” I said, rolling my 
eyes. 

“There’s a cow!” Elliot exclaimed. 

Now he was doing it! 

I reached across the backseat and gave him a hard shove. “Mom, is it 
possible to explode from boredom?” I moaned. 

“BOOOOOOM!” Elliot shouted. The kid is a riot, isn’t he? 

“I told you,” Dad muttered to Mom. “A twelve-year-old is too old to go on 
a long car trip.” 

“So is an eleven-year-old!” Elliot protested. 

I’m twelve. Elliot is eleven. 

“How can you two be bored?” Mom asked. “Look—horses!” 

Dad sped up to pass a huge yellow truck. The road curved through high, 
sloping hills. In the far distance, I could see gray mountains, rising up in a heavy 
mist. 

“There’s so much beautiful scenery to admire,” Mom gushed. 

“After a while, it all looks like some boring old calendar,” I complained. 

Elliot pointed out of his window. “Look! No horses!” 

He doubled over, laughing. He thought that was the funniest thing anyone 
had ever said. Elliot really cracks himself up. 

Mom turned in the front seat. She narrowed her eyes at my brother. “Are 
you making fun of me?” she demanded. 

“Yes!” Elliot replied. 

“Of course not,” I chimed in. “Who would ever make fun of you, Mom?” 

“When do you ever stop?” Mom complained. 

“We’re leaving Idaho,” Dad announced. “That’s Wyoming up ahead. We’ll 



be up in those mountains soon.” 

“Maybe we’ll see Mountain Cows!” I exclaimed sarcastically. 

Elliot laughed. 

Mom sighed. “Go ahead. Ruin our first family vacation in three years.” 

We hit a bump. I heard the trailer bounce behind us. Dad had hooked one of 
those big, old-fashioned trailers to the back of our car. We had dragged it all over 
the West. 

The trailer was actually kind of fun. It had four narrow beds built into the 
sides. And it had a table we could sit around to eat or play cards. It even had a 
small kitchen. 

At night, we’d pull into a trailer camp. Dad would hook the trailer up to 
water and electricity. And we spent the night inside, in our own private little 
house. 

We hit another bump. I heard the trailer bounce behind us again. The car 
lurched forward as we started to climb into the mountains. 

“Mom, how do I know if I’m getting carsick or not?” Elliot asked. 

Mom turned back to us, frowning. “Elliot, you never get carsick,” she said 
in a low voice. “Did you forget?” 

“Oh. Right,” Elliot replied. “I just thought it might be something to do.” 

“Elliot!” Mom screamed. “If you’re so bored, take a nap!” 

“That’s boring,” my brother muttered. 

I could see Mom’s face turning an angry red. Mom doesn’t look like Dad, 
Elliot, and me. She is blond and has blue eyes and very fair skin, which turns red 
very easily. And she’s kind of plump. 

My dad, brother, and I are skinny and sort of dark. The three of us have 
brown hair and brown eyes. 

“You kids don’t know how lucky you are,” Dad said. “You’re getting to see 
some amazing sights.” 

“Bobby Harrison got to go to baseball camp,” Elliot grumbled. “And Jay 
Thurman went to sleepaway camp for eight weeks!” 

“I wanted to go to sleepaway camp, too!” I protested. 

“You’ll go to camp next summer,” Mom replied sharply. “This is the chance 
of a lifetime!” 

“But the chance of a lifetime is so boring!” Elliot complained. 

“Wendy, entertain your brother,” Dad ordered. 

“Excuse me?” I cried. “How am I supposed to entertain him?” 



“Play Car Geography,” Mom suggested. 

“Oh, no! Not again!” Elliot wailed. 

“Go ahead. I’ll start,” Mom said. “Atlanta.” 

Atlanta ends with an A. So I had to think of a city that starts with an A. 
“Albany,” I said. “Your turn, Elliot.” 

“Hmmmmm. A city that starts with a Y...” My brother thought for a 
moment. Then he twisted up his face. “I quit!” 

My brother is such a bad sport. He takes games too seriously, and he really 
hates to lose. Sometimes he gets so intense when he’s playing soccer or softball, 
I really worry about him. 

Sometimes when he thinks he can’t win, he just quits. Like now. 

“What about Youngstown?” Mom asked. 

“What about it?” Elliot grumbled. 

“I have an idea!” I said. “How about letting Elliot and me ride in the trailer 
for a while?” 

“Yeah! Cool!” Elliot cried. 

“I don’t think so,” Mom replied. She turned to Dad. “It’s against the law to 
ride in a trailer, isn’t it?” 

“I don’t know,” Dad said, slowing the car. We were climbing through thick 
pine woods now. The air smelled so fresh and sweet. 

“Let us!” Elliot pleaded. “Come on—let us!” 

“I don’t see any harm in letting them ride back there for a while,” Dad told 
Mom. “As long as they’re careful.” 

“We’ll be careful!” Elliot promised. 

“Are you sure it’s safe?” Mom asked Dad. 

Dad nodded. “What could happen?” 

He pulled the car to the side of the highway. Elliot and I slid out. We ran to 
the trailer, pulled open the door, and hurried inside. 

A few seconds later, the car pulled back onto the highway. We bounced 
along behind it in the big trailer. 

“This is so cool!” Elliot declared, making his way to the back window. 

“Do I have good ideas or what?” I asked, following him. He slapped me a 
high five. 

We stared out the back window. The highway seemed to tilt down as we 
headed up to the mountains. 

The trailer bounced and swayed as the car tugged it. 



The road tilted up steeper. And steeper. 
And that’s when all our troubles began. 



2 


“I win!” Elliot cried. He jumped up and raised both fists in triumph. 

“Three out of five!” I demanded, rubbing my wrist. “Come on—three out of 
five. Unless you’re chicken.” 

I knew that would get him. Elliot can’t stand to be called a chicken. He 
settled back in the seat. 

We leaned over the narrow table and clasped hands. We had been arm 
wrestling for about ten minutes. It was kind of fun because the table bounced 
every time the trailer rolled over a bump in the road. 

I am as strong as Elliot. But he’s more determined. A lot more determined. 
You never saw anyone groan and sweat and strain so much in arm wrestling! 

To me, a game is just a game. But to Elliot, every game is life or death. 

He had won two out of three about five times. 

My wrist was sore, and my hand ached. But I really wanted to beat him in 
this final match. 

I leaned over the table and squeezed his hand harder. I gritted my teeth and 
stared menacingly into his dark brown eyes. 

“Go!” he cried. 

We both strained against each other. I pushed hard. Elliot’s hand started to 
bend back. 

I pushed harder. I nearly had him. Just a little harder. 

He let out a groan and pushed back. He shut his eyes. His face turned beet- 
red. I could see the veins push out at the sides of his neck. 

My brother just can’t stand to lose. 

SLAM! 

The back of my hand hit the table hard. 

Elliot had won again. 

Actually, I let him win. I didn’t want to see his whole head explode because 
of a stupid arm-wrestling match. 

He jumped up and pumped his fists, cheering for himself. 

“Hey—!” he cried out as the trailer swayed hard, and he went crashing into 
the wall. 



The trailer lurched again. I grabbed the table to keep from falling off my 
seat. “What’s going on?” 

“We changed direction. We’re heading down now,” Elliot replied. He edged 
his way back toward the table. 

But we bumped hard, and he toppled to the floor. “Hey—we’re going 
backwards!” 

“I’ll bet Mom’s driving,” I said, holding on to the table edge with both 
hands. 

Mom always drives like a crazy person. When you warn her that she’s 
going eighty, she always says, “That can’t be right. It feels as if I’m going thirty- 
five!” 

The trailer was bouncing and bumping, rolling downhill. Elliot and I were 
bouncing and bumping with the trailer. 

“What is their problem?” Elliot cried, grabbing on to one of the beds, 
struggling to keep his balance. “Are they backing up? Why are we going 
backwards?” 

The trailer roared downhill. I pushed myself up from the table and stumbled 
to the front to see the car. Shoving aside the red plaid curtain, I peered out 
through the small window. 

“Uh... Elliot...” I choked out. “We’ve got a problem.” 

“Huh? A problem?” he replied, bouncing harder as the trailer picked up 
speed. 

“Mom and Dad aren’t pulling us anymore,” I told him. “The car is gone.” 



3 


Elliot’s face filled with confusion. He didn’t understand me. Or maybe he didn’t 
believe me! 

“The trailer has come loose!” I screamed, staring out the bouncing window. 
“We’re rolling downhill—on our own!” 

“N-n-n-no!” Elliot chattered. He wasn’t stuttering. He was bouncing so 
hard, he could barely speak. His sneakers hopped so hard on the trailer floor, he 
seemed to be tap dancing. 

“OW!” I let out a pained shriek as my head bounced against the ceiling. 
Elliot and I stumbled to the back. Gripping the windowsill tightly, I struggled to 
see where we were heading. 

The road curved steeply downhill, through thick pine woods on both sides. 
The trees were a bouncing blur of greens and browns as we hurtled past. 

Picking up speed. Bouncing and tumbling. 

Faster. 

Faster. 

The tires roared beneath us. The trailer tilted and dipped. 

I fell to the floor. Landed hard on my knees. Reached to pull myself up. But 
the trailer swayed, and I went sprawling on my back. 

Pulling myself to my knees, I saw Elliot bouncing around on the floor like a 
soccer ball. I threw myself at the back of the trailer and peered out the window. 

The trailer bumped hard. The road curved sharply—but we didn’t curve 
with it! 

We shot off the side of the road. Swerved into the trees. 

“Elliot!” I shrieked. “We’re going to crash!” 



4 


The trailer jolted hard. I heard a cracking sound. 

It’s going to break in half! I thought. 

I pressed both hands against the front and stared out the window. Dark trees 
flew past. 

A hard bump sent me sprawling to the floor. 

I heard Elliot calling my name. “Wendy! Wendy! Wendy!” 

I shut my eyes and tensed every muscle. And waited for the crash. 

Waited... 

Waited... 

Silence. 

I opened my eyes. It took me a few seconds to realize that we were no 
longer moving. I took a deep breath and climbed to my feet. 

“Wendy?” I heard Elliot’s weak cry from the back of the trailer. 

My legs were trembling as I turned around. My whole body felt weird. As if 
we were still bouncing. “Elliot—are you okay?” 

He had been thrown into one of the bottom bunks. “Yeah. I guess,” he 
replied. He lowered his feet to the floor and shook his head. “I’m kind of dizzy.” 

“Me, too,” I confessed. “What a ride!” 

“Better than Space Mountain!” Elliot exclaimed. He climbed to his feet. 
“Let’s get out of this thing!” 

We both started to the door at the front. It was an uphill climb. The trailer 
tilted up. 

I reached the door first. I grabbed the handle. 

A loud knock on the door made me jump back. “Hey... !” I cried. 

Three more knocks. 

“It’s Mom and Dad!” Elliot cried. “They found us! Open it up! Hurry!” 

He didn’t have to tell me to hurry. My heart skipped. I was so glad to see 
them! 

I turned the handle, pushed open the trailer door— 

—and gasped. 



5 


I stared into the face of a blond-haired man. His blue eyes sparkled in the bright 
sunlight. 

He was dressed all in white. He wore a crisp white T-shirt tucked into 
baggy white shorts. A small round button pinned to his T-shirt read ONLY THE 
BEST in bold black letters. 

“Uh... hi,” I finally managed to choke out. 

He flashed me a gleaming smile. He seemed to have about two thousand 
teeth. “Hey, guys—everyone okay in there?” he asked. His blue eyes sparkled 
even brighter. 

“Yeah. We’re okay,” I told him. “A little shaken up, but—” 

“Who are you?” Elliot cried, poking his head out the door. 

The guy’s smile didn’t fade. “My name is Buddy.” 

“I’m Wendy. He’s Elliot. We thought you were our parents,” I explained. I 
hopped down to the ground. 

Elliot followed me. “Where are Mom and Dad?” he asked, frowning. 

“I haven’t seen anyone, guy,” Buddy told him. He studied the trailer. “What 
happened here? You came unhitched?” 

I nodded, brushing my dark hair off my face. “Yeah. On the steep hills, I 
guess.” 

“Dangerous,” Buddy muttered. “You must have been really scared.” 

“Not me!” Elliot declared. 

What a kid. First, he’s shaking in terror and calling out my name over and 
over. Now he’s Mister Macho. 

“I’ve never been so scared in all my life!” I admitted. 

I took a few steps away from the trailer and searched the woods. The trees 
creaked and swayed in a light breeze. The sun beamed down brightly. I shielded 
my eyes with one hand as I peered around. 

No sign of Mom and Dad. I couldn’t see the highway through the thick 
trees. 

I could see the tire tracks our trailer had made through the soft dirt. 
Somehow we had shot through a clear path between the trees. The trailer had 
come to rest at the foot of a sharp, sloping hill. 



“Wow. We were lucky,” I muttered. 

“You’re very lucky,” Buddy declared cheerfully. He stepped up beside me, 
placed his hands on my shoulders, and turned me around. “Check it out. Look 
where you guys landed!” 

Gazing up the hill, I saw a wide clearing between the trees. And then I saw 
a huge, red-and-white banner, stretched high on two poles. I had to squint to read 
the words on the banner. 

Elliot read them aloud: “King Jellyjam’s Sports Camp.” 

“The, camp is on the other side of the hill,” Buddy told us, flashing us both 
a friendly smile. “Come on! Follow me!” 

“But—but—” my brother sputtered. “We have to find our parents!” 

“Hey—no problem, guy. You can wait for them at the camp,” Buddy 
assured him. 

“But how will they know where to find us?” I protested. “Should we leave a 
note?” 

Buddy flashed me another dazzling smile. “No. I’ll take care of it,” he told 
me. “No problem.” 

He stepped past the trailer and started up the hill. His white T-shirt and 
white shorts gleamed in the sunlight. I saw that his socks and high-tops were 
sparkling white, too. 

That’s his uniform. He must work at the camp, I decided. 

Buddy turned back. “You guys coming?” He motioned with both hands. 
“Come on. You’re going to like it!” 

Elliot and I hurried to catch up to him. My legs trembled as I ran. I could 
still feel the trailer floor bouncing and jolting beneath me. I wondered if I would 
ever feel normal again. 

As we made our way up the grassy hill, the red-and-white banner came into 
clearer view. “King Jellyjam’s Sports Camp,” I read the words aloud. 

A funny, purple cartoon character had been drawn beside the words on the 
banner. He looked like a blob of grape bubble gum. He had a big smile on his 
face. He wore a gold crown on his head. 

“Who’s that?” I asked Buddy. 

Buddy glanced up at the banner. “That’s King Jellyjam,” he replied. “He’s 
our little mascot.” 

“Weird-looking mascot for a sports camp,” I declared, staring up at the 
purple, blobby king. 



Buddy didn’t reply. 

“Do you work at the camp?” Elliot asked. 

Buddy nodded. “It’s a great place to work. I’m the head counselor, guys. So 
—welcome!” 

“But we can’t go to your camp,” I protested. “We have to find our parents. 
We have to...” 

Buddy put a hand on my shoulder and a hand on Elliot’s shoulder. He 
guided us up the hill. “You guys have had a close call. You might as well stay 
and have some fun. Enjoy the camp. Until I can hook up with your parents.” 

As we neared the top of the hill, I heard voices. Kids’ voices. Shouting and 
laughing. 

The clearing narrowed. Tall pine trees, birch trees, and maples clustered 
over the hill. 

“What kind of sports camp is it?” Elliot asked Buddy. 

“We play all kinds of sports,” Buddy replied. “From Ping-Pong to football. 
From croquet to soccer. We have swimming. We have tennis. We have archery. 
We even have a marbles tournament!” 

“Sounds like a cool place!” my brother declared, grinning at me. 

“Only the best!” Buddy said, slapping Elliot on the shoulder. 

I reached the top of the hill first and peered down through the trees to the 
camp. It seemed to stretch for miles! 

I could see two long, white, two-story buildings on either side. Between 
them, I saw several playing fields, a baseball diamond, a long row of tennis 
courts, and two enormous swimming pools. 

“Those long, white buildings are the dorms,” Buddy explained, pointing. 
“That’s the girls’ dorm, and that’s the boys’. You guys can stay in them while 
you’re here.” 

“Wow! It looks awesome!” Elliot exclaimed. “Two swimming pools!” 

“Olympic size,” Buddy told him. “We have diving competitions, too. Are 
you into diving?” 

“Only inside the trailer!” I joked. 

“Wendy is into swimming,” Elliot told Buddy. 

“I think there’s a four-lap swim race this afternoon,” Buddy told me. “I’ll 
check the schedule for you.” 

The sun beamed on us as we followed the path down the hill. The back of 
my neck started to prickle. A cool swim sounded pretty good to me. 



“Can anyone sign up for baseball?” Elliot asked Buddy. “I mean, do you 
have to be on a team or something?” 

“You can play any sport you want,” Buddy told him. “The only rule at King 
Jellyjam’s Sports Camp is to try hard.” Buddy tapped the button on his T-shirt. 
“Only The Best,” he said. 

The breeze blew my hair back over my face. I knew I should have had it cut 
before vacation! I decided I’d have to find something to tie it back with as soon 
as I got into the dorm. 

A soccer match was under way on the nearest field. Whistles blew. Kids 
shouted. I saw a long row of archery targets at the far end of the soccer field. 

Buddy started jogging toward the field. Elliot stepped up beside me. “Hey 
—we wanted to go to camp, right?” he said, grinning. “Well? We made it!” 

Before I could reply, he trotted after Buddy. 

I brushed back my hair one more time, then followed. But I stopped when I 
saw a little girl poke her head out from behind a wide tree trunk. 

She appeared to be about six or seven. She had bright red hair and a face 
full of freckles. She wore a pale blue T-shirt pulled down over black tights. 

“Hey—” she called in a loud whisper. “Hey—!” 

I turned toward her, startled. 

“Don’t come in!” she called. “Run away! Don’t come in!” 



6 


Buddy turned back quickly. “What’s the problem, Wendy?” he called. 

When I returned my eyes to the tree, the red-haired girl had vanished. I 
blinked a couple of times. No trace of her. 

What was that girl doing out here? I wondered. Did she hide behind that 
tree just to scare people? 

“Uh... no problem,” I called to Buddy. I followed Elliot and the counselor 
into the camp. 

I quickly forgot all about the girl as we made our way around the soccer 
field and past a long row of fenced-in tennis courts. The thwack of tennis balls 
followed us as we turned on to the main path that led through the camp. 

So many sports! So much activity! 

We pushed our way through kids of all ages, eagerly hurrying to the 
swimming pools, to the baseball diamond, to the bowling lanes! 

“Awesome!” Elliot kept repeating. “Totally awesome!” 

And for once, he was right. 

We passed several other camp counselors. They were all young men and 
women, dressed completely in white, all of them good-looking and smiling 
cheerfully. 

And we passed dozens of little triangular signs showing the purple, blobby 
face of King Jellyjam, smiling out from under his shiny gold crown. Under each 
face was the camp slogan: Only The Best. 

He’s kind of cute, I decided. I realized I was starting to like everything 
about this amazing sports camp. 

And I have to confess I found myself secretly hoping that Mom and Dad 
wouldn’t be able to find Elliot and me for at least a day or two. 

Isn’t that terrible? 

I felt really guilty about it. But I couldn’t help thinking it. This camp was 
just too exciting. Especially after days of riding in the backseat of the car, staring 
out at cows! 

We dropped my brother off at the boys’ dorm first. Another counselor, a 
tall, dark-haired guy named Scooter, greeted Elliot and took my brother off to 
find a dorm room. 



Then Buddy led me to the girls’ dorm on the other side of the camp. We 
passed a gymnastics competition being held in an outdoor arena. Beyond that, 
one of the swimming pools was jammed with kids watching a diving contest off 
the high board. 

Buddy and I chatted as we walked. I told him about my school and about 
how my favorite sports are swimming and biking. 

We stopped at the white double-door entrance to the dorm. “Where are you 
from?” I asked him. 

Buddy stared back at me. He had such a confused expression on his face. 
For a moment, I thought he didn’t understand the question. 

“Do you come from around here?” I asked. 

He swallowed hard. He squinted his blue eyes. “Weird...” he muttered 
finally. 

“What’s weird?” I demanded. 

“I... I don’t remember,” he stammered. “I don’t remember where I’m from. 
Is that weird or what?” He raised his right hand to his mouth and nibbled his 
pointer finger. 

“Hey, I forget stuff all the time,” I told him, seeing how upset he was. 

I didn’t get a chance to say anything else. A young woman counselor with 
very short, straight black hair and bright purple-lipsticked lips came trotting up 
to us. “Hello. I’m Holly. Are you ready for some sports?” 

“I guess,” I replied uncertainly. 

“This is Wendy,” Buddy told her, his expression still troubled. “She needs a 
room.” 

“No problem!” Holly declared cheerfully. “Only The Best!” 

“Only The Best,” Buddy repeated quietly. He flashed me a smile. But I 
could see he was still struggling to remember where his home was. Weird, huh? 

Holly led the way into the dorm. I followed her down a long, white-tiled 
hall. Several girls came running past, on their way to different sports. They were 
all shouting and laughing excitedly. 

I peeked into some of the open rooms as we passed by them. Wow! I 
thought. This place is so modern and luxurious! It’s not exactly your basic, rustic 
summer camp. 

“We don’t stay in the rooms much at all,” Holly told me. “Everyone is 
always outdoors, competing.” 

She pushed open a white door and motioned for me to step in. Bright 



sunlight flooded the room from a wide window on the opposite wall. 

I saw two bright blue bunk beds against each wall. A sleek white dresser 
between them. Two white leather armchairs. 

The walls were white. They were bare except for a small, framed drawing 
of King Jellyjam above the dresser. 

“Nice room!” I exclaimed, squinting against the bright sunlight. 

Holly smiled. Her bright purple lips made the rest of her features seem to 
disappear. “Glad you like it, Wendy. You can take that bottom bunk over there.” 
She pointed. She had purple fingernails that matched her lipstick. 

“Do I have roommates?” I asked. 

Holly nodded. “You’ll meet them soon. They’ll get you started with some 
activities. I think they’re playing soccer on the lower field. I’m not sure.” 

She started out of the room, but turned at the doorway. “You’ll like Dierdre. 
I think she’s about your age.” 

“Thanks,” I said, gazing around the room. 

“Catch you later,” Holly replied. She vanished into the hall. 

I stood in the center of the sunlit room, thinking hard. What am I supposed 
to do for clothes? I wondered. What about swimsuits? Sweats? 

A11 I had were the denim short-shorts and pink-and-blue-striped T-shirt I 
was wearing. 

And why didn’t Holly tell me where to go next? I asked myself. Why did 
she just leave me by myself in this empty room? 

I didn’t have long to ask myself questions. 

I started to cross to the window when I heard voices. Whispered voices 
outside the door. 

I turned to the door. Were my roommates returning? 

I listened to the excited buzz of whispers. 

Then I heard a girl loudly instruct the others. “Come on. We’ve got her 
trapped in there. Let’s get her!” 



7 


I gasped and searched frantically for a place to hide. 

No time. 

Three girls burst into the room, their eyes narrowed, their mouths twisted 
into menacing sneers. They formed a line and moved toward me quickly. 

“Whoa! Wait!” I cried. I raised both hands as if to shield myself from their 
attack. 

The tall girl with streaky blond hair was the first to laugh. Then the other 
two joined in. 

“Gotcha,” the blond girl declared, tossing back her long hair triumphantly. 

I glared back at her, my mouth hanging open. 

“Did you really think we were going to attack?” one of the others asked. 
She was thin and wiry, with very short black hair cut into bangs. She wore gray 
sweats and a torn gray T-shirt. 

“Well...” I started. I could feel my face growing hot. Their little joke had 
really fooled me. I felt like a total jerk. 

“Don’t look at me,” the third girl said, shaking her head. She had frizzy 
blond hair tumbling out from beneath a blue and red Chicago Cubs cap. “It was 
all Dierdre’s idea.” She pointed to the girl with streaky blond hair. 

“Don’t feel bad,” Dierdre told me, grinning. Her green eyes flashed. 
“You’re the third girl this week.” 

The other two snickered. 

“And did the others think you were attacking?” I asked. 

Dierdre nodded, very pleased with herself. “It’s kind of a mean joke,” she 
admitted. “But it’s funny.” 

This time I joined in the laughter. 

“I have a younger brother. I’m used to dumb jokes,” I told Dierdre. 

She swept back her hair again. Rummaged around on the dresser top. Found 
a hair scrunchy to hold it back. “This is Jan and this is Ivy,” she said, motioning 
to the other girls. 

Jan was the one with the short black bangs. She slumped on to a lower 
bunk. “I’m whipped,” she sighed. “What a workout. Look at me. I’m sweating 
like a pig.” 



“Ever hear of deodorant?” Ivy cracked. 

Jan stuck out her tongue at Ivy in reply. 

“Get changed,” Dierdre instructed them both. “We’ve only got ten 
minutes.” 

“Ten minutes till what?” Jan demanded, bending down and rubbing her calf 
muscles. 

“Did you forget the four-lap race?” Dierdre replied. 

“Oh, wow!” Jan cried, jumping up. “I did forget.” She hurried to the 
dresser. “Where’s my swimsuit?” 

Ivy followed her. They began frantically sifting through the drawers. 

Dierdre turned to me. “Do you want to enter the race?” she asked. 

“I—I don’t have a swimsuit,” I replied. 

She shrugged. “No problem. I have about a dozen.” She studied me. “We’re 
about the same size. I’m just a little taller.” 

“Well, I’d love a swim,” I told her. “Maybe I’ll just go to the pool and 
splash around for a while.” 

“Huh? Not compete?” Dierdre cried. 

All three girls turned to me, stunned expressions on their faces. 

“I’ll do some sports later,” I said. “Right now, I just want to dive in and 
swim a little. You know. Cool off.” 

“But—you can’t!” Jan cried. She gaped at me as if I had suddenly grown a 
second head. 

“No way,” Ivy said, shaking her head. 

“You have to compete,” Dierdre added. “You can’t just swim.” 

“Only The Best,” Ivy recited. 

“Right. Only The Best,” Jan agreed. 

I felt totally confused. “What do you mean?” I demanded. “Why do you 
keep saying that?” 

Dierdre tossed me a blue swimsuit. “Put it on. We’re going to be late.” 
“But... but—” I sputtered. 

The three girls hurried to get into their swimsuits. 

I saw that I had no choice. I went into the bathroom and started to change. 
But my questions repeated in my mind. I really wanted them answered. 

Why did I have to compete in the race? Why couldn’t I just have a swim? 
And why did everyone keep repeating “Only The Best”? 

What did they mean? 



8 


The enormous blue pool sparkled under the bright sunlight. The sun hovered 
high overhead. The concrete burned the soles of my bare feet. I couldn’t wait to 
get into the water. 

Shielding my eyes with one hand, I searched for Elliot. But I couldn’t find 
him in the crowd of kids who were waiting to watch the race. 

Elliot has probably already played three sports, I told myself. This had to be 
the perfect camp for my brother! 

I gazed down the line of girls waiting to compete in the four-lap race. We 
all stood on the edge of the deep end of the pool, waiting to jump in. 

I silently counted. There were at least two dozen girls in this race. And the 
pool was wide enough for all of us to have a lane to swim in. 

“Hey, you look terrific in my suit,” Dierdre said. Her green eyes studied me. 
“You should have tied your hair back, Wendy. It’s going to slow you down.” 

Wow, I thought. Dierdre really cares about winning. 

“Are you a good swimmer?” I asked her. 

She swatted a fly on the back of her calf. “The best,” she replied, grinning. 
“How about you?” 

“I’ve never really raced,” I told her. 

The pool counselors were all young women. They wore white two-piece 
swimsuits. Across the pool, I saw Holly sitting on the edge of the diving board, 
talking to another counselor. 

A tall, red-haired counselor moved to the edge of the pool and blew her 
whistle. “Everyone ready?” she called. 

We all shouted back that we were ready. Then the long line of girls grew 
silent. We turned to the pool, leaned forward, and prepared to dive in. 

The water shimmered beneath me. The sun burned down on my back and 
shoulders. I felt about to melt. I couldn’t wait to jump in. 

The whistle blew. I sprang forward and hit the water hard. 

I gasped from the shock of the cold against my hot skin. My arms churned 
hard as I pulled myself forward. 

The splash of thrashing arms and kicking feet sounded like the roar of a 
waterfall. I dipped my face into the water, feeling the refreshing coldness. 



Turning my head, I glimpsed Dierdre a few lengths behind me. She swam 
in a steady rhythm, her arms and legs moving smoothly, gracefully. 

I’m ahead of everyone, I realized, glancing across the pool. I’m winning the 

race! 

With a hard kick, I reached the other end of the pool. I made a sharp turn 
and pushed off. As I started back to the deep end, the other girls were still 
approaching the shallow end wall. 

I pulled myself harder. My heart started to pound. 

I knew I’d win the first lap easily. Then there were three laps to go. 

Three laps... 

I suddenly realized how dumb I was. The other girls were pacing 
themselves. They weren’t swimming full speed because they knew it was a four- 
lap race. 

If I kept swimming this hard, I wouldn’t survive two laps! 

I sucked in a deep breath, then let it out slowly. 

Slowly... slowly... 

That was the word of the day. 

I slowed my kicking. Shot my arms out and pulled them back slowly. Took 
long breaths. Long, slow breaths. 

As I made my turn and started the second lap, several other swimmers had 
moved beside me. I caught Dierdre’s eye as she swam past. 

She never broke her steady rhythm. Stroke. Stroke. Breath. Stroke. 

On the other side of Dierdre, I saw Jan swimming comfortably, easily. Jan 
was so small and light. She seemed to float over the water. 

Into the third lap. I kept a few lengths behind Dierdre. I had to concentrate 
on keeping a slow, even pace. I pretended I was a robot, programmed to swim 
slowly. 

Dierdre turned into the fourth lap a few seconds ahead of me. I saw her 
expression change as she made her turn. She narrowed her eyes. Her entire face 
grew tight and tense. 

Dierdre really wants to win, I saw. 

I wondered if I could catch her. I wondered if I could beat her. 

I made my turn and put on the speed. 

I ignored the aching in my arms. 

I ignored the cramp in my left foot. 

I thrust myself forward, kicking hard from the waist. My hands cut through 



the water. 

Faster. 

I glimpsed Jan fall behind. I saw the disappointment on her face as I passed 

by. 

Pounding, thrusting arms and legs churned the water to froth. The splashing 
became a roar. The roar nearly drowned out the cheers of the kids watching from 
around the pool. 

My heart thudded so hard, I thought my chest might explode. 

My arms ached. They felt as if they each weighed a thousand pounds. 

Faster... 

I pulled up beside Dierdre. Close. So close, I could hear her gasping 
breaths. 

I glimpsed her face, tight with concentration. 

She’s just like Elliot, I decided. She wants to win so badly. 

Lots of times I let Elliot win a game. Because he cared about it so much 
more than I did. And so did Dierdre. 

As we neared the wall at the deep end, I let Dierdre pull ahead. 

I saw how much it meant to her. I saw how desperate she was to finish first. 

What the heck, I thought. There’s nothing wrong with coming in second. 

I heard the cheers ring out as Dierdre won the race. 

I touched the wall, then dipped below the surface. I pulled myself up and 
grabbed the wall. 

My entire body ached and throbbed. I gasped in breath after breath. I shut 
my eyes and pulled my hair back with both hands, squeezing the water out of it. 

My arms were so tired, I could barely pull myself out of the pool. I was one 
of the last swimmers out. 

The others had all formed a circle around Dierdre. I pushed my way into the 
crowd of girls to see what was happening. 

My eyes burned. I brushed water out of them. 

I saw the red-haired counselor hand something to Dierdre. Something gold 
and shiny. 

Everyone cheered. Then the circle broke, and the girls all headed in 
different directions. 

I made my way up to Dierdre. “Way to go!” I exclaimed. “I came close. But 
you’re really fast.” 

“I’m on the swim team at school,” she replied. She held up the gold object 



the counselor had given her. 

I could see it clearly now. A shiny gold coin. It had a smiling King Jellyjam 
engraved on it. I couldn’t read the words around the edge of the coin. But I could 
guess what they were. 

“It’s my fifth King Coin!” Dierdre declared proudly. 

Why is she so excited about it? I wondered. It wasn’t a real coin. It 
probably wasn’t even real gold! 

“What’s a King Coin?” I asked. The coin gleamed in the sunlight. 

“If I win one more King Coin, I can walk in the Winners Walk,” Dierdre 
explained. 

I started to ask what the Winners Walk was. But Jan and Ivy came running 
up to congratulate Dierdre. And the three of them all started talking at once. 

I suddenly remembered my brother. Where is Elliot? I wondered. What has 
he been doing? 

I turned away from Dierdre and the other girls and started toward the pool 
exit. But I had only taken a few steps when I heard someone calling my name. 

I spun around to see Holly jogging toward me. Her purple-lipsticked lips 
were knotted in a fretful expression. “Wendy, you’d better come with me,” the 
counselor told me. 

My heart skipped. “Huh? What’s wrong?” I asked. 

“I’m afraid there’s a problem,” Holly said softly. 



9 


Something happened to Mom and Dad! 

That’s the first thought that burst into my head. 

“What’s wrong?” I cried. “My parents! Are they okay? Are they—” 

“We haven’t found your parents yet,” Holly said. She wrapped a towel 
around my trembling shoulders. Then she led me to a bench at the side of the 
pool. 

“Is it Elliot?” I cried, dropping down beside her. “What is wrong?” 

Holly kept one arm around my shoulders. She leaned close. Her brown eyes 
stared into mine. 

“Wendy, the problem is that you didn’t really try very hard to win the race,” 
she said. 

I swallowed hard. “Excuse me?” 

“I watched you,” Holly continued. “I saw you slow your strokes in the last 
lap. I don’t think you tried your best to win.” 

“But—but—I—” I sputtered. 

Holly continued to stare at me without blinking. “Am I right?” she 
demanded softly. 

“I—I’m not used to swimming that far,” I stammered. “It was my first race. 
I didn’t think—” 

“I know you’re new at camp,” Holly said, brushing a fly off my leg. “But 
you know the camp slogan, right?” 

“For sure,” I replied. “It’s everywhere I look! But what does it mean? ‘Only 
The Best!”’ 

“I guess it’s kind of a warning,” Holly replied thoughtfully. “That’s why I 
decided to talk to you now, Wendy.” 

“A warning?” I cried. I felt more confused than ever. “A warning about 
what?” 

Holly didn’t reply. She forced a smile to her face and stood up. “Catch you 
later, okay?” 

She turned and hurried away. 

I wrapped the towel tighter around my shoulders and started back to the dorm to 



change. As I walked past the tennis courts, I thought hard about Holly’s warning. 

Why was it so important for me to win the race? 

So that I could be awarded, one of those gold coins with the blobby purple 
king on it? 

Why should I care about winning coins? Why couldn’t I just play some 
games, make new friends, and have fun? 

Why did Holly say she was giving me a warning? A warning about what? 

I shook my head, trying to shake away all these puzzling questions. I’d 
heard about sports camps from some of my friends back home. Some camps, 
they said, were really tough. The kids were all serious jock types who wanted to 
win, win, win. 

I guessed this was one of those camps. 

Oh, well, I thought, sighing. I don’t have to love this camp. Mom and Dad 
will be here soon to take Elliot and me away. 

I glanced up—and saw Elliot. 

Sprawled face down on the ground. His arms and legs spread out 
awkwardly. His eyes closed. 

Unconscious. 



10 


“Ooooh!” I let out a frightened wail. 

“Elliot! Elliot!” I dropped down beside him. 

He sat up and grinned at me. “How many times are you going to fall for 
that?” he asked. He started to laugh. 

I slugged him in the shoulder as hard as I could. “You creep!” 

That made him laugh even harder. It really cracks him up when he makes 
me look like a jerk. 

Why do I always fall for the stupid joke? Elliot pulls it on me all the time. 
And I always believe he’s been knocked out cold. 

“I’m never falling for that again. Never!” I cried. 

Elliot pulled himself to his feet. “Come watch me play Ping-Pong,” he said, 
tugging my hand. “I’m in the tournament. I’m beating this kid Jeff. He thinks 
he’s good because he puts a spin on his serve. But he’s pitiful.” 

“I can’t,” I replied. I pulled out of his grasp. “I’m dripping wet. I have to 
change.” 

“Come watch,” he insisted. “It won’t take long. I’ll beat him really fast, 
okay?” 

“Elliot—” He certainly was excited. 

“If I beat Jeff, I win a King Coin,” he announced. “Then I’m going to win 
five more. I want to win six so I can walk in the Winners Walk before Mom and 
Dad come for us.” 

“Good luck,” I mumbled, rubbing my wet hair with the towel. 

“Were you in a swim race? Did you win?” Elliot asked, tugging my hand 
again. 

“No. I came in second,” I told him. 

He snickered. “You’re a loser. Come watch me beat this kid.” 

I rolled my eyes. “Okay, okay.” 

Elliot pulled me to a row of outdoor Ping-Pong tables. They were shielded 
from the sun by a broad, white canvas awning. 

He hurried up to the table on the end. Jeff was waiting for him there, softly 
bouncing a Ping-Pong ball in the air with his paddle. 

I had pictured a little shrimpy guy that Elliot could beat easily. But Jeff was 



a big, red-faced, blond kid with bulging muscles. He had to be twice the size of 
my brother! 

I took a seat on a white wooden bench across from the tables. Elliot can’t 
beat this big guy, I thought. My poor brother is in for a major defeat. 

As they started to play, Buddy came walking over and sat down beside me. 
He flashed me a smile. “No word from your parents yet,” he said. “But we’ll 
find them.” 

We watched the Ping-Pong match. Jeff did his serve with the special spin. 
Elliot slammed it back at him. 

To my surprise, the match was really even. I think Jeff was surprised, too. 
His returns became more and more wild. And a lot of his special serves missed 
the table entirely! 

They had already played two games, Buddy told me. Jeff had won the first, 
Elliot the second. This was the third and deciding match. 

The game was a tie at sixteen, then a tie at seventeen and eighteen. 

I watched Elliot become more and more intense. He wanted desperately to 
win. He leaned stiffly over the table, gripping the paddle so tightly, his hand was 
white. 

Sweat poured off his forehead. He began ducking and dodging, groaning 
with each hit, trying to slam every ball. 

The more frantic and wild Elliot became, the calmer Jeff appeared. 

The game was a tie at nineteen. 

Elliot missed a shot and angrily slammed his paddle against the table. 

I could see that he was losing it. I’d seen this happen to my brother many 
times before. He could never win if he stayed this intense. 

As he held the ball and prepared to serve, I raised two fingers to the sides of 
my mouth and blew hard. He lowered the paddle when he heard my loud 
whistle. 

That was my signal. I’d used it many times before. It meant, “Cool it, 
Elliot. Calm down.” 

Elliot turned and gave me a quick thumbs-up. 

I saw him take a deep breath. Then another. 

My whistle signal always helped him. 

He raised the ball and served it to Jeff. Jeff sent back a weak return. Elliot 
smacked it back into the right corner. Jeff swung off balance and missed. 

Jeff served the next one. Elliot backhanded it. Very soft. The ball tipped 



over the net and dribbled several times on Jeff’s side. 

Elliot had won! 

He let out a gleeful cheer and raised his fists in victory. 

Jeff angrily heaved his paddle to the ground and stomped away. 

“Your brother is good,” Buddy said, climbing to his feet. “I like his style. 
He’s intense.” 

“For sure,” I muttered. 

Buddy hurried over to award Elliot his King Coin. “Hey, guy—you only 
need five more,” Buddy said, slapping Elliot a high five, then a low five. 

“No problem,” Elliot bragged. He held the coin up so I could see it. King 
Jellyjam smiled out at me, engraved on the coin. 

Why did the camp pick this silly little blob for a mascot? I wondered again. 
He looked like a fat hunk of pudding wearing a crown. 

“I’ve got to get changed,” I told Elliot. 

He slid the gold coin into the pocket of his shorts. “I’m going to find 
another sport!” he declared. “I want to win another King Coin before tonight!” 

I waved good-bye, then started toward the dorm. 

I had walked only a few steps when I heard a low rumbling. 

Then the ground started to shake. 

I froze. Every muscle in my body locked as the rumbling grew louder. 
“Earthquake!” I cried. 



11 


The ground shook hard. The awning over the Ping-Pong tables shook. The tables 
bounced on the ground. 

My knees buckled. I struggled to stay on my feet. 

“Earthquake!” I choked out again. 

“It’s okay!” Buddy called, running toward me. 

He was right. The rumbling sound faded quickly. The ground stopped 
shaking. 

“That happens sometimes,” Buddy explained. “It’s no problem.” 

My heart still thudded in my chest. My legs wobbled as if they were rubber 
bands. “No problem?” 

“See?” Buddy motioned around the crowded camp. “No one pays any 
attention. It lasts only a few seconds.” 

I gazed around quickly. Buddy was right again. The kids in the chess 
tournament in front of the lodge didn’t glance up from their chessboards. The 
kickball game on the field across from the pool continued without a pause. 

“It usually happens once or twice a day,” Buddy told me. 

“But what causes it?” I demanded. 

He shrugged. “Beats me.” 

“But—everything shook so hard! Isn’t it dangerous?” I asked. 

Buddy didn’t hear me. He was already jogging over to watch the kickball 
game. 

I turned and started walking to the dorm. I felt kind of shaky. I could still 
hear that strange rumbling sound in my ears. 

As I pulled open the door to the dorm, I bumped into Jan and Ivy. They 
both had changed into white tennis outfits, and they both carried tennis rackets 
over their shoulders. 

“What sports have you been playing?” 

“Did you win a King Coin?” 

“Wasn’t that a great swim race?” 

“Are you having fun, Wendy?” 

“Do you play tennis?” 



They both talked at once and shot out half a dozen questions. They seemed 
really excited. They didn’t give me a chance to answer. 

“We need more girls for the tennis tournament,” Ivy said. “We’re having a 
two-day tournament. Come to the courts after lunch, okay?” 

“Okay,” I agreed. “I’m not that good, but—” 

“See you later!” Jan cried. They both hurried away. 

Actually, I am a pretty good tennis player. I have a decent serve. And I do 
all right with my two-handed backhand. 

But I’m not great. 

Back home, my friend Allison and I always play for fun. We don’t try to 
kill each other. Sometimes we just keep volleying back and forth. We don’t even 
keep score. 

I’ll enter the tennis tournament, I decided. And if I lose in the first round, 
it’s no big deal. 

Besides, I told myself, Mom and Dad will be here any minute. And Elliot 
and I will have to leave. 

Mom and Dad... their faces flashed into my mind. 

They must be frantic, I realized. They must be worried sick. I hoped they 
were okay. 

I suddenly had an idea. 

I’ll call home, I decided. I should have thought of this before. I’ll call home 
and leave a message on our answering machine. I’ll tell Mom and Dad on the 
machine where Elliot and I are. 

No matter where he goes, Dad checks for phone messages every hour. Mom 
always makes fun of him for being so nervous about missing a call. 

But they’ll both be glad to get this message! I told myself. 

What a good idea! I congratulated myself. 

Now all I needed was a phone. 

There have to be phones in the dorm, I decided. I searched the small front 
lobby. But I didn’t see any pay phones. 

No one at the front desk. No one I could ask. 

I peered down a long hallway. Rooms on both sides. No phones. 

I tried the other hallway. No pay phones there, either. 

Eager to make my call, I turned and hurried back outside. I let out a long 
sigh of relief when I spotted two pay phones beside the long white dorm 
building. 



My heart pounding, I jogged over to them. 

I picked up the phone closest to me. And I started to raise the receiver to 
ear— 

—when two strong hands grabbed me from behind. 

“Get off the phone!” a voice demanded. 



12 


“Huh?” I shrieked in surprise and dropped the phone. It spun crazily on its cord. 

I turned around. “Dierdre! You scared me to death!” I cried. 

Her green eyes flashed excitedly. “Sorry, Wendy. I just had to tell you my 
news! Look!” 

She held out her hand. I saw a stack of gold King Coins. 

“I just won my sixth coin!” Dierdre declared breathlessly. “Isn’t that 
awesome?” 

“I—I guess,” I replied uncertainly. I still couldn’t figure out why it was 
such a big deal. 

“I’ll be in the Winners Walk tonight!” Dierdre exclaimed. “I can’t believe I 
made it!” 

“That’s great,” I told her. “Congratulations.” 

“Have you won any King Coins yet?” Dierdre asked, still holding out her 
hand. 

“Uh... not yet,” I replied. 

“Well, get going!” Dierdre urged. “Show them what you’ve got, Wendy. 
Only The Best!” She flashed me a thumbs-up with her free hand. 

“Right. Only The Best,” I repeated. 

“We’ll have a party,” Dierdre continued. “In our room. Right after the 
Winners Walk. Okay? We’ll celebrate.” 

“Great!” I replied. “Maybe we can get a pizza from the mess hall or 
something.” 

“Tell Jan and Ivy,” Dierdre instructed. “Or I’ll tell them. Whoever sees 
them first! See you later!” 

She ran off, holding the six gold coins tightly in her fist. 

I realized I was smiling. Dierdre had been so excited, she’d gotten me 
excited. So excited, I forgot about my phone call. 

I have to give this camp a chance, I decided. I have to get into the spirit of 
things and start having some fun. Only The Best! I’m going to win that tennis 
tournament! 


We all ate dinner at long wooden tables in the huge mess hall inside the main 



camp lodge. The long, high-ceilinged room seemed to stretch on forever. 

Loud voices and laughter echoed off the walls over the clatter of plates and 
silverware. Everyone had a story to tell. Everyone wanted to talk about the 
games of the day. 

After dinner, the counselors led us all to the running track. I searched for 
Elliot. But I couldn’t find him in the crowd. 

It was a warm, clear night. A pale sliver of a moon floated low over the 
darkening trees. As the sun set, the sky faded from pink to purple to gray. 

When darkness fell, I saw two flickering yellow lights at the far end of the 
track, moving toward me. As they came near, I could see that they were torches, 
carried by two counselors. 

A blaring trumpet fanfare made us all grow quiet. 

I stepped closer to Jan, who stood at my side. “They sure make a big deal of 
this,” I whispered. 

“It is a big deal,” Jan replied, her eyes straight ahead as the torches 
approached. 

“Do we have any food for the party later?” I whispered. 

Jan raised a finger to her lips. “Ssshhhh.” 

Several more torches had been lit. The yellow balls of light glowed like tiny 

suns. 

I heard a drumroll. Then a loud march blared from the loudspeaker, all 
trumpets and pounding drums. 

We stood in silence as the parade of torches passed by. And, then, in the 
flickering yellow light, I saw faces. The smiling faces of the kids who had won 
their sixth King Coin that day. 

I counted eight kids. Five boys and three girls. 

Their gold coins had been strung as necklaces around their necks. The coins 
caught the light of the torches and made the faces of the winners appear to glow 
as they marched by. 

Dierdre marched second in line. She seemed so happy and excited! Her 
coins jangled at her throat. Her smile never faded. 

Jan and I waved and called to her, but she marched right past. 

A counselor’s voice suddenly boomed over the loudspeaker: “Let’s hear it 
for our winners who are taking the Winners Walk tonight!” 

A deafening cheer rose up from the kids watching the parade. We all 
clapped and shouted and whistled until the winners had marched past and the 



final torches had floated out of sight. 

“Only The Best!” the voice shouted over the loudspeaker. 

“Only The Best!” we all chanted back. “Only The Best!” 

That ended the Winners Walk parade. The lights came on. We all scrambled 
toward the dorms. The boys ran in one direction, the girls in the other. 

“The torches were really cool,” I said to Jan as we followed the crowd of 
girls down the path to the dorm. 

“I only need two more King Coins,” Jan replied. 

“Maybe I can win them tomorrow. Are you playing in the softball 
tournament?” 

“No. Tennis,” I told her. 

“There are too many good tennis players,” Jan replied. “It’ll be too hard to 
win a coin. You should play softball, too.” 

“Well... maybe,” I replied. 

Ivy was already waiting for us in the room. “Where’s Dierdre?” she 
demanded as Jan and I entered. 

“We didn’t see her,” Jan replied. 

“Probably hanging out with the other winners,” I added. 

“I found two bags of tortilla chips, but I couldn’t find any salsa,” Ivy 
reported, holding up the bags. 

“Do we have anything to drink?” I asked. 

Ivy held up two cans of diet Coke. 

“Wow! Great party!” Jan exclaimed, laughing. 

“Maybe we should invite some girls in from other rooms,” I suggested. 

“No way! Then we’d have to share the Cokes!” Jan protested. 

We all laughed. 

The three of us joked and kidded around for about half an hour, waiting for 
Dierdre. We sat down on the floor and opened one of the bags of tortilla chips. 

Without realizing it, we finished off the whole bag. Then we passed around 
one of the cans of soda. 

“Where is she?” Jan demanded, glancing at her watch. 

“It’s nearly time for lights-out,” Ivy sighed. “We won’t have much time for 
a party.” 

“Maybe Dierdre forgot we were having a party,” I suggested, crinkling up 
the tortilla chip bag and tossing it toward the trash basket. 

I missed. Basketball is definitely not my sport. 



“But the party was her idea!” Ivy replied. She climbed to her feet and 
started pacing back and forth. “Where can she be? Everyone is inside by now.” 

“Let’s go find her,” I said. The words just popped out of my mouth. That 
happens to me sometimes. I get a bright idea before I know what I’m saying. 

“Yes! Let’s go!” Ivy eagerly agreed. 

“Whoa. Hold it,” Jan said, stepping in front of us, blocking our way to the 
door. “We’re not allowed. You know the rules, Ivy. We’re not allowed outside 
after ten.” 

“We’ll sneak out, find Dierdre, and sneak back in,” Ivy replied. “Come on, 
Jan. What could happen?” 

“Right. What could happen?” I chimed in. 

Jan was outnumbered. “Okay, okay. But I hope we don’t get caught,” she 
muttered. She followed Ivy and me to the door. 

“What could happen?” I asked myself, leading the way into the empty hall. 

“What could happen?” I repeated as we sneaked out the door, into the night. 

“What could happen?” 

I didn’t know it. But the answer to the question was: A LOT! 



13 


The night had grown warmer. And steamier. As I crept out the door, I felt as if I 
were stepping into a hot shower. 

A mosquito buzzed around my head. I tried to clap it between my hands. 
Missed. 

Jan, Ivy, and I edged our way around the side of the building. My shoes slid 
on the dew-wet grass. Bright spotlights shone down from the trees, lighting the 
path. 

We crept in the shadows. 

“Where should we look first?” Ivy whispered. 

“Let’s start at the lodge,” I suggested. “Maybe all of tonight’s winners are 
partying there.” 

“I don’t hear any partying,” Jan whispered. “It’s so quiet out here!” 

She was right. The only sounds I could hear were the steady chirp of 
crickets and the whisper of the warm wind through the trees. 

Keeping in the shadows, we followed the path toward the lodge. We passed 
the swimming pool, empty and silent. The water shimmered like silver under the 
bright spotlights. 

It was such a hot, wet night, I imagined myself jumping into the pool with 
all of my clothes on. 

But we were on a mission: To find Dierdre. No time to think about late- 
night swims. 

Staying close together, we passed the row of Ping-Pong tables. They made 
me think of Elliot. I wondered what he was doing. Probably tucked into bed. 

Like any sensible person. 

We were approaching the first row of tennis courts when Ivy suddenly cried 
out, “Whoa! Get back!” She grabbed me and shoved me hard against the fence. 

I heard soft footsteps on the path. Someone humming. 

The three of us held our breath as a counselor walked past. He had curly 
black hair and wore dark blue sunglasses even though it was night. He wore the 
white T-shirt and white shorts that made up the counselor’s uniform. 

We pressed our backs against the tennis court fence. “That’s Billy,” Jan 
whispered. “He’s kind of cute. He’s always so happy.” 



“He won’t be too happy if he catches us,” Ivy whispered. “We’ll be in 
major trouble.” 

Humming to himself, snapping his fingers, Billy walked past us. The path 
curved around the other side of the tennis courts. I watched him until he 
disappeared. 

I took a deep breath. I hadn’t been breathing the whole time! 

“Where’s he going?” Ivy wondered. 

“Maybe he’s going to the party at the lodge,” I suggested. 

“Why don’t we ask him?” Jan joked. 

“For sure,” I muttered. 

We checked out the path in both directions. Then we started walking again. 

We made our way past the tennis courts. The spotlights in the trees cast 
long shadows across the path. The shadows shifted and moved as the tree limbs 
bobbed in the wind. They looked like dark creatures crawling and slithering over 
the ground. 

Despite the heat of the night, I shivered. 

It was kind of creepy walking over these moving shadows. I had the feeling 
one of them might reach up, grab me, and pull me down. 

Weird thought, huh? 

I turned back in time to see the lights in the dorm windows start to go out. 
Lights-out. 

I tapped Jan on the shoulder. She turned and watched the dorm, too. As the 
lights all went out, the building seemed to disappear in front of our eyes. It faded 
into the black of the night sky. 

“M-maybe this wasn’t such a good idea,” I whispered. 

Ivy didn’t reply. She bit her lower lip. Her eyes were darting around the 
darkness. 

Jan laughed. “Don’t wimp out now,” she scolded. “We’re almost to the 
lodge.” 

We cut through the soccer field. The main lodge stood on a low, sloping 
hill, hidden by wide, old maple and sassafras trees. 

We didn’t have to climb very far up the hill to see that the lodge was as dark 
as the dorm. 

“No party up there,” I whispered. 

Ivy sighed, disappointed. “Well, where could Dierdre be?” 

“We could try the boys’ dorm!” I joked. 



They both laughed. 

Our laughter was cut short by a loud fluttering sound, very close by. 

“What’s that?” Ivy cried. 

“Ohhh!” I let out a low moan as I raised my eyes and saw them. 

The sky was thick with bats. Dozens of black bats. 

Fluttering over the spotlights in the old trees. And, then—swooping down 
to get us! 



14 


I couldn’t help myself. I let out a scream. Then I shielded my face with both 
hands. 

I heard Jan and Ivy gasp. 

The fluttering grew louder. Closer. 

I could feel the bats’ hot breath on the back of my neck. Then I could feel 
them clawing at my hair, tearing at my face. 

I’ve got a real good imagination when it comes to bats. 

“Wendy, it’s okay,” Jan whispered. She tugged my hands from my face. She 
pointed. “Look.” 

I followed her gaze up to the fluttering black wings. The bats were 
swooping low. But they weren’t swooping at us. They were swooping down and 
landing on the swimming pool at the bottom of the hill. 

In the bright spotlights, I could see them dart into the water—for less than a 
second. Then sweep back up to the sky. 

“I—I don’t like bats,” I whispered. 

“Neither do I,” Ivy confessed. “I know they’re supposed to be good. I know 
they eat insects and stuff. But I still think they’re creepy.” 

“Well, they won’t bother us,” Jan said. “They’re just taking a drink.” She 
gave Ivy and me a push to get us started down the hill. 

We were lucky. Nobody had heard me scream. But we had walked only a 
few steps when we spotted another counselor coming down the path. I 
recognized her. She had straight white-blond hair that tumbled down to her waist 
from under a blue baseball cap. 

Without making a sound, all three of us dove behind a tall evergreen shrub 
and crouched down. 

Did she see us? 

I held my breath again. 

She kept walking. 

“Where are these counselors going?” Ivy whispered. 

“Let’s follow her,” I suggested. 

“Stay far back,” Jan instructed. 

We slowly climbed back to our feet. And stepped out from behind the 



shrub. 

And stopped when we heard the low, rumbling sound. 

As the rumbling grew louder, the ground began to shake. 

I caught the frightened expressions on my two friends’ faces. Ivy and Jan 
were just as scared as I was. 

The ground shook harder, so hard that we dropped to our knees. I leaned on 
all fours, holding on to the grass. The ground trembled and shook. The rumbling 
became a roar. 

I shut my eyes. 

The sound slowly faded. 

The ground gave a final tremble, then remained still. 

I opened my eyes and turned to Ivy and Jan. They started to stand. Slowly. 

“I hate when that happens!” Jan muttered. 

“What is it?” I whispered. I stood up on shaky legs. 

“Nobody knows,” Jan replied, brushing grass stains off her knees. “It just 
happens. A few times a day.” 

“I think we should give up on Dierdre,” Ivy said quietly. “I want to go back. 
To the dorm.” 

“Yeah. I’m with you,” I replied wearily. “We can have our celebration with 
Dierdre tomorrow.” 

“She can tell us all about where she was tonight and what she did,” Jan 

said. 

“This was a crazy idea,” I muttered. 

“It was your idea!” Jan exclaimed. 

“Most of my ideas are crazy!” I replied. 

Hiding in the shadows, we made our way down to the path. I gazed toward 
the pool. The bats had disappeared. Maybe the rumbling sound had scared them 
back into the woods. 

The crickets had stopped chirping. The air remained hot, but silent and still. 

The only sound was the scrape of our sneakers on the soft dirt path. 

And, then—before we could move or hide—we heard someone else’s 
footsteps. 

Rapid footsteps. Running hard. Running toward us. 

I stopped short when I heard a girl’s desperate cry. “Help me! Please— 
somebody! Help me!” 



15 


A hot gust of wind shook the trees, making their eerie dark shadows dance. 

I leaped back, startled by the girl’s terrified cries. 

“Help me! Please—!” 

She came running around from the side of the tennis courts. She wore tight 
blue short-shorts and a magenta midriff top. 

Her arms were stretched out in front of her. Her long hair flew wildly 
behind her head. 

I recognized her as soon as she burst into view. 

The little red-haired girl with all the freckles. The one who had hidden in 
the woods and warned Elliot and me not to come into the camp. 

“Help me!” 

She ran right into me, sobbing hard. I threw my arms around her tiny 
shoulders and held her. “You’re okay,” I whispered. “You’re okay.” 

“No!” she shrieked. She tugged away from me. 

“What’s wrong?” Jan demanded. “Why are you out here?” 

“Why aren’t you in bed?” Ivy added, stepping up beside me. 

The little girl didn’t answer. Her entire body trembled. 

She grabbed my hand and pulled me behind the bushes beside the path. Jan 
and Ivy followed. 

“I’m not okay,” she started, wiping the tears off her freckled cheeks with 
both hands. “I’m not. I—I—” 

“What’s your name?” Jan asked in a whisper. 

“Why are you out here?” Ivy repeated. 

I heard the flutter of bat wings again, low overhead. But I stared at the little 
girl and forced myself to ignore them. 

“My name—it’s Alicia,” the girl replied, sobbing. “We’ve got to go. Fast!” 

“Huh?” I cried. “Take a deep breath, Alicia. You’re okay. Really.” 

“No!” she cried again, shaking her head. 

“You’re safe now. You’re with us,” I insisted. 

“We’re not safe,” she cried. “No one. No one here. I tried to warn people. I 
tried to tell you...” Her words were cut off once again by her loud sobs. 



“What is it?” Ivy demanded. 

“What did you try to warn us about?” Jan asked, leaning down to the crying 

girl. 

“I—I saw something terrible !” Alicia stammered. “I—” 

“What did you see?” I asked impatiently. 

“I followed them,” Alicia replied. “And I saw it. Something horrible. I—I 
can’t talk about it. We just have to run. We have to tell the others. Everyone. We 
have to run. We have to get away from here!” 

She let out a long breath. Her entire body trembled again. 

“But why do we have to run?” I asked, placing my hands gently on her 
shoulders. 

I felt so bad. I wanted to calm her. I wanted to tell her that everything would 
be okay. But I didn’t know how to convince her. 

What had she seen? What had frightened her so much? 

Had she had a bad dream? 

“We have to go now!” she repeated shrilly. Her red hair was matted to her 
face by her tears. She grabbed my arm and pulled hard. “Hurry! We’ve got to 
mn! I saw it!” 

“Saw what?” I cried. 

Alicia had no time to reply. 

A dark-haired counselor stepped up in front of the bushes. “Caught you!” 
he cried. 



16 


I froze. My entire body went cold. 

The counselor’s dark eyes flashed in the light of a spotlight. “What are you 
doing out here?” he demanded. 

I sucked in a deep breath and started to answer. 

But another voice replied before I could. “Kind of nosy, aren’t you?” It was 
another counselor. A woman with short, black hair. 

Breathing hard, trying not to make a sound, I ducked lower behind the 
bushes. My two friends dropped to their knees. 

“You aren’t following me—are you?” the first counselor teased. 

“Why would I follow you? Maybe you’re following me!” the woman teased 
back. 

They didn’t see us, I realized happily. We were two feet away from them. 
But they didn’t see us behind the bushes. 

A few seconds later, the two counselors strolled off together. My friends 
and I waited a long while, listening hard until we could no longer hear their 
voices. Then we climbed slowly to our feet. 

“Alicia?” I asked. “Are you okay?” 

“Alicia?” Ivy and Jan cried. 

The little girl had vanished. 

We sneaked back into the dorm through a side door. Luckily, there were no 
counselors patrolling the halls. No one in sight. 

“Dierdre—are you back?” Jan called as we stepped into our room. 

No reply. 

I clicked on the light. Dierdre’s bunk remained empty. 

“Better turn off the light,” Ivy warned. “It’s after lights-out.” 

I clicked the light back off. Then I stumbled toward my bunk, waiting for 
my eyes to adjust to the darkness. 

“Where is Dierdre?” Ivy asked. “I’m a little worried about her. Maybe we 
should tell a counselor that she’s missing.” 

“What counselor?” Jan asked, slumping onto her bed. “There’s no one 
around. The counselors are all out somewhere.” 



“I’m sure she’s partying somewhere and forgot all about us,” I said, 
yawning. I bent to pull down the covers on my bed. 

“What do you think that little girl saw?” Ivy asked, peering out the window. 

“Alicia? I think she had a bad dream,” I replied. 

“But she was so frightened!” Jan said, shaking her head. “And what was 
she doing outside?” 

“And why did she run away from us like that?” Ivy added. 

“Weird,” I mumbled. 

“Weird is right,” Jan agreed. Weird is the word of the night. She made her 
way to the dresser. “I’m getting changed for bed. Big day tomorrow. I’ve got to 
win two more King Coins.” 

“Me, too,” Ivy said, yawning. 

Jan pulled out a dresser drawer. “Oh, no!” she shrieked. “No! I don’t 
believe it!” 



17 


“Jan—what is it?” I cried. 

Ivy and I tore across the room to the dresser. 

Jan continued to stare down into the open drawer. “It’s so dark,” she said. “I 
opened Dierdre’s drawer by mistake. And—and—it’s empty !” 

“Huh?” Ivy and I both uttered our surprise. 

Squinting through the dim gray light, I studied the dresser drawer. Totally 
empty. “Check the closet,” I suggested. 

Ivy crossed the room in three or four quick strides. She pulled open the 
closet door. 

“Dierdre’s stuff—it’s all gone!” Ivy declared. 

“Weird,” I muttered. It was still the word of the night. 

“Why would she move out and not tell us?” Jan demanded. 

“Where did she go?” Ivy added. 

Good question, I thought, staring at the empty closet. 

Where did Dierdre go? 


* * * 


Breakfast was the noisiest meal of the day. Spoons clattered against cereal 
bowls. Orange juice pitchers banged on the long wooden tables. 

Voices rang out as if someone had turned up the volume all the way. 
Everyone talked excitedly about the sports they planned to play today, the games 
they planned to win. 

I had taken the last shower. So Jan and Ivy were already eating breakfast 
when I made my way into the mess hall. 

As I pushed through the narrow aisle between the tables, I searched for 
Dierdre. No sign of her. 

I hadn’t slept very well, even though I was really tired. I kept thinking 
about Dierdre—and about Alicia. And I kept wondering what was taking Mom 
and Dad so long to get in touch with us. 

I spotted Elliot at the end of a table filled with boys about his age. He had a 
stack of waffles in front of him, and he was pouring dark syrup over them. 



“Elliot—what’s up?” I called, squeezing through the aisle to get over to 

him. 

My brother didn’t bother saying good morning. “I’ve got a one-on-one 
tournament this morning,” he reported excitedly. “I could win my third King 
Coin!” 

“Thrills and chills,” I replied, rolling my eyes. “You haven’t heard anything 
about Mom and Dad, have you?” 

He stared at me as if he didn’t remember who they were. Then he shook his 
head. “Not yet. Isn’t this a great camp? Did we luck out, or what?” 

I didn’t reply. My eyes were on the next table. I thought I had spotted 
Dierdre. But it was just another girl with streaky blond hair. 

“Have you won any coins yet?” Elliot asked. He had a mouth full of waffle. 
Syrup dripped down his chin. 

“Not yet,” I replied. 

He snickered. “They should change the camp slogan for you, Wendy. Only 
The Worst!” 

Elliot laughed. The other boys at the table laughed, too. 

As I said, Elliot really cracks himself up. 

I wasn’t in the mood for his lame jokes. My mind was still on Dierdre. 
“Catch you later,” I said. 

I squeezed past the table and headed toward the girls’ side of the room. 
Cheers and laughter rang out at a table near the wall. A scrambled-egg tossing 
battle had broken out. Three counselors rushed to stop it. 

Jan and Ivy’s table was full. I found an empty space at the next table. I 
poured myself a glass of juice and a bowl of cornflakes. But I didn’t feel too 
hungry. 

“Hey—!” I called out when I saw Buddy walk by. He didn’t hear me over 
the noise, so I jumped up and ran after him. 

“Hi. What’s up?” He greeted me with a smile. 

His blond hair was still wet from the shower. He smelled kind of flowery. 
Aftershave, I guessed. 

“Do you know where Dierdre went?” I demanded. 

He narrowed his eyes in surprise. “Dierdre?” 

“A girl in my dorm room,” I explained. “She didn’t come back to the room 
last night. Her closet is empty.” 

“Dierdre,” he repeated, thinking hard. He raised his clipboard to his face 



and ran his finger down it slowly. “Oh, yeah. She’s gone.” His cheeks turned 
bright pink. 

“Excuse me?” I stared up at him. “Dierdre is gone? Where did she go? 
Home?” 

He studied the sheet on his clipboard. “I guess. It just says she’s gone.” His 
cheeks darkened from pink to red. 

“That’s so weird,” I told him. “She didn’t say good-bye or anything.” 

Buddy shrugged. A smile spread over his face. “Have a nice day!” 

He started toward the counselors’ table at the front of the huge room. But I 
ran after him. I grabbed his arm. 

“Buddy, one more question,” I said. “Do you know where I can find a little 
girl named Alicia?” 

Buddy waved to some boys across the room. “Go get ’em, guys! Only The 
Best!” he shouted to them. Then he turned back to me. “Alicia?” 

“I don’t know her last name. She’s probably six or seven,” I told him. “She 
has beautiful, long red hair and a face full of freckles.” 

“Alicia...” He chewed his bottom lip. Then he raised the clipboard again. 

I watched as he ran his finger down the list of names. When his finger 
stopped, his cheeks turned pink again. 

“Oh, yeah. Alicia,” he said, lowering the clipboard. He grinned at me. A 
strange grin. A chilling grin. “She’s gone, too.” 



18 


“Jan! Ivy!” I saw them hurrying from the mess hall, and I chased after them. 
“We’ve got to talk!” I cried breathlessly. 

“We can’t. We’re late.” Jan straightened her bangs with one hand. “If we 
don’t get to the volleyball nets in time, we can’t be in the tournament.” 

“But it’s important !” I called as they jogged to the doors. 

They didn’t seem to hear me. I watched them disappear into the morning 
sunlight. 

My heart pounded in my chest. I suddenly felt cold all over. 

I caught up with my brother, who was playfully boxing a tall, skinny boy 
with short blond hair. “Elliot—come here,” I instructed. “Just for a minute.” 

“I can’t,” he called. “Remember? My one-on-one contest?” 

The tall, skinny boy hurried out the door. I stepped in front of Elliot, 
blocking his path. 

“Give me a break!” he cried. “I don’t want to be late. I’m going against Jeff. 
Remember him? I can beat him. He’s big, but he’s real slow.” 

“Elliot, something strange is going on here,” I said, backing him against the 
wall. Kids were staring at us as they made their way outside. But I didn’t care. 

“You’re the only one who’s strange!” Elliot shot back. “Are you going to let 
me go to the basketball court or not?” 

He started to push past me. I pinned his shoulders to the wall with both 
hands. 

“Just give me one second!” I insisted. “There’s something wrong with this 
camp, Elliot.” I let go of him. 

“You mean the rumbling noises?” he asked, brushing back his dark hair 
with one hand. “That’s just gas under the ground or something. A counselor 
explained it to me.” 

“That’s not what I’m talking about,” I replied. “Kids are disappearing.” 

He laughed. “Invisible kids? You mean like a magic trick?” 

“Stop making fun of me!” I snapped. “It isn’t funny, Elliot. Kids are 
disappearing. Dierdre from my dorm room? She was in the Winners Walk last 
night. Then she didn’t come back to the room.” 

Elliot’s grin faded. 



“This morning, Buddy told me she was gone,” I continued. I snapped my 
fingers. “Just like that. And a little girl named Alicia—she disappeared, too.” 

Elliot’s brown eyes studied me. “Kids have to go home sometime ,” he 
insisted. “What’s the big deal?” 

“And what about Mom and Dad?” I demanded. “They couldn’t have driven 
very far before they realized the trailer had come loose. Why haven’t they found 
us? Why hasn’t the camp found them?” 

Elliot shrugged. “Beats me,” he replied casually. He dodged past me and 
started to the door. “Wendy, you’re just unhappy because you stink at sports. But 
I’m having a great time here. Don’t mess it up for me—okay?” 

“But—but—Elliot—!” I sputtered. 

Shaking his head, he pushed the door open with both hands and escaped 
into the sunlight. 

I balled both hands into tight fists. I really wanted to pound him. Why 
wouldn’t he listen to me? Couldn’t he see how upset and frightened I was? 

Elliot is the kind of kid who never worries about anything. Everything 
always seems to go his way. So why should he sweat it? 

But you’d think he’d be just a little worried about Mom and Dad. 

Mom and Dad... 

I had a heavy feeling in my stomach as I made my way slowly out the door. 
Had they been in a car accident or something? Is that why they hadn’t found 
Elliot and me yet? 

No. Stop making things worse, I scolded myself. Don’t let your imagination 
mn away with you, Wendy. 

I suddenly remembered my plan to call home. Yes, I decided, I will do that 
right now. I will call home and leave a message for Mom and Dad on the 
answering machine. 

I stopped in the middle of the path and searched for a pay phone. A group 
of girls carrying hockey sticks passed by. I heard a long whistle coming from the 
pool across from the tennis courts. Then I heard the splash of kids diving into the 
water. 

Everyone is having fun, I thought—except me. 

I decided to make the call, then find a sport to play. Something to take my 
mind off all my crazy worries. 

I returned to the row of blue and white pay phones at the side of the lodge. I 
ran full speed and picked up the nearest phone. 



I raised the receiver to my ear and started to punch in our number. 
Then I cried out in surprise. 



19 


“Hi there, Camper!” boomed a cheerful, deep voice. “Have a wonderful day at 
camp. This is King Jellyjam greeting you. Work hard. Play hard. And win. And 
always remember—Only The Best! ” 

“Oh, no!” I cried. “A stupid message—!” 

“Hi there, Camper! Have a wonderful day —” The tape started to repeat in 
my ear. 

I slammed the receiver down and picked up the next phone. 

“Hi there, Camper! Have a wonderful day at camp.” The same jolly, 
booming voice. The same recorded message. 

I tried every phone in the row. They all played the same message. None of 
the phones were real. 

Where are the real phones? I wondered. There have to be phones that 
actually work. 

I turned away from the lodge and wandered down the dirt path. As I passed 
the bushes where Jan, Ivy, and I had hid last night, I felt a chill. And thought 
about Alicia. 

Bright sunlight washed over the sloping, grassy hill. I shielded my eyes and 
watched a black-and-gold monarch butterfly. It fluttered toward a patch of red 
and pink geraniums. 

I walked aimlessly, searching for a telephone. All around, kids were 
shouting, laughing, playing hard. I didn’t really hear them. I was deep into my 
own troubled thoughts. 

“Hey! Hey! Hey!” 

My brother’s voice startled me into stopping. I blinked several times, 
struggling to focus. 

I saw that I had wandered down to the basketball court. Elliot and Jeff were 
having their one-on-one basketball competition. 

Jeff dribbled the ball. It thudded loudly on the asphalt court. My brother 
waved both arms in Jeff’s face. Made a grab for the ball. 

Missed. 

Jeff lowered his shoulder. Bumped Elliot out of the way. Dribbled to the 
basket—and shot. 



“Two points!” he cried, grinning. 

Elliot scowled and shook his head. “You fouled me.” 

Jeff pretended not to hear. He was twice as big as Elliot. A big hulk. He 
could push Elliot all over the court, if he wanted to. 

Whatever made Elliot think he could win? 

“What’s the score?” Jeff demanded, wiping sweat off his forehead with the 
back of one hand. 

“Eighteen to ten,” Elliot reported unhappily. I didn’t need twenty guesses to 
figure out that my brother was losing. 

The basketball court was closed off by a mesh-wire fence. I grabbed the 
fence with both hands, pressed my face up against it, and watched. 

Elliot dribbled, moving back, back, giving himself some space. Jeff moved 
with him, leaning forward, adjusting his basketball shorts with one hand as he 
moved. 

Suddenly, Elliot burst forward, his eyes on the basket. He started his jump, 
raised his right hand to shoot—and Jeff grabbed the ball away. 

Elliot jumped and shot nothing but air. 

Jeff dribbled twice. Put up a two-handed layup. 

Swish. The score was twenty to ten. 

Jeff won the game a few seconds later. He let out a cheer and slapped Elliot 
a high five. 

Elliot frowned and shook his head. “Lucky shots,” he muttered. 

“Yeah. For sure,” Jeff replied, using the front of his sleeveless blue T-shirt 
to mop his sweating face. “Hey, congratulate me, man. You’re my sixth victim!” 

“Huh?” Elliot stared at him, hands pressed against his knees, struggling to 
catch his breath. “You mean—?” 

“Yeah.” Jeff grinned. “My sixth King Coin. I get to march in the Winners 
Walk tonight!” 

“Wow. That’s cool,” Elliot replied without enthusiasm. “I still have three 
coins to go.” 

I had the sudden feeling that I was being watched. I let go of the wire fence 
and took a step back. 

Buddy had been staring at me from the path. His eyes were narrowed, and 
his mouth was set in a stern, unhappy expression. 

How long had he been standing there? 

Why did he look so unhappy? His grim expression gave me a chill. 



As I turned to him, he stepped forward. His blue eyes stared hard into mine. 
“I’m sorry, Wendy,” the counselor said softly. “But you have to go.” 



20 


“Excuse me?” I gaped at him. My mouth dropped open. 

What was he saying? Where did I have to go? 

Did he mean I had to go —like Dierdre and Alicia? 

“You have to go find a sport,” Buddy repeated, still speaking softly. His 
solemn expression didn’t change. “You can’t stand around watching other kids 
play. King Jellyjam would never approve of that.” 

I’d like to step on that ugly little blob! I thought angrily. What a stupid 
name. King Jellyjam. Yuck! 

Buddy had just scared me to death. Was he trying to frighten me? I 
wondered. 

No, I quickly decided. Buddy doesn’t know that I’m upset about things. 
How could he know? 

Buddy hurried on to the basketball court. He slapped Jeff on the back and 
handed him a gold King Coin. “Way to go, guy!” he cried, flashing Jeff a 
thumbs-up. “I’ll see you in the Winners Walk tonight. Only The Best!” 

Buddy said a few words to my brother. Elliot shrugged a few times. Then 
he said something that made Buddy laugh. I couldn’t hear their words. 

When Elliot trotted off to find his next sport, Buddy strode quickly back to 
me. He put an arm around my shoulders and guided me away from the 
basketball court. 

“I guess you’re just not a self-starter, Wendy,” he said. 

“I guess,” I replied. What was I supposed to say? 

“Well, I’m going to give you a schedule for today. See if you like it,” 
Buddy said. “First, I have a tennis match fined up for you. You play tennis, 
right?” 

“A little,” I told him. “I’m not that great, but—” 

“After tennis, come down to the softball diamond, okay?” Buddy 
continued. “We’ll get you on one of the softball teams.” 

He flashed me a warm smile. “I think you’ll have a lot more fun if you join 
in—don’t you?” 

“Yeah. Probably,” I replied. I wanted to sound more enthusiastic. But I just 
couldn’t. 



Buddy led me onto one of the back tennis courts. An African-American girl 
about my age was warming up by hitting a tennis ball against a backboard. 

She turned and greeted me as I approached. “How’s it going?” 

“Fine,” I replied. We introduced ourselves. 

Her name was Rose. She was tall and pretty. She wore a purple tank top 
over black shorts. I saw a silver ring dangling from one ear. 

Buddy handed me a racket. “Have fun,” he said. “And watch out, Wendy. 
Rose already has five King Coins!” 

“Are you a good tennis player?” I asked, twirling the racket in my hand. 

Rose nodded. “Yeah. Pretty good. How about you?” 

“I don’t know,” I told her honestly. “My friend and I always play just for 

fun.” 

Rose laughed. She had a deep, throaty laugh that I liked. It made me want 
to laugh, too. “I never play for fun!” she declared. 

She told the truth. 

We volleyed back and forth for a while, to get warmed up. Rose leaned 
forward, tensed her body, narrowed her dark eyes—then started slamming the 
ball back at me as if we were playing the final set of a championship! 

She played even harder once we started our match. 

I found out very quickly that I was no match for her. I was lucky to return a 
few of her serves! 

Rose was a good sport about it. I caught her snickering a few times at my 
two-handed backhand. But she didn’t make fun of my pitiful game. And she 
gave me some really helpful tips as the match continued. 

She won in straight sets. 

I congratulated her. She seemed really excited about winning her sixth King 
Coin. 

A woman counselor I hadn’t seen before appeared on the court and 
presented the coin to Rose. “See you at the Winners Walk tonight,” she said, 
grinning. 

Then the counselor turned to me. “The softball diamond is right over that 
hill, Wendy.” She pointed. 

I thanked her and began walking in that direction. “Don’t walk—run!” she 
called. “Let’s see some spirit! Only The Best!” 

I let out an unhappy groan. I don’t think she heard me. Then I obediently 
started to run. 



Why was everyone always rushing me around here? I complained silently. 
Why can’t I go lie down by the pool and work on my tan? 

As the softball diamond came into view, I started to cheer up a little. I 
actually like softball. I’m not much of a fielder. But I’m a pretty good slugger. 

The teams, I saw, had boys and girls on them. 

I recognized two of the girls from my breakfast table this morning. 

One of them tossed me a bat. “Hi. I’m Ronni. You can be on our team,” she 
said. “Can you pitch?” 

“I guess,” I replied, wrapping my hands around the bat. “Sometimes I pitch 
after school on the playground.” 

She nodded. “Okay. You can pitch the first couple of innings.” 

Ronni called the other kids together and we huddled. We went around the 
circle, giving our names. Then the kids who didn’t have fielding positions chose 
their spots. 

“If we win, do we all get King Coins?” a boy with a fake tattoo of an eagle 
on his shoulder asked. 

“Yes. All of us,” Ronni told him. 

Everyone cheered. 

“Don’t start cheering yet. We’ve got to win first!” Ronni exclaimed. 

She went around the circle, giving the batting order. Since I was the pitcher, 
I batted ninth. 

But since I had a bat, I decided to take a few practice swings. I stepped 
away from the others, behind the third base line. 

Easing my hands up on the bat, I took a soft swing. I like to choke up pretty 
high. I’m not very strong, and it gives me a harder swing. 

The bat felt pretty good. I took a few more soft swings. 

Then I pulled it behind my shoulder—and swung as hard as I could. 

I didn’t see Buddy standing there. 

The bat smacked him hard in the chest. 

It made a sickening thocccck as it crashed into his ribs. 

I let the bat fall from my hands. Then I staggered back. Stunned. Horrified. 



21 


Buddy’s smile faded. He narrowed his blue eyes at me. 

He raised a hand and pointed a finger at me. 

“I like the way you choke up,” he said. “But maybe we could find you a 
lighter bat.” 

“Huh?” My mouth hung open. I couldn’t move. I stood there, gaping at 
him. “Buddy—?” 

He picked up the bat from the ground. “Does it feel comfortable? Let me 
see you swing again, Wendy.” He handed the bat to me. 

My hands trembled as I took it from him. I kept my eyes on him. Waited for 
him to cry out. To grab his chest and collapse in a heap on the ground. 

“Some of the aluminum bats are lighter,” he said. He brushed back his 
blond hair with one hand. “Go ahead. Swing again.” 

I took a few shaky steps away from him. I wanted to make sure I didn’t hit 
him again. Then I choked up on the bat and swung. 

“How is it?” he asked. 

“F-fine,” I stammered. 

He flashed me a thumbs-up and went to talk to Ronni. 

Whoa! I thought. What is the story here? 

I swung that bat into his chest, hard enough to break a few ribs. Or at least 
knock his breath out. 

But Buddy didn’t even seem to notice! 

What is the story here? 

I told Jan and Ivy about it at dinner. 

Jan snickered. “I guess your swing isn’t as hard as you think.” 

“But it made a horrible sound! Like eggs breaking or something!” I 
exclaimed. “And he just went on smiling and talking.” 

“He probably waited until he was out of sight. Then he screamed his head 
off!” Ivy suggested. 

I forced myself to laugh along with my two friends. But I didn’t feel like 
laughing. 



It was all too strange. 

I mean, no one could take a blow like that right in the chest and not even 
say “Ouch!” 

Our team lost by ten points. But after that thocccck, who could think about 
the game? 

I glanced across the room to the counselors’ table. Buddy sat at one end, 
talking and laughing with Holly. He seemed perfectly okay. 

I kept glancing at him all through dinner. Again and again, I heard the 
sickening thocccck the bat made as it smashed into his chest. I just couldn’t get it 
out of my mind. 

I kept thinking about it as we trooped out to the track after dinner for the 
Winners Walk. It was a windy night. The torches flickered and nearly went out. 

The trees around the track shivered and bent. Their branches seemed to 
reach down for the ground. 

The marching music started, and the winners paraded by. Rose waved to me 
as she passed. I saw Jeff walking proudly near the back of the line, his gold coins 
jangling around his neck. 

After the ceremony, I hurried back to the room and climbed into bed. Too 
many troubling thoughts whirred around in my brain. I wanted to go to sleep and 
shut them out. 


The next morning at breakfast, Rose and Jeff were gone. 



22 


I searched for Rose and Jeff. And I searched for my brother all morning. I knew 
he’d be playing hard at one of the sports. But I walked from the soccer field at 
one end of the camp to the driving range at the other end, and I didn’t see him. 

Had Elliot disappeared, too? 

The frightening thought kept tugging at my mind. 

We’ve got to get out of this camp! 

I kept repeating those words to myself as I made my way along the 
crisscrossing dirt paths. 

King Jellyjam, the little purple blob, grinned at me from the signs posted 
everywhere. Even his cartoon smile gave me the creeps. 

Something was terribly wrong at King Jellyjam’s Sports Camp. And the 
more I walked, my eyes searching every face for my brother, the more frightened 
I became. 

Buddy caught up to me after lunch. He led me back to the Softball 
diamond. “Wendy, you can’t leave your team,” he said sternly. “Forget 
yesterday. You still have a chance. If you win today, you guys all win King 
Coins.” 

I didn’t want any King Coins. I wanted to see my parents. I wanted to see 
my brother. And I wanted to get out of there! 

I didn’t pitch today. I played left field, which gave me plenty of time to 
think. 

I planned our escape. 

It won’t be that hard, I decided. Elliot and I will sneak out after dinner when 
everyone is watching the Winners Walk. We’ll make our way down the hill, back 
to the highway. Then we’ll walk or hitchhike to the nearest town with a police 
station. 

I knew the police would find Mom and Dad for us easily. 

A simple plan, right? Now all I had to do was find Elliot. 

Our team lost the game seven to nine. 

I grounded out to end the game. The other kids were disappointed that the 
team lost, but I didn’t really care. 



I still hadn’t won a single King Coin. As we trotted toward our dorms, I saw 
Buddy watching me. He had a fretful expression on his face. 

“Wendy—what’s your next sport?” he called to me. 

I pretended I didn’t hear him and trotted away. 

My next sport is running, I thought unhappily. Running away from this 
horrible place. 

The ground began to rumble and shake as I passed the main lodge. This 
time, I ignored it and kept walking to the dorm. 

I didn’t find Elliot until after dinner. I saw him heading out the mess-hall door 
with two buddies. They were laughing, talking loudly, and bumping each other 
with their chests as they walked. 

“Elliot!” I called, chasing after him. “Hey, Elliot—wait up!” 

He turned away from his two friends. “Oh. Hi,” he said. “How’s it going?” 
“Did you forget you have a sister?” I demanded angrily. 

He narrowed his eyes at me. “Excuse me?” 

“Where have you been?” I asked. 

A grin spread over his face. “Winning these,” he said. He raised the chain 
around his neck to show off the gold King Coins he was wearing. “I’ve got five.” 
“Awesome,” I said sarcastically. “Elliot—we’ve got to get out of here!” 
“Huh? Get out?” He twisted up his face, confused. 

“Yes,” I insisted. “We have to get away from this camp—tonight!” 

“I can’t,” Elliot replied. “No way.” 

Kids pushed past us, on their way to watch the Winners Walk. I followed 
Elliot out the mess-hall door. Then I pulled him off the path, onto the grass at the 
side of the building. 

“You can’t leave? Why not?” I demanded. 

“Not till I win my sixth coin,” he said. He jangled the coin necklace in my 

face. 

“Elliot—this place is dangerous!” I cried. “And Mom and Dad must be—” 
“You’re just jealous,” he interrupted. He jangled the coins again. “You 
haven’t won any—have you!” 

I balled my hands into fists. I wanted to strangle him. I really did. 

He was such a competitive jerk. He always had to win everything. 

I took a deep breath and tried to speak calmly. “Elliot, aren’t you at all 
worried about Mom and Dad?” 



He lowered his eyes for a moment. “A little.” 

“Well, we have to get out of here and find them!” I declared. 

“Tomorrow,” he replied. “After the track meet in the morning. After I win 
my sixth coin.” 

I opened my mouth to argue with him. But what was the point? 

I knew how stubborn my brother can be. If he wanted to win that sixth coin, 
he wouldn’t leave till he won it. 

I couldn’t argue with him. And I couldn’t drag him away. “Right after the 
track meet tomorrow morning,” I told him, “we’re out of here! Whether you win 
or lose. Agreed?” 

He thought about it. “Okay. Agreed,” he said finally. Then he trotted off to 
find his friends. 

Four kids marched in the Winners Walk. As I watched from the sidelines, I 
thought about the kids I knew who had marched before. 

Dierdre. Rose. Jeff... 

Had they all gone home? Were they picked up by their parents? Were they 
back home now safe and sound? 

Maybe I’m frightening myself for no reason, I thought. 

Everyone else in camp seems to be having a great time. Why am I the only 
worrier? 

And then I remembered that I wasn ’t the only worrier. 

Alicia’s tear-stained face floated into my mind. 

What had Alicia seen that had frightened her so much? Why was she 
desperately trying to warn us to get away? 

I’ll probably never find out, I told myself. 

When the Winners Walk ceremony ended, I didn’t feel like going back to 
the dorm. I knew I couldn’t get to sleep. Too many thoughts troubled my mind. 

As the other kids made their way to their rooms, I ducked into the deep 
shadows. Then I sneaked along the path to the sloping hill that led up to the main 
lodge. 

Hiding behind a wide evergreen shrub, I dropped down onto the grass. It 
was a cool, cloudy night. The air felt heavy and damp. 

I raised my eyes to the sky. Clouds covered the stars and the moon. Far in 
the distance, I could see tiny red lights moving slowly against the blackness. An 
airplane. I wondered where it was headed. 



Crickets began to chirp. The wind rustled my hair. 

I gazed up at the starless sky. Trying to relax. Trying to calm myself down. 

After a few minutes, I heard voices. Footsteps. 

I pulled myself up to my knees and ducked low behind the shrub. 

The voices grew louder. A girl laughed. 

Carefully, I peered out from between the piney branches. I saw two 
counselors, walking rapidly along the path that led up the hill. 

Behind them, I spotted another group of counselors making their way 
quickly up the hill. They all seemed to be in a hurry. 

I lowered myself behind the shrub and hid in the darkness. 

They’re heading to the lodge, I decided. Must be some kind of counselors’ 
meeting. 

Their white shorts and T-shirts were easy to see, even on such a dark night. 
Keeping out of sight, I watched them make their way up the path. 

But to my surprise, they didn’t go to the lodge. Several yards from the 
lodge entrance, they turned off the path and ducked into the woods. 

Where were they going? 

I saw two more groups of counselors make their way into the trees. There 
must be a hundred counselors at this camp, I realized. And they’re all going into 
the woods tonight. 

I waited until I thought all of the counselors had passed by. Then I slowly 
pulled myself to my feet. 

I stared into the woods. But I could see only darkness. Shadows upon 
shadows. 

I ducked back down when I heard two more voices. 

Peering through the evergreen branches, I spied Holly and Buddy. They 
were taking long strides, walking side by side. 

I waited till they passed by. Then I jumped up. 

Creeping in the deep shadows, I followed them into the woods. 

I didn’t stop to worry about getting caught. I had to know where the 
counselors were all going. 

Buddy and Holly moved quickly through the woods, pushing tall weeds out 
of their way, stepping over fallen tree limbs. 

To my surprise, a low, white structure came into view. It appeared to glow 
dully in the dim light. 

The building was built low to the ground. The top was curved. 



I squinted at it through the trees. It looks like an igloo, I thought. 

What is this strange building? I wondered. Why is it hidden away in the 
trees? 

A dark opening had been cut into the side. Holly ducked into the low 
entrance. Buddy followed her in. 

I waited nearly a minute. Then I stepped up to the opening. 

My heart pounded. Such a strange, little building. Round and smooth as ice. 

I hesitated. I peered into the entrance, but couldn’t see anything inside. I 
didn’t hear any voices. 

What should I do? I asked myself. 

Should I go in? 

Yes. 

I took a deep breath and lowered myself into the opening. 



23 


Three steep steps led down to a dim entryway. A single red light down near the 
floor gave off the only light. 

I stepped into the dark red glow, then stopped and listened. 

I could hear voices speaking softly in the next room. 

Trailing my hand along the bare, concrete wall, I moved slowly toward the 
voices. An open doorway came up on my right. 

I stopped outside it. Then I slowly, carefully peered in. 

I stared into a large, square room. Four torches hanging at the front of the 
room sent out flickering orange light. 

The counselors sat on long wooden benches, facing a low stage. A purple 
banner hung over the stage. It proclaimed: ONLY THE BEST. 

It’s a little theater, I realized. Some kind of meeting hall. 

But why is it hidden away in the woods? And why are the counselors all 
meeting here tonight? 

I didn’t have to wait long for my answer. 

Buddy stepped on to the small stage. He walked quickly into the flickering 
orange torchlight. Then he turned to face the audience of counselors. 

I crept into the doorway. There were no torches in the back of the hall. It 
was pitch-black back there. 

Walking on tiptoe, I edged my way along the back wall. 

The door to a closet of some kind stood open. I ducked into it. 

Buddy raised both hands. The counselors instantly stopped talking. They all 
sat up straight and stared forward at him. 

“Time to refresh ourselves,” Buddy called out. His voice echoed off the 
concrete walls. 

The counselors sat stiffly. No one moved. No one made a sound. 

Buddy pulled a gold coin from his pocket. A King Coin, I figured. It 
dangled on a long gold chain. 

“Time to refresh our minds,” Buddy said. “Time to refresh our mission.” 

He raised the gold coin high. It glowed in the torchlight as he began to 
swing it. Back and forth. Slowly. 



“Clear your minds,” he instructed them, speaking softly now. “Clear your 
minds, as I have cleared mine.” 

The gleaming gold coin swung slowly back and forth. Back and forth. 

“Clear... clear... clear your minds,” Buddy chanted. 

He is hypnotizing them! I realized. 

Buddy is hypnotizing all the counselors. And he’s been hypnotized, too! 

I took a step forward. I couldn’t believe what I was seeing and hearing! 

“Clear your minds to serve the master!” Buddy declared. “For that is why 
we are here. To serve the master in all his glory!” 

“To serve the master!” the counselors all chanted back together. 

Who is the master? I asked myself. 

What are they talking about? 

Buddy continued chanting out slogans to the crowd of counselors. His eyes 
were wide. He never blinked. 

“We do not think!” he shouted. “We do not feel! We give ourselves up to 
serve the master!” 

And suddenly I had an answer to some of my questions. 

Now I knew why Buddy hadn’t cried out, hadn’t collapsed to the ground 
when I swung the bat into his chest. 

He had hypnotized away all feeling. 

He was in some kind of trance. He couldn’t feel the bat. He couldn’t feel 
anything. 

“Only The Best!” Buddy cried, raising both fists into the air. 

“Only The Best!” the counselors all repeated. Their unblinking faces 
appeared strange, frozen in the flickering orange light. 

“Only The Best! Only The Best!” 

They all chanted the slogan over and over. Their voices echoed loudly off 
the walls. Only their mouths moved. Like puppets. 

“Only The Best can serve the master!” Buddy shouted. 

“Only The Best!” the counselors chanted one more time. 

Buddy had been swinging the gold coin over his head during the entire 
performance. Now he lowered it back into the pocket of his shorts. 

The room grew silent. 

A heavy silence. An eerie silence. 

And then I sneezed. 



24 


I cupped my hand over my mouth. 

Too late. 

I sneezed again. 

Buddy’s mouth opened wide in surprise. He jabbed a finger in the air, 
pointing at me. 

Several counselors jumped to their feet and spun around. 

I turned to the door. Could I escape through it before one of them caught 

me? 

No. 

No way I could get over there. 

My legs were shaking. But I forced myself to move. I backed against the 

wall. 

Why had I stepped so far into the room? Why hadn’t I stayed in the safety 
of the doorway? 

“Who’s there?” I heard Buddy call. “It’s so dark. Who is it?” 

Good! I thought. He didn’t know it was me. 

But in seconds, they’d grab me and drag me into the light. 

I took another step back. Another. 

Darkness fell over me. 

I spun around. “Ohh!” I cried out when I saw that I had nearly toppled 
down a steep stairway. 

It wasn’t a closet after all. 

Black stone steps curved sharply down. Where did they lead? 

I couldn’t guess. But I had no choice. The steps were my only chance of 
escape. 

I leaned against the wall and plunged down the stairs. My shoes slid on the 
smooth stones. 

I nearly tripped and went sailing head first. But I grabbed the wall and 
steadied myself as I started to fall. 

The stairs curved down. Down. 

The air grew hot and sour. I held my breath. The air smelled like sour milk. 



A strange, deep moan rumbled up from down below. 

I stopped to catch my breath. 

Listened hard. 

The low moan rolled up the stairway again. A whiff of sour air invaded my 
nostrils. 

I turned back. Was I being followed? Had the counselors seen me escape 
through the open door? 

No. It had been too dark. I didn’t hear anyone on the stairs. They weren’t 
following me. 

What smelled so bad down below? 

I wanted to stop right there. I didn’t want to climb down any farther. 

But what choice did I have? I knew they’d be searching for me upstairs. 

Leaning a hand against the stone wall, I made my way down. 

The stairway led into a long, narrow tunnel. I could see pale light at the end 
of it. Another deep moan rumbled in the distance. The floor shook. 

I took a long breath and passed quickly through the tunnel. The air grew hot 
and damp. My shoes splashed through puddles on the tunnel floor. 

Where does this lead? I wondered. Will it take me back outside? 

As I neared the end of the tunnel, a whiff of sour air made me choke. I 
coughed and struggled to stop my stomach from heaving. 

What a disgusting smell! 

Like decayed meat and rotten eggs. Like garbage left out in the sun for days 
and days. 

I pressed both hands over my mouth. The odor was so strong, I could taste 
it! 

I gagged. Once. Twice. 

Don’t think about the smell! I ordered myself. Think about something else. 
Think about fresh flowers. Think about sweet-smelling perfume. 

Somehow, I calmed my stomach. 

Then, pinching two fingers over my nose to keep the odor out, I stumbled to 
the end of the tunnel. 

I stopped as the tunnel gave way to a huge, brightly lit chamber. 

I stopped and stared—at the ugliest, most frightening thing I had ever seen 
in my life! 



25 


Squinting into the bright light, I saw dozens of kids with mops, and buckets, and 
water hoses. 

At first, I thought they were cleaning off a giant, purple balloon. Bigger 
than any balloon in the Thanksgiving Day parade! 

But as the water sprayed over it and the mops soaped its sides, the balloon 
let out a loud groan. 

And I realized I wasn’t staring at a balloon. It was a creature. And the 
creature was alive. I was staring at a monster. 

I was staring at King Jellyjam. 

Not a cute little mascot. But a fat, gross, purple mound of slime, nearly as 
big as a house. Wearing a gold crown. 

Two enormous, watery yellow eyes rolled around in his head. He smacked 
his fat purple lips and groaned again. Hunks of thick, white goo dripped from his 
huge, hairy nostrils. 

The disgusting odor rolled off his body. Even holding my nose couldn’t 
keep out the sour stench. 

He smelled like dead fish, rotting garbage, sour milk, and burning rubber— 
all at once! 

The gold crown bounced on top of his slimy, wet head. His purple stomach 
heaved, as if an ocean wave was breaking inside him. And he let out a putrid 
burp that shook the walls. 

The kids—dozens of them—worked frantically. They circled the ugly 
monster. They hosed him down. Scrubbed his body with mops and sponges and 
brushes. 

And as they worked, little round objects rained down on them. Click. Click. 
Click. The little round things clattered to the floor. 

Snails! 

Snails popping out through King Jellyjam’s skin. 

I started to gag again when I realized the hideous creature was sweating 
snails ! 

I staggered back into the tunnel, pressing my hands over my mouth. 

How could those kids stand the horrible, sour stench? 



Why were they washing him? Why were they working so hard? 

I gasped when I recognized some of the kids. 

Alicia! 

She held a hose with both hands and sprayed King Jellyjam’s bulging, 
heaving stomach. Her red hair was soaked and matted to her forehead. She cried 
as she worked, bawling loudly. 

I saw Jeff. Rubbing a mop up and down on the monster’s side. 

I opened my mouth to call to Alicia and Jeff. But my breath caught in my 
throat, and no sound came out. 

And then someone came running toward me. Stumbling and staggering. 
Into the tunnel. Out of the bright light. 

Dierdre! 

A dripping sponge in one fist. Her streaky blond hair drenched. Her clothes 
wrinkled and soaked. 

“Dierdre!” I managed to choke out. 

“Get away from here!” she cried. “Wendy—run!” 

“But—but—” I sputtered. “What is happening? Why are you doing this?” 

Dierdre uttered a sob. “Only The Best!” she whispered. “Only The Best get 
to be King Jellyjam’s slaves!” 

“Huh?” I gaped at her as she trembled in front of me, shivering from the 
cold water that had drenched her. 

“Don’t you see?” Dierdre cried. “These are all winners. All six-coin 
winners. He gets the strongest kids. The best workers.” 

“But—why?” I demanded. 

Snails popped through the creature’s skin and clicked as they hit the hard 
floor. A wave of sour stench blew over us as another rumbling burp escaped his 
swollen lips. 

“Why are you all washing him?” I asked Dierdre. 

“He—he has to be washed all the time!” Dierdre exclaimed with a sob. “He 
has to be kept wet. And he can’t stand his own smell. So he gets the strongest 
kids down here. And makes us wash him night and day.” 

“But, Dierdre—” I started. 

“If we stop washing,” she continued. “If we try to take a rest, he—he’ll eat 
us!” Her entire body shook. “He—he ate three kids today!” 

“No!” I cried, gasping in horror. 

“He’s so disgusting!” Dierdre wailed. “Those horrible snails popping out of 



his body... that putrid smell.” 

She grabbed my arm. Her hand was wet and cold. “The counselors are all 
hypnotized,” she whispered. “King Jellyjam has total control over them.” 

“I—I know,” I told her. 

“Get out of here! Hurry!” Dierdre pleaded, squeezing my arm. “Get help, 
Wendy. Please—” 

An angry roar made us both jump. 

“Oh, no!” Dierdre wailed. “He’s seen us! It’s too late!” 



26 


The monster let out another roar. 

Dierdre loosened her grip on my arm. We both turned toward him, shaking 
with fright. 

He was bellowing at the ceiling, roaring just to keep everyone terrified. His 
watery yellow eyes were shut. He hadn’t seen Dierdre and me—yet. 

“Get help!” Dierdre whispered to me. Then she raised the sponge and ran 
back to her place at King Jellyjam’s side. 

I froze for a moment. Froze in horror. In disbelief. 

Another rumbling burp jolted me from my thoughts and sent me scurrying 
through the tunnel. At least now I knew why the camp ground shook so often! 

The sour stench followed me through the tunnel and back up the curving, 
stone steps. I wondered if I could ever get rid of it. I wondered if I could ever 
breathe freely again. 

How can I help those kids? I asked myself. What can I do? 

I was too terrified to think clearly. 

As I ran through the darkness, I could picture King Jellyjam smacking his 
gross purple lips. I could see him rolling his yellow eyes. And the ugly black 
snails squeezing out through his skin. 

I felt sick as I reached the top of the stairs. But I knew I didn’t have time to 
worry about myself. I had to save the kids who had been forced to be the 
monster’s slaves. And I had to save the rest of the kids in camp—before they 
became slaves, too. 

I poked my head out of the closet door. The four torches still burned at the 
front of the small theater. But the room was empty. 

Where were the counselors? Out searching for me? 

Probably. 

Where can I go? I asked myself. I can’t spend the night in this closet. I have 
to breathe some fresh air. I have to go somewhere where I can think. 

Carefully, I made my way out of the low igloo. Into the starless night. 
Hiding behind a wide tree trunk, my eyes searched the woods. 

Narrow beams of white light from flashlights darted through the trees, over 
the ground. 



Yes, I told myself. The counselors are searching for me. 

I backed up, away from the crisscrossing lights. Trying not to make a 
sound, I crept between the trees and tall weeds, toward the path that led to the 
lodge. 

Can I get to the dorms and warn everyone? I wondered. Will anyone believe 
me? Will there be counselors guarding the dorms? Waiting for me to show up? 

I heard voices on the path. I ducked behind a tree and let two counselors 
pass. Their flashlights made wide circles over the sloping hill. 

As soon as they were out of sight, I darted out from the trees. I ran down 
the hill. Keeping in deep shadows, I made my way past the swimming pool. Past 
the tennis courts. All dark and silent now. 

A clump of tall hedges beside the track would hide me from all sides, I 
realized. I ducked behind the hedges, gasping for breath. Dropping to my knees, 
I crawled into their shelter. 

I settled myself on the prickly pine needles beneath the hedges. And peered 
out. Only darkness now. 

I took a deep breath. Then another. Such sweet-smelling air. 

I’ve got to think, I told myself. Got to think... 

Shouting voices startled me awake. 

When had I fallen asleep? Where was I? 

I blinked several times. Sat up and stretched. 

My body felt stiff. My back ached. Every muscle ached. 

I gazed around. Discovered I was still hidden inside the hedges. A gray, 
cloudy morning. The sun trying to burn through the high clouds. 

And the voices? 

Cheers? 

I raised myself up and peered through the hedges. 

The track competition! It had just begun. I saw six boys in shorts and T- 
shirts, leaning forward as they ran around the track. A crowd of kids and 
counselors cheering them on. 

And in the lead? 

Elliot! 

“No!” I cried hoarsely, my voice still choked with sleep. 

I stepped out from the hedges. Made my way across the grass toward the 
track. 



I knew I had to stop him. I couldn’t let him win the race. I couldn’t let him 
win his sixth coin. If he did, they’d make Elliot a slave, too! 

He ran hard. He pulled far out in front of the other five. 

What could I do? What? 

In my panic, I remembered our signal. 

My two-fingered whistle. My signal for Elliot to take it easy. 

He’ll hear the whistle and slow down, I told myself. 

I raised two fingers to my mouth. I blew. 

No sound came out. My mouth was too dry. My heart thudded in my chest. 
I tried again. No. No whistle. 

Elliot turned into the last lap. There was no way to stop him from winning 

now. 



27 


No way to stop him—unless I beat him there! 

With a desperate cry, I plunged forward and started to run to the track. 

My shoes pounded the grass. I kept my eyes on Elliot and the finishing line 
as I ran. Faster. Faster. 

If only I could fly! 

Foud cheers rang out as Elliot neared the finish. The other five boys were 
miles behind! 

My shoes thudded onto the asphalt track. My chest felt about to burst. It 
hurt to breathe. My breath came in loud wheezes. 

Faster. Faster. 

I heard cries of surprise as I raced over the track. I plunged up behind 
Elliot, reached out both hands—and tackled him from behind. 

We both toppled in a heap, rolling over the hard track, onto the grass. The 
other boys raced past us to the finish line. 

“Wendy, you jerk!” Elliot screamed, jumping to his feet. 

“I—can’t explain now!” I shouted back, struggling to breathe, struggling to 
stop the aching in my chest. 

I scrambled to my feet and pulled Elliot up. He angrily tried to jerk free. 
“Why’d you do that, Wendy? Why?” 

I saw three counselors running toward me. 

“Hurry—!” I ordered my brother. I pulled him away. “Just hurry!” 

I think he saw the terror in my eyes. I think he realized that tackling him 
was a desperate act. I think he saw how serious I was. 

Elliot stopped protesting and started to run. 

I led him over the grass. Up the sloping hill by the lodge. Into the woods. 

“Where are we going?” he called breathlessly. “Tell me what’s happening!” 

“You’ll see in a minute!” I called back. “Get ready for a really bad smell!” 

“Huh? Wendy—have you totally lost it?” 

I didn’t answer. I kept running. I led the way into the woods. To the igloo¬ 
shaped building. 

At the low entrance, I turned back to see if we were being followed. I didn’t 



see anyone. 

Elliot followed me into the theater. The torches weren’t lit. It was pitch- 
black inside. 

Feeling my way along the back wall, I found the closet door. I pulled it 
open and led the way down the curving stairs. 

Halfway down, the sour odor floated up to greet us. Elliot cried out and 
cupped both hands over his nose and mouth. “It stinks!” His cry was muffled by 
his hands. 

“It gets worse,” I told him. “Try not to think about it.” 

We jogged side by side through the long tunnel. I wished I had time to warn 
Elliot. I wished I could tell him what he was about to see. 

But I was desperate to save Dierdre, Alicia, and the others. 

Gasping from the smell, I burst into King Jellyjam’s brightly lit chamber. 
Water from a dozen hoses splashed over the monster’s purple body. Kids 
scrubbed furiously as he sighed and groaned. 

I saw the startled horror on my brother’s face. But I couldn’t worry about 
Elliot now. 

“Hit the floor! ” I screamed at the top of my lungs, cupping my hands into a 
megaphone. “EVERYBODY—HIT THE FLOOR! NOW!” 

I had a plan. 

Would it work? 



28 


The monster’s watery yellow eyes grew wide with surprise. His bloated lips 
parted. I could see two pink tongues dart and coil inside his mouth. 

A few of the kids dropped their hoses and mops and flattened themselves on 
the floor. Others turned to stare at me. 

“Stop washing him!” I cried. “Put down your hoses and brushes! Stop 
working! And hit the floor!” 

Beside me, Elliot uttered gasping sounds. I glimpsed him struggling to keep 
the sick smell from overpowering him. 

King Jellyjam let out a furious roar as the rest of the kids obeyed my 
instructions. Thick, white slime dripped from his nose. His two tongues flicked 
out between his purple lips. 

“Get flat!” I screamed to the kids. “Stay down!” 

And then I saw the monster raise a fat purple arm. With a disgusting groan, 
he leaned over. His slimy flesh rippled all over his body as he reached out. 

Reached out to grab Alicia! 

“Help! He’s going to eat me!” Alicia shrieked. She started to get up. 

“No!” I shrieked. “Stay down! Stay flat!” 

With a terrified cry, Alicia dropped back to the floor. 

King Jellyjam swung his fat hand down. Fumbled it over her. Tried to lift 
the little girl up. Tried again. Again. 

But I had figured right! The monster’s fingers were too big, too clumsy to 
pick up anyone who lay flat on the floor. 

King Jellyjam tilted his head back and uttered a roar of disgust. 

I cupped my hand over my nose as the disgusting odor grew more intense. 
Snails pop-pop-popped out of his skin. Rolled down his slimy body. Bounced 
noisily onto the floor. 

The monster flailed his arms. He leaned down again and struggled to pick 
up some other kids. 

But they pressed themselves flat on the floor. He couldn’t lift them. 

He roared again, weaker this time. His eyes rolled wildly in his enormous 
head. 

The smell burned my eyes. It swirled around me, surrounded me in its sour 



stench. 

King Jellyjam grabbed for a hose. Couldn’t pick it up. He slammed his hand 
into a bucket. Struggled frantically to splash water on himself. 

I stood trembling. Watching every move. 

My plan was working. I knew it would work. It had to work! 

The stench grew even stronger. I could taste it. I could smell it on my skin. 

King Jellyjam flailed both arms. Frantically, he struggled to wash himself. 

His roars became groans. His body began to shake. 

I gasped as he narrowed his eyes at me. He raised a swollen purple finger 
and pointed. Accusing me! 

He leaned forward. Reached out. 

Swiped out his enormous hand. 

I couldn’t move. I was too stunned. 

I shuddered. 

His hand slid over me. And before I could struggle, he began to tighten his 
slimy, stinking fingers around my body. 



29 


“Ohhh.” I uttered a horrified moan. 

The fat, wet fingers tightened. Waves of odor rose up around me. 

I held my breath. But the smell was everywhere. 

The fingers wrapped themselves tighter. 

The monster began to lift me off the ground. Raise me toward his gaping 
mouth. The two tongues darted and flicked. 

And then the tongues drooped over his purple lips. 

The fingers loosened their grip. 

I slid free as King Jellyjam groaned and fell forward. Kids rolled quickly 
out of the way. King Jellyjam toppled over headfirst. 

The gold crown bounced away. The monster’s body made a loud splat as it 
spread over the floor. 

“Yes!” I choked out happily. I was still shaking, still trying to forget the 
slimy feel of his fingers against my skin. “Yes!” 

My plan had worked perfectly. 

The kids stopped washing—and King Jellyjam suffocated from his own 
foul smell! 

“Are you okay?” Elliot asked in a trembling voice. 

I nodded. “Yes. I think I’m going to be fine.” 

Elliot held his nose. “I’ll never complain about Dad’s garden fertilizer 
again!” he declared. 

Cheering and shouting, the other kids climbed to their feet. 

“Thank you!” Alicia cried, wrapping me in a hug. The others rushed 
forward to thank me, too. 

There were lots of hugs, lots of tears as we made our way up to the theater 
and then out into the woods. 

“We are out of here!” I cried happily to Elliot. 

But we all stopped at the edge of the woods when we saw the counselors. 

They all stood in front of us, dozens of them, side by side in their white 
shirts and shorts. They had formed a line along the path. 

And I could see from the hard expressions set on their faces that they had 



not come to welcome everyone back. 

As I stared from face to face, Buddy stepped forward. He gave a signal to 
the other counselors. “Don’t let them get away!” he cried. 



30 


The counselors stepped forward, moving in a line. Their expressions remained 
hard and threatening. They kept their arms at their sides. 

They moved stiffly. Like robots. In a trance. 

They took two more steps. 

Then a shrill whistle broke the silence. 

“Stop right there! Everybody freeze!” a man’s voice boomed. 

I heard another shrill whistle. 

I turned to see several blue-uniformed police officers running up the hill. 
The counselors shook their heads, blinked, uttered soft cries. They made no 
attempt to run. 

“Where are we?” I heard Holly mutter. 

“What’s happening?” another counselor asked. 

They all appeared dazed and confused. The police whistles seemed to have 
broken the trance that held them. 

The other kids and I all cheered happily as the officers swarmed up the hill. 
“How did you know we needed help?” I called. 

“We didn’t,” an officer replied. “A horrible smell floated into town. We 
wanted to find out what was causing it. We followed it here!” 

I had to laugh. The same smell that had killed the monster had actually 
saved us kids. 

“We didn’t know there was a problem at this camp,” an officer announced. 
“We’ll contact your parents as soon as we can.” 

Elliot and I led the way down the hill. We were so eager to see Mom and 

Dad! 

The counselors muttered to themselves, gazing around, trying to figure out 
what had happened. 

I turned to Buddy as Elliot and I walked past him. “Are you feeling better?” 
I asked. 

He narrowed his blue eyes at me and squinted hard. He didn’t seem to be 
able to focus. “Only The Best,” he murmured. “Only The Best.” 



Elliot and I were never so glad to be home! 

“What took you so long to find us?” Elliot demanded. 

Mom and Dad shook their heads. “The police checked everywhere, trying 
to find you two,” Dad replied. “They called the camp several times. The 
counselor who answered the phone told the police that you weren’t there.” 

“We were so worried,” Mom said, biting her bottom lip. “So terribly 
worried. When we found the trailer empty, we didn’t know what to think!” 

“Well, we’re home safe and sound now,” I replied with a grin. 

“Maybe you two would like to go away to a real camp next summer,” Dad 

said. 

“Uh... no way!” Elliot and I answered together. 

Two weeks later, we had a surprise visitor. 

I opened the door to find Buddy on the front stoop. His blond hair was 
neatly brushed. He wore chinos, a blue-and-white-striped sportshirt, and a dark 
blue tie. 

“I’m so sorry about what happened at camp,” Buddy said. 

I was still too shocked at seeing him to reply. I just held on to the door and 
gaped at him. 

“Is Elliot home?” Buddy asked. 

“Hi.” Elliot stepped up beside me. “Buddy! What’s up?” 

“I brought you this,” Buddy replied. He reached into his pants pocket and 
pulled out a gold coin. 

“It’s a King Coin,” he told Elliot. “You earned it, remember? You actually 
won the race.” 

Elliot reached out for it. Then stopped. His hand hung in midair. 

I knew what my brother was thinking. This would be his sixth King Coin. 
Should he take it? 

Finally, he grabbed it. “Thanks, Buddy,” Elliot said. 

Buddy said good-bye and gave us a wave. Elliot and I watched him get into 
a car and drive away. Then we closed the door behind us. 

“Are you sure you should’ve taken that?” I asked Elliot. 

“Why not?” he replied. “That purple monster is dead—right? What could 
happen?” 

Five minutes later, we both smelled the horrible odor at the same time. 
“Yuck!” Elliot groaned. He swallowed hard. “Wendy, wh-what’s that 



smell?” he stammered. 

“I—I don’t know,” I replied in a shaky voice. 

I heard Mom laugh behind us. We turned to see her standing in the doorway 
to the kitchen. “What’s wrong?” she asked. “I have a pot of brussels sprouts 
boiling on the stove!” 





REVENGE OF THE 
LAWN GNOMES 

Goosebumps - 34 
R.L. Stine 



1 


Clack, Clack, Clack. 

The Ping-Pong ball clattered over the basement floor. “Yes!” I cried as I 
watched Mindy chase after it. 

It was a hot, sticky June afternoon. The first Monday of summer vacation. 
And Joe Burton had just made another excellent shot. 

That’s me. Joe Burton. I’m twelve. And there is nothing I love better than 
slamming the ball in my older sister’s face and making her chase after it. 

I’m not a bad sport. I just like to show Mindy that she’s not as great as she 
thinks she is. 

You might guess that Mindy and I do not always agree on things. The fact 
is, I’m really not like anyone else in my family. 

Mindy, Mom, and Dad are all blond, skinny, and tall. I have brown hair. 
And I’m kind of pudgy and short. Mom says I haven’t had my growth spurt yet. 

So I’m a shrimp. And it’s hard for me to see over the Ping-Pong net. But I 
can still beat Mindy with one hand tied behind my back. 

As much as I love to win, Mindy hates to lose. And she doesn’t play fair at 
all. Every time I make a great move, she says it doesn’t count. 

“Joe, kicking the ball over the net is not legal,” she whined as she scooped 
out the ball from under the couch. 

“Give me a break!” I cried. “All the Ping-Pong champions do it. They call it 
the Soccer Slam.” 

Mindy rolled her huge green eyes. “Oh, puh-lease!” she muttered. “My 
serve.” 

Mindy is weird. She’s probably the weirdest fourteen-year-old in town. 

Why? I’ll tell you why. 

Take her room. Mindy arranges all her books in alphabetical order—by 
author. Do you believe it? 

And she fills out a card for each one. She files them in the top drawer of her 
desk. Her own private card catalog. 

If she could, she’d probably cut the tops off the books so they’d be all the 
same size. 

She is so organized. Her closet is organized by color. All the reds come 



first. Then the oranges. Then the yellows. Then come the greens, blues, and 
purples. She hangs her clothes in the same order as the rainbow. 

And at dinner, she eats around her plate clockwise. Really! I’ve watched 
her. First her mashed potatoes. Then all her peas. And then her meat loaf. If she 
finds one pea in her mashed potatoes, she totally loses it! 

Weird. Really weird. 

Me? I’m not organized. I’m cool. I’m not serious like my sister. I can be 
pretty funny. My friends think I’m a riot. Everyone does. Except Mindy. 

“Come on, serve already,” I called out. “Before the end of the century.” 

Mindy stood on her side of the table, carefully lining up her shot. She 
stands in exactly the same place every time. With her feet exactly the same space 
apart. Her footprints are worn into the carpet. 

“Ten-eight and serving,” Mindy finally called out. She always calls out the 
score before she serves. Then she swung her arm back. 

I held the paddle up to my mouth like a microphone. “She pulls her arm 
back,” I announced. “The crowd is hushed. It’s a tense moment.” 

“Joe, stop acting like a jerk,” she snapped. “I have to concentrate.” 

I love pretending I’m a sports announcer. It drives Mindy nuts. 

Mindy pulled her arm back again. She tossed the Ping-Pong ball up into the 
air. And... 

“A spider!” I screamed. “On your shoulder!” 

“Yaaaiiii!” Mindy dropped the paddle and began slapping her shoulder 
furiously. The ball clattered onto the table. 

“Gotcha!” I cried. “My point.” 

“No way!” Mindy shouted angrily. “You’re just a cheater, Joe.” She 
smoothed the shoulders of her pink T-shirt carefully. She picked up the ball and 
swatted it over the net. 

“At least I’m a funny cheater!” I replied. I twirled around in a complete 
circle and belted the ball. It bounced once on my side before sailing over the net. 

“Foul,” Mindy announced. “You’re always fouling.” 

I waved my paddle at her. “Get a life,” I said. “It’s a game. It’s supposed to 
be fun.” 

“I’m beating you,” Mindy replied. “That’s fun.” 

I shrugged. “Who cares? Winning isn’t everything.” 

“Where did you read that?” she asked. “In a bubble gum comic?” Then she 
rolled her eyes again. I think someday her eyes are going to roll right out of her 



head! 

I rolled my eyes, too—back into my head until only the whites showed. 
“Neat trick, huh?” 

“Cute, Joe,” Mindy muttered. “Really cute. You’d better watch out. One 
day your eyes might not come back down. Which would be an improvement!” 

“Lame joke,” I replied. “Very lame.” 

Mindy lined up her feet carefully again. 

“She’s in her serve position,” I spoke into my paddle. “She’s nervous. 
She’s...” 

“Joe!” Mindy whined. “Quit it!” 

She tossed the Ping-Pong ball into the air. She swung the paddle, and— 

“Gross!” I shouted. “What’s that big green glob hanging out of your nose?” 

Mindy ignored me this time. She tapped the ball over the net. 

I dove forward and whacked it with the tip of my paddle. It spun high over 
the net and landed in the corner of the basement. Between the washing machine 
and the dryer. 

Mindy jogged after the ball on her long, thin legs. “Hey, where’s Buster?” 
she called out. “Wasn’t he sleeping next to the dryer?” 

Buster is our dog. A giant black Rottweiler with a head the size of a 
basketball. He loves snoozing on the old sleeping bag we keep in the corner of 
the basement. Especially when we’re down here playing Ping-Pong. 

Everyone is afraid of Buster. For about three seconds. Then he starts licking 
them with his long, wet tongue. Or rolls onto his back and begs to have his belly 
scratched. 

“Where is he, Joe?” Mindy bit her lip. 

“He’s around here somewhere,” I replied. “Why are you always worrying 
about Buster? He weighs over a hundred pounds. He can take care of himself.” 

Mindy frowned. “Not if Mr. McCall catches him. Remember what he said 
the last time Buster chomped on his tomato plants?” 

Mr. McCall is our next-door neighbor. Buster loves the McCalls’ yard. He 
likes to nap under their huge, shady elm tree. 

And dig little holes all over their lawn. And sometimes big holes. 

And snack in their vegetable garden. 

Last year, Buster dug up every head of Mr. McCall’s lettuce. And ate his 
biggest zucchini plant for dessert. 

I guess that’s why Mr. McCall hates Buster. He said the next time he 



catches him in his garden, he’s going to turn him into fertilizer. 

My dad and Mr. McCall are the two best gardeners in town. They’re nuts 
about gardening. Totally nuts. 

I think working in a garden is kind of fun, too. But I don’t let that get 
around. My friends think gardening is for nerds. 

Dad and Mr. McCall are always battling it out at the annual garden show. 
Mr. McCall usually takes first place. But last year, Dad and I won the blue 
ribbon for our tomatoes. 

That drove Mr. McCall crazy. When Dad’s name was announced, Mr. 
McCall’s face turned as red as our tomatoes. 

So Mr. McCall is desperate to win this year. He started stocking up on plant 
food and bug spray months ago. 

And he planted something that nobody else in North Bay grows. Strange 
orange-green melons called casabas. 

Dad says that Mr. McCall has made a big mistake. He says the casabas will 
never grow any bigger than tennis balls. The growing season in Minnesota is too 
short. 

“McCall’s garden loses,” I declared. “Our tomatoes are definitely going to 
win again this year. And thanks to my special soil, they’ll grow as big as beach 
balls!” 

“So will your head,” Mindy shot back. 

I stuck out my tongue and crossed my eyes. It seemed like a good reply. 

“Whose serve is it?” I asked. Mindy was taking so long, I lost track. 

“It’s still my serve,” she replied, carefully placing her feet. 

We were interrupted by footsteps. Heavy, booming footsteps on the stairs 
behind Mindy. 

“Who is that?” Mindy cried. 

And then he appeared behind her. And my eyes nearly bulged right out of 
my head. 

“Oh, no!” I screamed. “It’s... McCall!” 



2 


“Joe!” he roared. The floor shook as he stomped toward Mindy. 

All the color drained from Mindy’s face. Her hand grasped her paddle so 
tightly that her knuckles turned white. She tried to swing around to look behind 
her, but she couldn’t. Her feet were frozen in her Ping-Pong-ball footprints. 

McCall’s hands balled into two huge fists, and he looked really, really 
angry. 

“I’m going to get you. And this time I’m going to win. Throw me a 
paddle.” 

“You jerk!” Mindy sputtered. “I-I knew it wasn’t Mr. McCall. I knew it was 
Moose.” 

Moose is Mr. McCall’s son and my best friend. His real name is Michael, 
but everyone calls him Moose. Even his parents. 

Moose is the biggest kid in the whole sixth grade. And the strongest. His 
legs are as thick as tree trunks. And so is his neck. And he’s very, very loud. Just 
like his dad. 

Mindy can’t stand Moose. She says he’s a gross slob. 

I think he’s cool. 

“Yo, Joe!” Moose bellowed. “Where’s my paddle?” His big arm muscles 
bulged as he reached out to grab mine. 

I pulled my hand back. But his beefy hand slapped my shoulder so hard that 
my head nearly rolled off. 

“Whoaaa!” I yelped. 

Moose let out a deep laugh that shook the basement walls. And then he 
ended it with a burp. 

“Moose, you’re disgusting,” Mindy groaned. 

Moose scratched his dark brown crew cut. “Gee, thanks, Mindy.” 

“Thanks for what?” she demanded. 

“For this.” He reached out and snatched the paddle right out of her hand. 

Moose swung Mindy’s paddle around wildly in the air. He missed a 
hanging lamp by an inch. “Ready for a real game, Joe?” 

He threw the Ping-Pong ball into the air and drew his powerful arm back. 
Wham! The ball rocketed across the room. It bounced off two walls and flew 



back over the net toward me. 

“Foul!” Mindy cried. “That’s not allowed.” 

“Cool!” I exclaimed. I dove for the ball and missed. Moose has an amazing 
serve. 

Moose slammed the ball again. It shot over the net and whacked me in the 
chest. 

Thwock! 

“Hey!” I cried. I rubbed the stinging spot. 

“Good shot, huh?” He grinned. 

“Yeah. But you’re supposed to hit the table,” I told him. 

Moose pumped his fat fists into the air. “Super Moose!” he bellowed. 
“Strong as a superhero!” 

My friend Moose is a pretty wild guy. Mindy says he’s a total animal. I 
think he’s just got a lot of enthusiasm. 

I served while he was still throwing his arms around. 

“Hey! No fair!” he declared. Moose charged the table and clobbered the 
ball. And flattened it into a tiny white pancake. 

I groaned. “That’s ball number fifteen for this month,” I announced. 

I grabbed the little pancake and tossed it into a blue plastic milk crate on the 
floor. The crate was piled high with dozens of flattened Ping-Pong balls. 

“Hey! I think you broke your record!” I declared. 

“All right!” Moose exclaimed. He leaped on top of the Ping-Pong table and 
began jumping up and down. “Super Moose!” he yelled. 

“Stop it, you jerk!” Mindy screamed. “You’re going to break the table.” She 
covered her face with her hands. 

“Super Moose! Super Moose!” he chanted. 

The Ping-Pong table swayed. Then it sagged under his weight. He was even 
starting to get on my nerves now. “Moose, get off! Get off!” I wailed. 

“Who’s going to make me?” he demanded. 

Then we all heard a loud, sharp craaaaack. 

“You’re breaking it!” Mindy shrieked. “Get off!” 

Moose scrambled off the table. He lurched toward me, holding his hands 
straight out like the zombie monster we’d seen in Killer Zombie from Planet 
Zero on TV. “Now I’m going to destroy you!” 

Then he hurled himself at me. 

As he smashed into me, I staggered back and fell onto the dusty cement 



floor. 

Moose jumped onto my stomach and pinned me down. “Say ‘Moose’s 
tomatoes are the best!’ ” he ordered. He bounced up and down on my chest. 

“Moo... Moose’s,” I wheezed. “Tomat... I can’t... breathe... really... 
help.” 

“Say it!” Moose insisted. He placed his powerful hands around my neck. 
And squeezed. 

“Ugggggh,” I gagged. I couldn’t breathe. I couldn’t move. 

My head rolled to the side. 

“Moose!” I heard Mindy shriek. “Let him go! Let him go! What have you 
done to him?” 



3 


“M-Miiindy,” I moaned. 

Moose pulled his hands from my throat and lifted his powerful body off my 
chest. 

“What did you do to him—you big monster?” Mindy shrieked. She knelt 
down by my side and bent over me. She brushed my hair from my eyes. 

“Y-you’re a... a...” I stopped and coughed weakly. 

“What, Joe? What is it?” Mindy demanded softly. 

“You’re a SUCKER!” I exclaimed. And burst out laughing. 

Mindy jerked her head back. “You little weasel!” 

“Tricked you! Tricked you!” I cheered. 

“Way to go, dude!” Moose grinned. 

I scrambled to my feet and slapped Moose a high five. “Suc-ker! Suc-ker!” 
we chanted over and over. 

Mindy folded her skinny arms in front of her and glared at us. “Not funny,” 
she snapped. “I’m never going to believe another word you say! Never!” 

“Oh, I’m sooooo scared!” I said. I knocked my knees together. “See? My 
knees are trembling.” 

“I’m shaking, too,” Moose joined in, wiggling his whole body. 

“You guys are totally juvenile,” she announced. “I’m out of here.” 

She slid her hands into the pockets of her white shorts and stomped away. 
But then she suddenly stopped a few feet from the stairs. 

In front of the high basement window. 

The window that looked out onto Mr. McCall’s front yard. 

She stared up through the window’s sheer white curtain for a second. She 
squinted her eyes. Then she cried out, “No! Oh, no!” 

“Nice try,” I replied, flicking a dust ball from the carpet in her direction. 
“There’s nothing out there. I’m not falling for your lame trick!” 

“No! It’s Buster!” Mindy cried. “He’s next door again!” 

“Huh?” I sprinted to the window. And jumped onto a chair. I yanked the 
filmy curtain aside. 

Yes. There sat Buster. In the middle of the vegetable patch that covered Mr. 



McCall’s front yard. “Oh, wow. He’s in the garden again,” I murmured. 

“My garden! He’d better not be!” Moose declared, stomping up behind me. 
He shoved me off the chair to take a look. “If my dad catches Buster in his 
vegetables, he’ll turn that big mutt into mulch!” 

“Come on! Hurry!” Mindy pleaded, tugging on my arm. “We have to get 
Buster out of there. Right away. Before Moose’s dad catches him!” 

Moose, Mindy, and I raced upstairs and out the front door. We charged 
across our front lawn, toward the McCalls’ house. 

At the edge of our lawn, we leaped across the line of yellow and white 
petunias that Dad had planted. It separates our yard from the McCalls’ garden. 

Mindy squeezed her fingernails deep into my arm. “Buster’s digging!” she 
cried. “He’s going to destroy—the melons!” 

Buster’s powerful front paws worked hard. He scraped at the dirt and green 
plants. Mud and leaves flew everywhere. 

“Stop that, Buster!” Mindy pleaded. “Stop that—now!” 

Buster kept digging. 

Moose glanced at his plastic wristwatch. “You’d better get that dog out of 
there fast,” he warned. “It’s almost six o’clock. My dad comes out to water the 
garden at six sharp.” 

I’m terrified of Mr. McCall. I admit it. He’s so big, he makes Moose look 
like a shrimp! And he’s mean. 

“Buster, get over here!” I begged. Mindy and I both shouted to the dog. 

But Buster ignored our cries. 

“Don’t just stand there. Why don’t you pull that dumb mutt out of there?” 
Moose demanded. 

I shook my head. “We can’t! He’s too big. And stubborn. He won’t budge.” 

I reached under my T-shirt and searched for the shiny metal dog whistle I 
wear on a cord around my neck. I wear it day and night. Even under my 
pajamas. It’s the only thing Buster will obey. 

“It’s two minutes to six,” Moose warned, checking his watch. “Dad will be 
out here any second!” 

“Blow the whistle, Joe!” Mindy cried. 

I brought the whistle up to my mouth. And gave a long, hard blow. 

Moose snickered. “That whistle’s broken,” he said. “It didn’t make a 
sound.” 

“It’s a dog whistle,” Mindy replied in a superior tone. “It makes a really 



high-pitched sound. Dogs can hear them, but people can’t. See?” 

She pointed to Buster. He had lifted his nose out of the dirt and pricked up 
his ears. 

I blew the whistle again. Buster shook the dirt from his fur. 

“Thirty seconds and counting,” Moose told us. 

I blew the silent dog whistle one more time. 

Yes! 

Buster came trotting slowly toward us, wagging his stumpy tail. 

“Hurry, Buster!” I pleaded. “Hurry!” I held my arms open wide. 

“Buster—run—don’t trot!” Mindy begged. 

Too late. 

We heard a loud slam. 

Moose’s front door flew open. 

And Mr. McCall stepped out. 



4 


“Joe! Come over here. Now!” Moose’s dad barked at me. 

He lumbered toward his garden, his big belly bouncing in front of him 
under his blue T-shirt. “Get over here, boy—on the double!” 

Mr. McCall is retired from the army. He’s used to barking out orders. And 
having them obeyed. 

I obeyed. Buster trotted by my side. 

“Was that dog in my garden again?” Mr. McCall demanded, eyeing me 
coldly. His cold stare could make your blood freeze. 

“No, s-sir! ” I stammered. Buster settled down beside me with a loud yawn. 

I usually don’t tell lies. Except to Mindy. But Buster’s life was on the line. I 
had to save Buster. Didn’t I? 

Mr. McCall bounced up to his vegetable patch. He circled his tomatoes, his 
corn, his zucchini, his casaba melons. He examined each stalk and leaf carefully. 

Oh, wow, I thought. We’re in major trouble now. 

Finally, he gazed up at us. His eyes narrowed. “If that mutt wasn’t in here, 
why is the dirt all pawed up?” 

“Maybe it was the wind?” I replied softly. It was worth a try. Maybe he’d 
believe it. 

Moose stood silently next to me. The only time he’s quiet is when his dad is 
around. 

“Um, Mr. McCall,” Mindy began. “We’ll make sure Buster stays out of 
your yard. We promise!” Then she smiled her sweetest smile. 

Mr. McCall scowled. “All right. But if I catch him even sniffing at my 
melons, I’m calling the police and having that dog hauled off to the pound. And I 
mean it.” 

I gulped. I knew he meant it. Mr. McCall doesn’t kid around. 

“Moose!” Mr. McCall snapped. “Bring the hose out here and water these 
casabas! I told you they need to be watered at least five times a day.” 

“See you later,” Moose muttered. He ducked his head and ran toward the 
back of his house for the hose. 

Mr. McCall shot one more dark glance at us. Then he lumbered up his front 
steps and slammed the door. 



“Maybe it was the wind?” Mindy rolled her eyes again. “Wow, that was fast 
thinking, Joe!” She laughed. 

“Oh, yeah? Well, at least I had an answer,” I replied. “And remember, it 
was my whistle that saved Buster. All you did was smile that phony smile.” 

Mindy and I headed toward our house, arguing all the way. But we stopped 
when we heard a low moan. A frightening sound. Buster cocked his ears. 

“Who’s that?” I whispered. 

A second later, we found out. Dad lurched around the side of the house, 
carrying a big watering can. 

He was wearing his favorite gardening outfit—sneakers with holes in both 
toes, baggy plaid shorts, and a red T-shirt that said “I’m All Thumbs in the 
Garden.” 

And he was moaning and groaning. Which was really weird. Because Dad 
is always in an excellent mood when he’s gardening. Whistling. Smiling. 
Cracking lame jokes. 

But not today. 

Today something was wrong. Really wrong. 

“Kids... kids,” he moaned, staggering toward us. “I’ve been looking for 
you.” 

“Dad—what is it? What’s wrong?” Mindy demanded. 

Dad clutched his head and swayed from side to side. He took a deep breath. 
“I-I have something terrible to tell you.” 



5 


“What, Dad?” I cried. “Tell us.” 

Dad spoke in a hoarse whisper. “I found a... a fruit fly on our tomatoes! On 
our biggest tomato. The Red Queen!” 

He wiped his sweaty forehead. “How could this happen? I misted. I 
sprayed. I pruned. Twice this week alone.” 

Dad shook his head in sorrow. “My poor tomatoes. If that fruit fly ruins my 
Red Queen, I-IT1 have to pull out of the garden show!” 

Mindy and I glanced at each other. I knew we were thinking the same thing. 
The adults around here were getting a little weird. 

“Dad, it’s only one fruit fly,” I pointed out. 

“It only takes one, Joe. Just one fruit fly. And our chances for a blue ribbon 
—destroyed. We have to do something. Right away.” 

“What about that new bug spray?” I reminded him. “The stuff that came 
last week from the Green Thumb catalog.” 

Dad’s eyes lit up. He ran a hand through his flat, rumpled hair. “The Bug Be 
Gone!” he exclaimed. 

He jogged up the driveway to the garage. “Come on, kids!” he sang out. 
“Let’s give it a try!” Dad was cheering up. 

Mindy and I raced after him. 

Dad pulled out three spray cans from a carton in the back of the garage. The 
words “Wave Bye-Bye to Bugs with Bug Be Gone!” were printed on the labels. 
A drawing showed a tearful bug carrying a suitcase. Waving bye-bye. 

Dad handed one can to Mindy and one to me. “Let’s get that fruit fly!” he 
cried, as we headed back to our garden. 

We ripped the caps off the cans of Bug Be Gone. “One, two, three... spray!” 
Dad commanded. 

Dad and I showered the two dozen tomato plants tied to wooden stakes in 
the middle of the garden. 

Mindy hadn’t started yet. She was probably reading the ingredients on the 

can. 

“What’s all the fuss about?” my mother called, stepping out the back door. 
Mom was wearing one of her around-the-house outfits. A pair of Dad’s old 



baggy plaid shorts. And an old blue T-shirt he gave her when he came back from 
a business trip a few years ago. The T-shirt said “I Mist You!” One of Dad’s 
lame garden jokes. 

“Hi, honey,” Dad called. “We’re about to destroy a fruit fly. Want to 
watch?” 

Mom laughed, crinkling up the corners of her green eyes. “Pretty tempting. 
But I have to finish a greeting card design.” 

Mom is a graphic artist. She has an office on the second floor of our house. 
She can draw the most incredible pictures on her computer. Amazing sunsets, 
mountains, and flowers. 

“Dinner at seven-thirty, everybody. Okay?” 

“Sounds good,” Dad called as Mom disappeared into the house. “Okay, 
kids. Let’s finish spraying!” 

Dad and I showered the tomato plants one more time. We even sprayed the 
yellow squash plants nearby. Mindy squinted. Aimed the nozzle of her can 
directly at the Red Queen. And let out a single neat drizzle. 

One tiny fruit fly flapped its wings weakly and fell to the ground. Mindy 
smiled in satisfaction. 

“Good work!” Dad exclaimed. 

He clapped us both on the back. “I think this calls for a celebration!” he 
declared. “I have the perfect idea! A quick visit to Lawn Lovely!” 

“Oh, nooooo,” Mindy and I groaned together. 

Lawn Lovely is a store two blocks from our house. It’s the place where Dad 
buys his lawn ornaments. A lot of lawn ornaments. 

Dad is as nuts about lawn ornaments as he is about gardening. We have so 
many lawn ornaments in our front yard, it’s impossible to mow the lawn! 

What a crowd scene! We have two pink plastic flamingos. A cement angel 
with huge white wings. A chrome ball on a silver platform. A whole family of 
plaster skunks. A fountain with two kissing swans. A seal that balances a beach 
ball on its nose. And a chipped plaster deer. 

Weird, huh? 

But Dad really loves them. He thinks they’re art or something. 

And do you know what he does? He dresses them up on holidays. Pilgrim 
hats for the skunks on Thanksgiving. Pirate costumes for the flamingos on 
Halloween. Stove-pipe hats and little black beards for the swans on Lincoln’s 
birthday. 



Of course, neat and tidy Mindy can’t stand the lawn ornaments. Neither can 
Mom. Every time Dad brings a new one home, Mom threatens to toss it into the 
garbage. 

“Dad, these lawn ornaments are totally embarrassing!” Mindy complained. 
“People gawk from their cars and take pictures of our front yard. We’re a tourist 
attraction!” 

“Oh, please,” Dad groaned. “One person took a picture.” 

That was last Christmas. When Dad dressed all the ornaments as Santa’s 
helpers. 

“Yeah. And that picture ended up in the newspaper!” Mindy moaned. “It 
was soooo embarrassing.” 

“Well, I think the ornaments are cool,” I replied. Someone had to defend 
poor Dad. 

Mindy just wrinkled her nose in disgust. 

I know what really bugs Mindy about the ornaments. It’s the way Dad 
sticks them in the yard. Without any order. If Mindy had her way, they would be 
lined up like her shoes. In nice neat rows. 

“Come on, guys,” Dad urged, starting down the driveway. “Let’s go see if a 
new shipment of ornaments has come in.” 

We had no choice. 

Mindy and I trudged down the sidewalk after Dad. As we followed him, we 
thought—no big deal. It’s almost dinnertime. We’ll just glance over the 
ornaments at the store. Then we’ll go home. 

We had no idea we were about to start the most horrifying adventure of our 
lives. 



6 


“Can’t we drive, Dad?” Mindy complained as the three of us hiked up the steep 
Summit Avenue hill toward Lawn Lovely. “It’s too hot to walk.” 

“Oh, come on, Mindy. It’s only a couple of blocks. And it’s good exercise,” 
Dad replied, taking long, brisk strides. 

“But it’s sooooo hot,” Mindy whined. She brushed her bangs away from her 
face and blotted her forehead with her hand. 

Mindy was right. It was hot. But get serious. It was only a two-block walk. 

“I’m hotter than you are,” I teased. Then I leaned into Mindy and shook my 
sweaty head at her. “See?” 

A few small beads of sweat flew onto Mindy’s T-shirt. 

“You are so gross!” she shrieked, drawing back. “Dad! Tell him to stop 
being so disgusting.” 

“We’re almost there,” Dad replied. His voice sounded as if he were a 
million miles away. He was probably dreaming about buying his next lawn 
ornament. 

Just up the block, I spotted the tall, pointy roof of Lawn Lovely. It jutted 
into the sky, towering over all the houses around it. 

What a weird place, I thought. Lawn Lovely is in an old, raggedy three- 
story house, set back from the street. The whole building is painted pink. Bright 
pink. The windows are covered with brightly colored shutters. But none of the 
colors match. 

I think that’s another reason why Mindy hates this place. 

The old house is not in good shape. The wooden floorboards on the front 
porch are all sagging. And there is a hole in the porch where Mr. McCall fell 
through last summer. 

As we marched past the flagpole in the front yard, I spotted Mrs. Anderson 
in the driveway. She owns Lawn Lovely. She lives there, too. On the second and 
third floors. 

Mrs. Anderson kneeled over a flock of pink plastic flamingos. She was 
ripping off their plastic wrap and setting them in crooked rows on her lawn. 

Mrs. Anderson reminds me of a flamingo. She’s real skinny and wears pink 
all the time. Even her hair is sort of pink. Like cotton candy. 



Lawn ornaments are the only things Mrs. Anderson sells. Plaster squirrels. 
Kissing angels. Pink rabbits with wire whiskers. Long green worms wearing 
little black hats. A whole flock of white geese. She has hundreds of ornaments. 
Scattered all over her yard. Up the front steps to the porch. And right through the 
door into the entire first floor of the house. 

Mrs. Anderson carefully unwrapped another flamingo and set it down next 
to a deer. She studied this arrangement, then moved the deer about an inch to the 
left. 

“Hello, Lilah!” my dad called out. 

Mrs. Anderson didn’t answer. She’s a little hard of hearing. 

“Hello, Lilah!” Dad repeated, cupping his hands around his mouth like a 
megaphone. 

Mrs. Anderson raised her head from the flamingos. And beamed at my dad. 
“Jeffrey!” she cried. “How nice to see you.” 

Mrs. Anderson is always friendly to Dad. Mom says he’s her best customer. 

Maybe her only customer! 

“It’s nice to see you, too,” Dad replied. He rubbed his hands together 
eagerly and gazed around the lawn. 

Mrs. Anderson stuck one last flamingo into the ground. She made her way 
over to us, wiping her hands on her pink T-shirt. 

“Do you have something special in mind today?” she asked my father. 

“Our deer is a little lonesome,” he explained, shouting so that she could 
hear him. “I think it needs company.” 

“Really, Dad. We don’t need any more lawn ornaments,” Mindy begged. 
“Mom will be furious.” 

Mrs. Anderson smiled. “Oh, a Lawn Lovely lawn always has room for one 
more! Right, Jeffrey?” 

“Right!” Dad declared. 

Mindy pressed her lips together tightly. She rolled her eyes for the 
hundredth time that day. 

Dad hurried over to a herd of wide-eyed plaster deer, standing in the corner 
of the yard. We followed him. 

The deer stood about four feet tall. White spots dotted their reddish-brown 
bodies. 

Very lifelike. Very boring. 

He studied the deer for a few seconds. Then something caught his eye. 



Two squat gnomes standing in the middle of the lawn. 

“Well, well, what have we here?” Dad murmured, smiling. I could see his 
eyes light up. He bent down to examine the gnomes. 

Mrs. Anderson clapped her hands together. “Jeffrey, you have a wonderful 
eye for lawn ornaments!” she exclaimed. “I knew you’d appreciate the gnomes! 
They were carved in Europe. Very fine work.” 

I stared at the gnomes. They looked like little old men. They were about 
three feet tall and very chubby. With piercing red eyes and large pointy ears. 

Their mouths curved up in wide, silly grins. And coarse brown hair 
sprouted from their heads. 

Each gnome wore a bright green short-sleeved shirt, brown leggings, and a 
tall, pointy orange hat. Both wore black belts tied tightly around their chubby 
waists. 

“They’re terrific!” Dad gushed. “Oh, kids. Aren’t they wonderful?” 

“They’re okay, Dad,” I said. 

“Okay?” Mindy shouted. “They’re horrible ! They’re so gross! They look 
so... so evil. I hate them!” 

“Hey, you’re right, Mindy,” I said. “They are pretty gross. They look just 
like you!” 

“Joe, you are the biggest—” Mindy started. But Dad interrupted her. 

“We’ll take them!” he cried. 

“Dad—no!” Mindy howled. “They’re hideous! Buy a deer. Buy another 
flamingo. But not these ugly old gnomes. Look at the awful colors. Look at 
those evil grins. They’re too creepy!” 

“Oh, Mindy. Don’t be silly. They’re perfect!” Dad exclaimed. “We’ll have 
so much fun with them. We’ll dress them as ghosts for Halloween. In Santa suits 
at Christmas. They look just like Santa’s elves.” 

Dad pulled out his credit card. He and Mrs. Anderson started toward the 
pink house to complete the sale. “I’ll be back in a minute,” he called. 

“These are the ugliest yet,” Mindy groaned, turning to me. “They’re 
completely embarrassing. I’ll never be able to bring any of my friends over 
again.” 

Then she stomped off toward the sidewalk. 

I couldn’t take my eyes away from the gnomes. They were kind of ugly. 
And even though they were smiling, there was something unfriendly about their 
smiles. Something cold about their glassy red eyes. 



“Whoa! Mindy! Look!” I cried. “One of the gnomes just moved!” 

Mindy slowly turned to face me. 

My wrist was held tightly in the chubby hand. I twisted and squirmed. Tried 
to tug free. 

“Let go!” I squealed. “Let go of me! Mindy—hurry!” 

“I—I’m coming!” she cried. 



7 


Mindy came racing across the yard. 

She leaped over the flamingos and sprinted around the deer. 

“Hurry!” I moaned, stretching my left arm out toward her. “He’s hurting 

me!” 

But as my sister came near, her face twisted in fright, I couldn’t keep a 
straight face any longer. I burst out laughing. 

“Gotcha! Gotcha!” I shrieked. I danced away from the plaster gnome. 

Mindy swung around to slug me. Swung and missed. 

“Did you really believe that gnome grabbed me?” I cried. “Are you totally 
losing it?” 

She didn’t have time to reply. Dad came jogging down the pink porch steps. 
“Time to bring our little guys home,” he announced, grinning. 

He stopped and stared down happily at the ugly gnomes. “But let’s name 
them first.” Dad names all of our lawn ornaments. 

Mindy let out a loud groan. Dad ignored her. 

He patted one of the gnomes on the head. “Let’s call this one Hap. Because 
he looks so happy! I’ll carry Hap. You kids take...” 

He stopped and squinted at the other gnome. There was a small chip on the 
gnome’s front tooth. “Chip. Yep, we’ll call this one Chip.” 

Dad hoisted Hap into his arms. “Whoaaa. He’s an armful!” He made his 
way toward the driveway, staggering under the gnome’s weight. 

Mindy studied Chip. “You take the feet. I’ll grab the top,” she ordered. 
“Come on. One, two, three... lift!” 

I stooped down and grabbed the gnome by its legs. Its heavy red boot 
scraped my arm. I let out a cry. 

“Quit complaining,” Mindy ordered. “At least you don’t have this stupid 
pointy hat sticking in your face.” 

We struggled down the hill, following Dad. 

Mindy and I inched forward, struggling side by side. “Everyone in the 
neighborhood is gawking at us,” Mindy moaned. 

They were. Two girls from Mindy’s school, wheeling their bikes up the hill, 
stopped and stared. Then they burst out laughing. 



Mindy’s pale face grew as red as one of Dad’s tomatoes. “I’ll never live this 
down,” she grumbled. “Come on, Joe. Walk faster.” 

I jiggled Chip’s legs to make Mindy lose her grip. But the only thing she 
lost was her temper. “Quit it, Joe,” she snapped. “And hold your end up higher.” 

As we neared our house, Mr. McCall spotted us trudging up the block. He 
stopped pruning his shrubs to admire our little parade. 

“More lawn ornaments, Jeffrey?” he called out to Dad. I could hear him 
chuckling. 

Mr. McCall is mean to Mindy and me. But he and Dad get along fine. 
They’re always kidding each other about their gardens. 

Mrs. McCall poked her head out the front door. “Cute!” she called out, 
smiling at us from under her white baseball cap. “Come on in, Bill. Your brother 
is on the phone.” 

Mr. McCall set his pruning sheers down and went inside. 

We lugged Chip past the McCall driveway and followed Dad into our front 

yard. 

“Over here!” Dad instructed as he set Hap down in the far corner of the 
yard. Next to Deer-lilah. Deer-lilah is the deer. Dad named her after Lilah from 
Lawn Lovely. 

With our last bit of strength, we dragged Chip over to Dad. These gnomes 
were heavy. They weighed a lot more than our other ornaments. 

Mindy and I plopped the gnome down on the grass and collapsed in the dirt 
next to him. 

Whistling happily, Dad set Chip on one side of the deer. And Hap on the 
other. 

He stepped back to study them. “What cheerful little guys!” he declared. 
“I’ve got to show your mom. She won’t be able to resist them! They’re too cute 
to hate!” 

He hurried across the lawn and into the house. 

“Yo!” I heard a familiar cry from next door. Moose jogged across his 
driveway. “I hear you have some ugly new lawn things.” 

He charged up to the gnomes and stared. “Way ugly,” he boomed. 

Moose leaned down and stuck his tongue out at Hap. “You want to fight, 
shrimp?” he asked the little statue. “Take that!” He pretended to punch Hap in 
his chubby chest. 

“Wreck the runt!” I cried. 



Moose grabbed the gnome around his waist and gave him a dozen quick 
punches. 

I scrambled to my feet. “I’ll wipe that ugly grin off your face!” I yelled at 
Chip. I closed my hands around the gnome’s neck and pretended to choke him. 

“Watch this!” Moose shot out a thick leg and karate-kicked Hap in his small 
pointy hat. The squat figure wobbled. 

“Careful! Stop messing around!” Mindy warned. “You’re going to break 
them.” 

“Okay,” I said. “Let’s tickle them!” 

“Tickle, tickle!” Moose squeaked as he tickled Hap under the armpits. 

“You’re a riot, Moose,” Mindy declared. “Areal—” 

Moose and I waited for Mindy to finish insulting us. But instead, she 
pointed to the McCalls’ garden and screamed, “Oh, no! Buster!” 

Moose and I spun around and spied Buster. In the middle of Mr. McCall’s 
garden, pawing away at the green stalks. 

“Buster! No!” I screamed. 

I grabbed the dog whistle and raised it to my mouth. But before I could 
blow, Mr. McCall exploded out of his front door! 

“That stupid mutt again!” he shouted, waving his arms wildly. “Get out of 
here! Shoo!” 

Buster whimpered, turned, and trotted back to our yard, head down, stumpy 
tail between his legs. 

Uh-oh, I thought, studying Mr. McCall’s angry face. We’re in for trouble 

now. 

But before Mr. McCall could start lecturing us, Dad pushed the front door 
open. “Kids, your mother says that dinner is almost ready.” 

“Jeffrey, are you deliberately sending that mutt over to ruin my melons?” 
Mr. McCall called. 

Dad grinned. “Buster can’t help it,” he replied. “He keeps mistaking your 
melons for golf balls! ” 

“Are those tomatoes you’re growing?” Moose’s dad shot back. “Or are they 
olives?” 

“Didn’t you see the tomato I rolled into the house yesterday?” Dad replied. 
“I had to use a wheelbarrow!” 

Buster danced around the yard. I think somehow he knew he had escaped 
big trouble. 



We started for the house. But I stopped when I heard a heavy thud. 

I whirled around to discover Hap lying face down in the grass. 

Buster busily licked his face. 

“Bad dog,” Dad scolded. I don’t think Dad likes Buster any more than Mr. 
McCall does. “Did you knock that gnome over? Get away from there!” 

“Buster—come here, boy!” I called. But he ignored me and licked at the 
face more furiously than ever. 

I brought my dog whistle to my lips and gave one quick short blow. Buster 
raised his head, alert to the sound. He forgot about the plaster gnome and trotted 
over to me. 

“Joe, pick Hap up, will you?” Dad demanded, annoyed. 

Mindy held onto Buster. I grabbed the gnome by his shoulders and slowly 
heaved him to his feet. Then I checked for damage. 

Legs. Arms. Neck. Everything seemed okay. 

I raised my eyes to Hap’s face. 

And jumped back in surprise. 

I blinked a few times. And stared at the gnome again. 

“I—I don’t believe it!” I murmured. 



8 


The gnome’s smile had vanished. 

Its mouth stood open wide, as if trying to scream. 

“Hey—!” I choked out. 

“What’s wrong?” Dad called. “Is it broken?” 

“Its smile!” I cried. “Its smile is gone! It looks scared or something!” 

Dad jumped down the steps and ran over. Moose and Mr. McCall joined 

him. 

Mindy walked slowly in my direction, with a suspicious scowl on her face. 
She probably thought I was playing another joke. 

“See?” I cried as everyone gathered around me. “It’s unbelievable!” 

“Ha-ha! Good one, Joe!” Moose burst out. He punched me in the shoulder. 
“Pretty funny.” 

“Huh?” I lowered my eyes to the little figure. 

Hap’s lips were curved up in a grin. The same silly grin he always wore. 
The terrified expression had disappeared. 

Dad let out a hearty laugh. “Good acting job, Joe,” he said. “You really 
fooled us all.” 

“Maybe your son should be an actor,” Mr. McCall said, scratching his head. 
“He didn’t fool me,” Mindy bragged. “That one was lame. Really lame.” 
What had happened? Had I imagined that open mouth? 

Mr. McCall turned to Buster. “Listen, Jeffrey,” he started. “I’m serious 
about that dog of yours. If he comes into my garden again...” 

“If Buster goes over there again, I promise we’ll tie him up,” Dad replied. 
“Aw, Dad,” I said. “You know Buster hates to be tied up. He hates it!” 
“Sorry, kids,” Dad said, turning to go inside. “That’s it. Buster gets one 
more chance.” 

I bent down to pet Buster’s head. “Only one more chance, boy,” I 
whispered in his ear. “Did you hear that? You only get one more chance.” 

I woke up the next morning and squinted at the clock radio on my night table. 
Eight A.M. Tuesday. The second day of summer vacation. Excellent! 



I threw on my purple-and-white Vikings jersey and my gym shorts and ran 
downstairs. Time to mow the lawn. 

Dad and I had an agreement. If I mowed the lawn once a week all summer, 
Dad would buy me a new bike. 

I knew exactly which model I wanted, too. Twenty-one gears and really fat 
tires. The coolest mountain bike ever. I’d be able to fly over boulders! 

I let myself out the front door and raised my face to the warm morning sun. 
It felt pretty good. The grass shimmered, still covered with dew. 

“Joe!” I heard a loud bellow. 

Mr. McCall’s bellow. “Get over here!” 

Mr. McCall leaned over his vegetable patch. An angry red vein throbbed in 
his forehead. 

Oh, no, I thought as I edged toward him. What now? 

“I’ve had it,” he roared. “If you don’t tie that dog up, I’m calling the police! 
I mean it!” 

Mr. McCall pointed to the ground. One of his casaba melons lay in the dirt, 
broken into jagged pieces. Melon seeds were scattered everywhere. And most of 
the orange fruit had been eaten away. 

I opened my mouth, but no sound came out. I didn’t know what to say. 
Lucky for me, Dad showed up just in time. He was on his way to work. 

“Is my son giving you some gardening advice, Bill?” he asked. 

“No jokes today!” Mr. McCall snapped. He scooped up the broken pieces of 
melon and shoved them in my dad’s face. “See what your wild dog has done! 
Now I have only four melons left!” 

Dad turned to me. His expression grew stern. “I warned you, Joe! I told you 
to keep the dog in our yard.” 

“But Buster didn’t do this,” I protested. “He doesn’t even like melons!” 

Buster skulked around behind the flamingos. His ears drooped flat against 
his head. His tail hung low between his legs. He looked really guilty. 

“Well, who else could have done it?” Mr. McCall demanded. 

Dad shook his head. “Joe, I want you to tie Buster up in the back. Now!” 

I saw that I had no choice. No way I could argue. 

“Okay, Dad,” I mumbled. I shuffled across the lawn and grabbed Buster’s 
collar. I hauled him to the corner of the back yard and sat him next to his red 
cedar doghouse. “Stay!” I commanded. 

I rummaged through the garage until I found a long piece of rope. Then I 



tied Buster to the tall oak tree next to his doghouse. 

Buster whimpered. He really hates being tied up. 

“I’m sorry, boy,” I whispered. “I know you didn’t eat that melon.” 

Buster pricked up his ears as Dad came around back to make sure I had tied 
the dog up. “It’s just as well that Buster is tied up today,” he said. “The painters 
are starting on the house this afternoon. Buster would only be in their way.” 

“Painters?” I asked in surprise. Nobody told me that painters were coming. 
I hate the smell of paint! 

Dad nodded. “They’re going to paint over that faded yellow,” he said, 
pointing to the house. “We’re having the house painted white with black trim.” 

“Dad, about Buster...” I started. 

Dad held up a hand to silence me. “I have to get to work. Keep him tied up. 
We’ll talk later.” I watched him make his way to the garage. 

This is all Mr. McCall’s fault, I thought. All of it! After Dad drove away, I 
stamped angrily into the garage and grabbed the lawn mower. I pushed the 
mower around the side of the house and into the front yard. Mindy sat on the 
front steps, reading. I rammed the mower forward. 

“I hate Mr. McCall!” I exclaimed. I shoved the mower around a flamingo. I 
felt like slicing off its skinny legs. “He is such a jerk. I’d like to smash the other 
four stupid melons!” I cried. “I’d love to wreck them all so Mr. McCall will 
leave us alone!” 

“Joe, get a grip,” Mindy called, peering up from her book. 

After I finished mowing, I ran into the house and grabbed a large plastic 
bag for the grass clippings. When I came back out, Moose was sprawled on our 
lawn. Several brightly colored plastic rings lay scattered on the grass around 
him. 

“Think fast!” he cried. He hurled a blue plastic ring at me. I dropped the 
bag and leaped for it. 

“Nice catch!” he said, scrambling to his feet. “How about a game of ring 
toss? We’ll use the gnomes’ pointy hats.” 

“How about using Mindy’s pointy head?” I replied. 

“You are so immature,” Mindy said. She stood and walked to the door. “I’m 
going to find some place quiet to read.” 

Moose handed me a few rings. He flung a purple one toward Hap. The ring 
slid neatly around the gnome’s hat. 

“What a throw!” he exclaimed. 



I took a ring and spun around like a discus thrower. I tossed two yellow 
rings at Chip. They slapped against the gnome’s fat face and slipped to the grass. 

Moose chuckled. “You throw like Mindy. Watch me!” He leaned forward 
and hurled two rings. They settled neatly around Chip’s pointy hat. 

“Yes!” Moose cried. He flexed his bulging muscles. “Super Moose rules 
again!” 

We tossed the rest of the rings. Moose beat me. But only by two points— 
ten to eight. 

“Rematch!” I cried. “Let’s play again!” 

I dashed over to the gnomes and gathered up the rings. As I pulled a 
handful from Chip’s hat, I stared into his face. 

And gasped. 

What was that? 

A seed. 

An orange seed about half an inch long. 

Stuck between the gnome’s fat lips. 



9 


“Is that a melon seed?” I asked, my voice trembling. 

“A what?” Moose stomped up behind me. 

“A melon seed,” I repeated. 

Moose shook his head. He clapped a big hand against my shoulder. “You’re 
seeing things,” he declared. “Come on, let’s play!” 

I pointed to Chip’s mouth. “I’m not seeing things. There! Right there! Don’t 
you see it?” 

Moose’s gaze followed my finger. “Yeah. I see a seed. So what?” 

“It’s a casaba melon seed, Moose. Like the ones scattered on the ground.” 

How could a casaba seed find its way into Chip’s mouth? 

There had to be an explanation. A simple explanation. 

I thought hard. I couldn’t think of one. 

I brushed the seed from the gnome’s lips and watched it flutter to the grass. 

Then I stared at the gnome’s grinning face. Into those cold, flat eyes. 

And the gnome stared back at me. I shivered in the heat. 

How did that seed get there? I wondered. How? 

I dreamed about melons that night. I dreamed that a casaba melon grew in our 
front yard. Grew and grew and grew. Bigger than our house. 

Something startled me out of my melon dream. I fumbled for my alarm 
clock. One A.M. 

Then I heard a howl. Alow, mournful howl. Outside the house. 

I jumped out of bed and hurried to the window. I peered into the shadowy 
front yard. The lawn ornaments stood in silence. 

I heard the howl again. Louder. Longer. 

It was Buster. My poor dog. Tied up in the back yard. 

I crept out of my room and down the dark hall. The house was quiet. I 
started down the carpeted stairs. 

A step squeaked under my foot. I jumped, startled. 

A second later, I heard another creak. 

My legs were shaking. 



Cool it, Joe, I told myself. It’s only the steps. 

I tiptoed through the darkened living room and into the kitchen. I heard 
low, rustling sound behind me. My heart started to pound. 

I whirled around. 

Nothing there. 

You’re hearing things, I told myself. 

I stumbled forward in the dark. Closed my hand around the doorknob. 

And two powerful hands grabbed me from behind! 



10 


“Where do you think you’re going?” 

Mindy! 

I breathed a sigh of relief. And yanked myself away from her grasp. 

“I’m going for a midnight snack,” I whispered, rubbing my neck. “I’m 
going to eat the rest of Mr. McCall’s stupid melons.” 

I pretended to cram my mouth full and chew. “Yum! Casabas. I need more 
casabas!” 

“Joe! You’d better not!” Mindy whispered in alarm. 

“Hey, I’m kidding,” I said. “Buster is howling like crazy. I’m going out to 
calm him down.” 

Mindy yawned. “If Mom and Dad catch you sneaking out in the middle of 
the night...” 

“It’ll just take a few minutes.” I stepped outside. The damp night air sent a 
small chill down my back. I gazed up at the starless night sky. 

Buster’s pitiful howls rose from the back. 

“I’m coming,” I called in a loud whisper. “It’s okay, boy.” 

Buster’s howls dropped to quiet whimpers. 

I took a step forward. Something rustled through the grass. I froze in place. 
And squinted into the darkness. Two small figures scampered by the side of the 
house. They scraped across the yard and disappeared into the night. 

Probably raccoons. 

Raccoons? 

That’s the answer! The raccoons must have eaten Mr. McCall’s melon. I 
wanted to wake up Dad and tell him. But I decided to wait till morning. 

I felt much better. That meant that Buster could be set free. I made my way 
over to Buster and sat next to him on the dew-wet grass. 

“Buster,” I whispered. “I’m here.” 

His big brown eyes drooped sadly. I threw my arms around his furry neck. 
“You won’t be tied up for long, Buster,” I promised. “You’ll see. I’ll tell Dad 
about the raccoons first thing in the morning.” 

Buster licked my hand gratefully. “And tomorrow I’ll take you for a long 
walk,” I whispered. “How’s that, boy? Now go to sleep.” 



I slipped back inside the house and jumped into bed. I felt good. I had 
solved the mystery of the melon. Our troubles with Mr. McCall were over, I 
thought. 

But I thought wrong. 

Our troubles were just beginning. 

“I don’t believe it! I don’t believe it!” Mr. McCall’s cries cut through the quiet 
morning, waking me from my heavy sleep. 

I rubbed my eyes and glanced at the clock radio. Six-thirty A.M. 

What’s all the screaming about? 

I hopped out of bed and hurried downstairs, yawning and stretching. Mom, 
Dad, and Mindy were at the front door, still in pajamas and robes. 

“What’s happening?” I asked. 

“It’s Bill!” Dad cried. “Come on!” 

We piled outside and stared into our neighbors’ garden. 

Mr. McCall hung over his vegetable patch in a tattered blue-and-white- 
checkered robe. He grabbed frantically at his casaba melons, screaming. 

Moose and his mother stood behind Mr. McCall in their robes, wide-eyed 
and silent. Instead of her usual friendly smile, Moose’s mom wore a grim frown. 

Mr. McCall lifted his head from the garden. “Ruined!” he roared. “They’re 
totally ruined!” 

“Oh, boy,” Dad muttered. “We’d better get over there, Marion.” He started 
across our front lawn. Mom, Mindy, and I followed. 

“Take it easy, Bill,” my dad said calmly as he stepped into the McCalls’ 
front yard. “Nothing is worth getting so upset about.” 

“Easy? Take it easy?” Mr. McCall shrieked. The vein in his forehead 
throbbed. 

The raccoons, I thought. They attacked the casabas again. I’ve got to tell 
Dad. Now. Before Buster gets blamed for this, too. 

Mr. McCall cradled his four casaba melons in his hands. They were still 
attached to the vine. 

“I came out to water my casabas and I found this... this...” He was too 
upset to finish. He held the melons out to us. 

“Whoa!” I cried in amazement. 

No raccoon could have done this. 

No way. 



Someone had taken a black marker and drawn big, sloppy smiley faces on 
each melon! 

My sister shoved me aside to get a good look. 

“Joe!” she shrieked. “That’s horrible. How could you!” 



11 


“What are you talking about?” Mr. McCall demanded. 

“Yes, Mindy, what are you talking about?” Mom asked. 

“I caught Joe sneaking outside last night,” Mindy replied. “In the middle of 
the night. He told me he wanted to wreck the rest of the melons.” 

Everyone turned to stare at me in horror. Even Moose, my best friend. Mr. 
McCall’s face was as red as a tomato again. I saw him clenching and 
unclenching his fists. 

Everyone stared at me in shocked silence. The smiley faces on the melons 
stared at me, too. 

“But—but—but—” I sputtered. 

Before I could explain, Dad exploded. “Joe, I think you owe us an 
explanation. What were you doing outside in the middle of the night?” 

I felt my face grow red-hot with anger. “I went out to calm Buster down,” I 
insisted. “He was howling. I didn’t touch the melons. I would never do anything 
like that. I was only joking when I told Mindy I wanted to wreck them!” 

“Well, this is no joke!” Dad exclaimed angrily. “You are grounded for the 
week!” 

“But, Dad—!” I pleaded. “I didn’t draw on those melons!” 

“Make that two weeks!” he snapped. “And I think you should mow Mr. 
McCall’s grass and water his garden all month. As an apology.” 

“Whoa, Jeffrey,” Mr. McCall interrupted. “I don’t want your son—or your 
dog—in my garden again. Ever.” 

He rubbed the casaba melons with his huge fingers, trying to erase the ugly 
black stains. “I hope this comes off,” he muttered. “Because if it doesn’t, Jeffrey, 
I’ll sue. Believe me, I will!” 

Two hours after the melon disaster, I sprawled on the floor of my room. 
Grounded. With nothing to do. 

I couldn’t play with Buster in the yard. Because the painters were outside. 

So I stayed in my room and reread all of my Super Gamma Man comic 
books. 

I ordered a glob of rubber vomit from the Joker’s Wild catalog for five 



dollars. That’s most of my weekly allowance. Then I sneaked into Mindy’s room 
and mixed up all the clothes in her closet. No more colors in rainbow order. 

When I had finished, it still wasn’t even noon. 

What a totally boring day, I thought, as I wandered downstairs. 

“Hand me the yellow, please,” Mindy’s voice rang out from the den. 

I crept toward the door and peeked in. Mindy and her best friend, Heidi, sat 
cross-legged on the floor. They were decorating T-shirts with fabric paint. 

Heidi is almost as annoying as Mindy. Something is always bothering her. 
She’s too cold. Or too hot. Or her stomach hurts. Or her shoelaces are too tight. 

I watched silently as the two girls worked. Heidi drew a silver collar on a 
large purple cat. 

Mindy hunched over in concentration and slowly outlined a large yellow 
flower. 

I leaped into the den. “Boo!” I screamed. 

“Yaii!” Heidi shrieked. 

Mindy jumped up, smearing a big yellow blotch on her red shorts. “You 
jerk!” she cried. “See what you made me do!” 

She scraped at the paint with her fingernails. “Beat it, Joe,” she ordered. 
“We’re busy.” 

“Well, I’m not,” I replied. “Thanks to you, Miss Snitch.” 

“It was your bright idea to draw faces on those melons,” she snarled. “Not 
mine.” 

“But I didn’t do it!” I insisted. 

Mindy counted off the evidence on her fingers. 

“You were up in the middle of the night. You went out in the yard. And you 
told me you wanted to wreck the rest of the melons.” 

“I was joking!” I exclaimed. “Don’t you know what a joke is? You should 
try making one sometime.” 

Heidi stretched out her arms. “I’m hot,” she said. “Why don’t we go to the 
pool? We can finish our shirts later.” 

Mindy fixed her eyes on me. “Joe, do you want to go with us?” she asked in 
a sweet voice. “Whoops. I forgot. You’re grounded.” Then she burst out 
laughing. 

I turned and left the two girls in the den. I have to get out of this house, I 
thought. 

I headed for the kitchen. Mom and the painter huddled together at the 



counter, checking paint swatches. 

“We want the onyx black for the trim. Not the pitch black,” she instructed, 
tapping the swatches. “I think you brought the wrong paint.” 

I tugged on her sleeve. “Mom. Buster’s really bored. Can I take him for a 
walk?” 

“Of course not,” she replied quickly. “You’re grounded.” 

“Please,” I begged. “Buster needs a walk. And that paint smell is making 
me sick.” I held my stomach and made gagging sounds. 

The painter shifted impatiently from foot to foot. “Okay, okay,” Mom said. 
“Take the dog.” 

“Excellent! Thanks, Mom!” I cried. I darted through the kitchen and into 
the back yard. “Good news, Buster,” I exclaimed. “We’re free!” 

Buster wagged his stumpy tail. I untied the long rope and clipped a short 
leash to his collar. 

We walked about two miles. All the way down to Buttermilk Pond. That’s 
our favorite stick-chasing spot. 

I tossed a fat stick into the water. Buster plunged into the cold pond and 
fetched it. We did that over and over until it was three o’clock. Time to go home. 

On the way back to the house, we stopped at the Creamy Cow. They have 
the best ice cream in town. 

I used the last bit of my allowance to treat us both to double-dip chocolate- 
chip cookie dough cones. Buster liked the cookie dough, but he left all the 
chocolate chips on the ground. 

After we finished our ice cream, we continued home. Buster pulled at his 
leash excitedly as we strolled up the driveway. He seemed really happy to be 
back. 

He dragged me into the front yard and sniffed everything. The evergreen 
bushes. The flamingos. The deer. The gnomes. 

The gnomes. 

Was something different about the gnomes? 

I dropped Buster’s leash and bent down for a closer look. 

I studied their fat little hands. What were those dark smudges on their 
fingertips. Dirt? 

I rubbed their chubby fingers. But the smudges remained. 

No. Not dirt. 

I leaned in closer. 



Paint. Black paint. 



12 


Black paint. The same color as the smiley faces on Mr. McCall’s casabas! 

I swallowed hard. What’s going on here? I wondered. How could the 
gnomes’ hands be covered in paint? 

I’ve got to show someone, I decided. 

Mom! She’s in the house. She’ll help me figure this out. 

As I reached our front door, I heard a scraping sound coming from the 
McCalls’ yard. 

“Buster! No!” I shouted. 

Buster circled Mr. McCall’s vegetable patch, his leash dragging behind him. 

I quickly shoved my hand under my T-shirt and yanked out my dog whistle. 
I blew it hard. 

Buster trotted right back to me. 

“Good boy!” I cried in relief. I shook my finger in his face. I tried to be 
stern. “Buster, if you don’t want to be tied up, you have to stay out of that 
garden!” 

Buster licked my finger with his long, sticky tongue. Then he turned to lick 
the gnomes. 

I watched Buster slobber all over them. 

“Oh, no!” I cried. “Not again!” 

Chip’s and Hap’s mouths gaped wide open. In the same terrified 
expressions I had seen before. As if they were trying to scream. 

I slammed my eyes shut. I opened one slowly. 

The terrified expressions remained. 

What was going on here? Were the gnomes afraid of Buster? Was I going 
crazy? 

My hands trembled as I quickly tied Buster to the tree. Then I ran into the 
house to search for Mom. 

“Mom! Mom!” I panted breathlessly. I found her upstairs, working in her 
office. “You’ve got to come outside! Now!” 

Mom whirled around from her computer. “What’s wrong?” she demanded. 

“It’s the gnomes!” I cried. “There’s black paint on their hands. And they’re 



not grinning anymore. Come out. You’ll see!” 

Mom slowly shoved her chair away from the computer. “Joe, if this is 
another joke...” 

“Please, Mom. It will just take a second. It’s not a joke. Really!” 

Mom led the way downstairs. She gazed at the gnomes from the front door. 

“See?” I cried, standing behind her. “I told you! Look at their faces. They 
look like they’re screaming!” 

Mom narrowed her eyes. “Joe, give me a break. Why did you get me away 
from my work? They have the same dumb grins they always have.” 

“What?” I gasped. I ran outside. I stared at the gnomes. 

They stared back at me. Grinning. 

“Joe, I really wish you’d stop the dumb gnome jokes,” Mom said sharply. 
“They’re not funny. Not funny at all.” 

“But look at the paint on their fingers!” 

“That’s just dirt,” she said impatiently. “Please, go read a book. Or clean 
your room. Find something to do. You’re driving me crazy!” 

I sat down on the grass. Alone. To think. 

I thought about the casaba seed on one of the gnome’s lips. I remembered 
the first time their mouths had twisted in horror. That was the first time Buster 
had licked them. 

And now they had paint on their fingers. 

It all added up. 

The gnomes are alive, I decided. 

And they’re doing horrible things in the McCalls’ garden. 

The gnomes? Doing horrible things? I must be losing my mind! 

Suddenly, I didn’t feel too well. Nothing made any sense. 

I stood up to go inside. 

And heard whispers. 

Gruff whispers. Down at my feet. 

“Not funny, Joe,” Hap whispered. 

“Not funny at all,” Chip rasped. 



13 


Should I tell Mom and Dad what I heard? I wondered as we ate dinner that 
night. 

“How was everyone’s day?” Dad asked cheerfully. He spooned some peas 
onto his dinner plate. 

They’ll never believe me. 

“Heidi and I rode our bikes to the pool,” Mindy piped up. She arranged a 
mound of tuna casserole on her plate into a neat square. Then she flicked a stray 
pea away. “But she got a cramp in her leg, so we mostly sunbathed.” 

I have to tell. 

“I heard something really weird this afternoon,” I burst out. “Really, really 
weird.” 

“You interrupted me!” Mindy said sharply. She blotted her mouth carefully 
with her napkin. 

“But this is important!” I exclaimed. I started shredding my napkin 
nervously. “I was in the front yard. All alone. And I heard whispers.” 

I made my voice low and gruff. “The voices said, ‘Not funny, Joe. Not 
funny.’ I don’t know who it was. Nobody was there. I... uh... think it was the 
gnomes.” 

Mom banged her glass of lemonade down on the table. “Enough with these 
gnome jokes!” she declared. “No one thinks they’re funny, Joe.” 

“But it’s true!” I cried, crushing my shredded napkin into a ball. “I heard 
the voices!” 

Mindy uttered a scornful laugh. “You are so lame,” she said. “Please pass 
the bread, Dad.” 

“Sure, honey,” Dad replied, handing her the wooden tray of dinner rolls. 

And that was the end of that. 

After dinner, Dad suggested that we water the tomatoes. 

“Okay,” I replied with a shrug. Anything to get out of the house. 

“Want me to get the Bug Be Gone?” I asked as we stepped outside. 

“No! No!” he gasped. His face turned ghostly pale. 

“What’s wrong, Dad? What is it?” 



He pointed silently at the tomato patch. 

“Ohhh,” I moaned. “Oh, no!” 

Our beautiful red tomatoes had been crushed, mangled, and maimed—seeds 
and pulpy red tomato flesh everywhere. 

Dad stared openmouthed, his hands balled into fists. “Who would do such a 
terrible thing?” he sighed. 

My heart began to throb. My pulse raced. 

I knew the truth. And now everyone would have to believe me. 

“The gnomes did it, Dad!” I grabbed the sleeve of his shirt and began 
tugging him to the front yard. “You’ll see. I’ll prove it!” 

“Joe, let go of me. This is no time for jokes. Don’t you realize that we’re 
out of the garden show? We’ve lost our chance for a blue ribbon! Or any ribbon, 
for that matter.” 

“You have to believe me, Dad. Come on.” I held tightly onto Dad’s sleeve. 
And I wouldn’t let go. 

As I dragged him out front, I wondered what we would find. 

Blood-red tomato juice smeared all over their ugly faces? 

Squishy pulp hanging from their tiny fat fingers? 

Hundreds of seeds stuck to their creepy little feet? 

We approached the gnomes. 

My eyes narrowed on the hideous creatures. 

And finally we stood right before them. 

And I couldn’t believe what we found. 



14 


Nothing. 

No juice. 

No pulp. 

Not a single seed. Not one. 

I searched their bodies. Frantically. From their ugly, grinning faces to their 
creepy, stubby toes. 

No clues. Nothing. 

How could I have been wrong? My stomach lurched as I turned to face my 

dad. 

“Dad...” I started in a shaky voice. 

Dad cut me off with an angry wave of his hand. “There’s nothing to see 
here, Joe,” he muttered. “I don’t want to hear another word about the gnomes. 
Understand? Not one!” 

His brown eyes flashed with fury. “I know who’s responsible for this!” he 
said bitterly. “And he’s not going to get away with it!” 

He whirled around and trotted into the back yard. He scooped up a handful 
of smashed tomato. 

The juice oozed between his fingers as he circled the house and charged 
next door. 

I watched Dad march up the McCalls’ steps and jab at the doorbell. He 
began howling before anyone answered the ring. “Bill! Come out here. Now!” 

I crouched behind Dad. I’d never seen him this angry before. 

I heard the lock turn. The door swung open. And there stood Mr. McCall. In 
a white jogging outfit. Holding a half-eaten pork chop in one hand. 

“Jeffrey, what are you yelling about? It’s difficult to digest with all this 
noise.” He chuckled. 

“Well, digest this!” Dad screamed. Then he brought his hand up and hurled 
the smashed tomatoes. 

They splattered against Mr. McCall’s white T-shirt and dribbled down his 
white sweatpants. Some of the mushy pulp landed on his clean white sneakers. 

Mr. McCall stared down at his clothes in total disbelief. “Are you nuts?” he 
bellowed. 



“No. You are!” my father shrieked. “How could you do this? For a stupid 
blue ribbon!” 

“What are you talking about?” Mr. McCall shouted. 

“Oh, I see. Now you’re going to play innocent. You’re going to pretend you 
don’t know anything. Well, you’re not going to get away with this.” 

Mr. McCall stomped down the steps and planted himself about an inch 
away from my dad. He puffed out his broad chest and hung over my father 
menacingly. 

“I didn’t touch your lousy tomatoes!” he roared. “You wimp! You probably 
bought your blue-ribbon tomatoes last year.” 

Dad shook an angry fist in Mr. McCall’s glaring face. “My tomatoes were 
the best at the show! Yours looked like raisins next to mine! And whoever heard 
of growing casabas in Minnesota, anyway? You’re going to be the joke of the 
garden show!” 

My whole body shuddered. They’re going to get into a fist fight, I realized. 
And Mr. McCall will squash my dad. 

“Joke?” Mr. McCall growled. “You’re the joke. You and your sour 
tomatoes. And those stupid lawn ornaments! Now leave before I really lose 
control!” 

Mr. McCall stomped up to his front door. Then he spun around and said, “I 
don’t want my son hanging around with Joe anymore! Your son probably 
wrecked your tomatoes. Just as he wrecked my melons!” 

He disappeared into the house, slamming the door so hard, the porch shook. 

That night I tossed and turned in bed for hours. Faces painted on melons. 
Crushed tomatoes. 

Whispering lawn gnomes. I couldn’t think of anything else. 

It was way after midnight, but I couldn’t sleep. The gnomes with their 
leering smiles danced before my closed eyes. 

Those grinning faces. Laughing. Laughing at me. 

Suddenly the room felt hot and stuffy. I kicked off the thin sheet that 
covered my legs. Still too hot. 

I jumped out of bed and headed for my window. I threw it wide open. 
Warm, wet air rushed in. 

I rested my arms on the windowsill and peered out into the darkness. It was 
a foggy night. A thick gray mist swirled over the front yard. Despite the heat, I 



felt a chill down my back. I had never seen it this foggy before. 

The fog shifted slightly. The angel slowly came into view as the fog moved 
away. Then the seal. The skunks. The swans. A flash of pink—the flamingos. 
And there stood the deer. 

Alone. 

All alone. 

The gnomes were gone. 



15 


“Mom! Dad!” I cried. Racing to their bedroom. “Wake up! Wake up! The 
gnomes are gone!” 

Mom bolted straight up. “What? What’s wrong?” 

Dad didn’t budge. 

“It’s the gnomes!” I shouted, shaking Dad’s shoulder. “Wake up!” 

My father opened one eye and squinted up at me. “What time is it?” he 
mumbled. 

“Get up, Dad!” I pleaded. 

Mom groaned as she snapped on the light next to her bed. “Joe. It’s so late. 
Why did you wake us up?” 

“They’re—they’re gone!” I stammered. “They disappeared. I’m not 
kidding. I’m really not.” 

My parents glanced at each other. Then they glared at me. “Enough!” Mom 
cried. “We’re tired of your jokes. And it’s the middle of the night! Get to bed!” 

“Right now!” Dad added sternly. “We’ve had just about enough of this 
nonsense. We’re going to have a serious talk about this. In the morning.” 

“But—but—but—” I stammered. 

“Go!” Dad shouted. 

I backed out of the room slowly, stumbling over someone’s slipper. 

I should have realized that they wouldn’t believe me. But someone had to 
believe me. Someone had to. 

I raced down the dark hall to Mindy’s room. As I neared her bed, I could 
hear the whistling sounds she always makes when she lies on her back. She was 
fast asleep. 

I stared down at her for a moment. Should I wake her? Would she believe 

me? 

I patted her on the cheek. “Mindy. Wake up,” I whispered. 

Nothing. 

I called her name again. A little louder. 

Her eyes fluttered open. “Joe?” she asked drowsily. 

“Get up. Quick!” I whispered. “You have to see this!” 



“Have to see what?” she groaned. 

“The gnomes. The gnomes have disappeared!” I exclaimed. “I think they 
ran away! Please, get up. Please.” 

“The gnomes?” she mumbled. 

“Come on, Mindy. Get up,” I pleaded. “It’s an emergency!” 

Mindy’s eyes shot wide open. “Emergency? What? What emergency?” 

“It’s the gnomes. They’ve really disappeared. You have to come outside 
with me.” 

“That’s the emergency?” she screeched. “Are you crazy? I’m not going 
anywhere with you. You’ve totally lost it, Joe. Totally.” 

“But, Mindy—” 

“Quit bugging me. I’m going back to sleep.” 

Then she closed her eyes and pulled the sheet over her head. 

I stood in her dark, silent room. 

No one would believe me. No one would come with me. What should I do 
now? What? 

I imagined the gnomes ripping up every last vegetable in our garden. 
Yanking out the yams and smashing the squash. And for dessert, chomping on 
the rest of Mr. McCall’s casabas! 

I knew I had to do something. Fast! 

I ran from Mindy’s room and raced down the stairs. I jerked the front door 
open and sprinted outside. 

Outside into the murky fog. 

Swallowed up inside the thick blanket of mist. 

So dark and foggy. I could barely see. I felt as if I were moving through a 
dark dream. A nightmare of grays and blacks. All shadows. Nothing but 
shadows. 

I inched forward slowly, moving as if I were underwater. The grass felt so 
wet against my bare feet. But I couldn’t even see my own feet through the thick 
carpet of fog. 

Like a dream. Like a heavy, dark dream. So many shifting shadows. So 
silent. Eerily silent. 

I pushed on into the haze. I had lost all sense of direction. Was I heading 
toward the street? 

“Ohhh!” I cried out when something grabbed my ankle. 

Frantically, I shook my leg. Tried to break free. 



But it held on. 

And pulled me down. 

Down into the whirling darkness. 

A snake. 

No. Not a snake. The garden hose. The garden hose that I had forgotten to 
roll up after watering the lawn that night. 

Get a grip, Joe. I told myself. You have to calm down. 

I pulled myself up and staggered forward. Squinting hard. Trying to see my 
way. Shadowy figures seemed to reach for me, bend toward me. 

I wanted to turn back. And go inside. And climb into my nice, dry bed. 

Yes. That’s what I should do, I decided. 

I turned slowly. 

And heard a shuffling sound. The soft thud of footsteps. Nearby. 

I listened closely. 

And heard the sounds again. Footsteps as light as the mist. 

I was breathing hard now. My heart pounding. My bare feet chilled and wet. 
The dampness creeping up my legs. My entire body shuddered. 

I heard a raspy cackle. A gnome? 

I tried to turn. Tried to see it in the billowing blackness. 

But it grabbed me from behind. Hard around the waist. 

And with a dry, evil laugh, it threw me to the ground! 



16 


As I hit the wet ground, I heard the low, evil laugh again. 

And recognized it. 

“Moose?” 

“Scared you big time!” he muttered. He helped me to my feet. Even in the 
fog, I could see the big grin on his face. 

“Moose—what are you doing out here?” I managed to cry. 

“I couldn’t sleep. I kept hearing weird sounds. I was staring out into the fog 
—and I saw you. What are you doing out here, Joe? Causing more trouble?” 

I wiped wet blades of grass from my hands. “I haven’t been causing the 
trouble,” I told him. “You’ve got to believe me. Look—the two lawn gnomes— 
they’re gone.” 

I pointed to the deer. Moose could see that the gnomes weren’t standing in 
their spots. 

He stared for a long time. “This is a trick—right?” 

“No. It’s for real. I’ve got to find them.” 

Moose frowned at me. “What did you do, hide the ugly little creeps? Where 
are they? Come on, tell me!” 

“I didn’t hide them,” I insisted. 

“Tell me,” he repeated, leaning over me, bringing his face an inch from 
mine. “Or suffer the Ten Tortures!” 

Moose shoved his huge hands hard against my chest. I fell back and landed 
in the wet grass again. He thumped down on my stomach and pinned my arms to 
the ground. 

“Tell me!” Moose insisted. “Tell me where they are!” Then he bounced up 
and down on top of me. 

“Stop!” I gasped. “Stop!” 

He stopped because lights flashed on in both of our houses. 

“Oh, wow,” I whispered. “We’re in major trouble now.” 

I heard my front door bang open. A second later, Moose’s door opened, too. 

We froze. “Keep quiet,” I whispered. “Maybe they won’t see us.” 

“Who’s out here?” my father called. 



“What’s going on, Jeffrey?” I heard Mr. McCall shout. “What’s all the noise 
out here?” 

“I don’t know,” my dad replied. “I thought maybe Joe...” His voice trailed 
off. 

We’re safe, I thought. We’re hidden by the fog. 

Then I heard a low click. The long, thin beam of a flashlight swept across 
the yard. It settled on Moose and me. 

“Joe!” Dad screamed. “What are you doing out there? Why didn’t you 
answer me?” 

“Moose!” Mr. McCall shouted in a deep, angry voice. “Get in here. Move 
it!” 

Moose climbed up and raced into his house. 

I hoisted myself up from the grass for the second time that night and slowly 
made my way inside. 

Dad crossed his arms tightly across his chest. “You woke us up twice 
tonight! And you’re outside in the middle of the night again! What’s wrong with 
you?” 

“Listen, Dad, I only went outside because the gnomes are missing! Check,” 
I begged. “You’ll see!” 

My father glared at me with narrowed eyes. “These gnome stories are 
getting out of hand!” he snapped. “I’ve had it! Now go upstairs. Before I ground 
you for the entire summer!” 

“Dad, I’m begging you. I’ve never been so serious in my life. Please look,” 
I pleaded. “Please. Please. Please!” And then I added, “I’ll never ask you for 
anything else again.” 

I guess that’s what convinced him. 

“Okay,” he said, sighing wearily. “But if this is another joke...” 

My father stepped over to the living room window and peered out into the 
swirling fog. 

“Please let the gnomes still be gone! ” I prayed silently. “Please let Dad see 
that I’m telling the truth. Please...” 



17 


“Joe, you’re right!” my father declared. “The gnomes aren’t out there.” 

He believed me! Finally! I jumped up and shot a fist into the air. “Yes!” I 
cheered. 

Dad wiped at the moist glass pane with his pajama sleeve and squinted out 
the window again. 

“See, Dad! See!” I cried happily. “I was telling the truth. I wasn’t joking.” 

“Hmmm. Deer-lilah’s not there, either,” he said softly. 

“What?” I gasped, feeling my stomach churn. “No. The deer is there! I saw 
it!” 

“Hold on a minute,” Dad murmured. “Ahhh. There she is. She was hidden 
in the fog. And the gnomes! There they are! They’re right there, too. They were 
hidden in the fog. See?” 

I stared out the window. Two pointy hats broke through the mist. The two 
gnomes stood dark and still, in their places beside the deer. 

“Noooooo!” I moaned. “I know they weren’t there. I’m not playing tricks, 
Dad. I’m not!” 

“Fog can do funny things,” Dad said. “One time I was driving through a 
real pea soup of a fog. I spotted something strange through the windshield. It 
was shiny and round and it sort of hovered in the air. Oh, boy, I thought. A UFO! 
A flying saucer! I couldn’t believe it!” 

Dad patted me on the back. “Well, my UFO turned out to be a silver balloon 
tied to a parking meter. Now, Joe. Back to this gnome problem.” Dad’s face 
turned stern. “I don’t want to hear any more crazy stories. They’re only lawn 
ornaments. Nothing more. Okay? Not another word. Promise?” 

What choice did I have? “Promise,” I muttered. 

Then I dragged myself up the stairs to bed. 

What a horrible day—and night. My father thinks I’m a liar. Our tomatoes 
are ruined. And Moose isn’t allowed to hang out with me anymore. 

What else could possibly go wrong? 

I woke up the following morning with a heavy feeling in my stomach. As if I 
had swallowed a bowl of cement. 



All I could think about were the gnomes. 

Those horrible gnomes. They were destroying my summer. They were 
destroying my life! 

Forget about them, Joe, I told myself. Just forget about them. 

Anyway, today had to be better than yesterday. It sure couldn’t be worse. 

I peered out my bedroom window. All traces of the fog had been burned 
away by a bright yellow sun. Buster slept peacefully in the grass, his long white 
rope snaking through the garden. 

I glanced over at the McCalls’ house. Maybe Moose is outside helping his 
dad in the garden, I thought. 

I leaned farther out the window to get a better look. 

“Oh, noooo!” I moaned. “No!” 



18 


Globs of white paint splattered over Mr. McCall’s red Jeep! 

The roof. The hood. The windows. The whole Jeep covered in paint. 

This meant major trouble, I knew. 

I pulled on a pair of jeans and yesterday’s T-shirt and hurried outside. I 
found Moose in his driveway, his jaw clenched, shaking his head as he circled 
the Jeep. 

“Unbelievable, huh?” he said, turning to me. “When my dad saw this, he 
had a cow!” 

“Why didn’t he park in the garage?” I asked. Mr. McCall always parks the 
Jeep in their two-car garage. 

Moose shrugged. “Mom’s been cleaning out the basement and attic for a 
yard sale. She stuck about a million boxes of junk in the garage. So Dad had to 
park in the driveway last night.” 

Moose patted the roof of the Jeep. “The paint is still sticky. Touch it.” 

I touched it. Sticky. 

“My dad is steaming!” Moose declared. “At first he thought your dad did it. 
You know. Because of the tomatoes. But Mom told him that that was ridiculous. 
So he called the police. He said he won’t rest until whoever did it is thrown in 
jail!” 

“He said that?” I asked. My mouth suddenly felt as dry as cotton. “Moose, 
once the police start to check things out, they’re going to blame you and me!” 

“Blame us? Are you nuts? Why would they blame us?” he demanded. 

“Because we were both outside last night!” I said. “And everybody knows 
it.” 

Moose’s dark brown eyes flickered with fear. “You’re right,” he said. “What 
are we going to do?” 

“I don’t know,” I replied sadly. I paced back and forth in the McCalls’ 
driveway, thinking hard. The asphalt felt warm and sticky on my bare feet. 

I moved to the grass. And noticed a line of small white paint spots. 

“Hey, what’s this?” I cried. 

I followed the paint trail across the grass. 

Over the petunias. 



To the corner of my yard. 

The paint drips ended where the gnomes stood, grinning at me. 

“I knew it! I knew it!” I cried out. “Moose, come look at this trail. The 
gnomes splashed your car! And did all the other bad things around here.” 

“Lawn gnomes?” Moose sputtered. “Joe, give up. No one will believe that. 
Why don’t you give it a rest?” 

“Check out the evidence!” I demanded. “The melon seed on the gnome’s 
lips. This trail of white paint. I even found black paint on their fingers. Right 
after your dad found the smiley faces on his casabas!” 

“Weird,” Moose muttered. “Very weird. But lawn gnomes are lawn gnomes, 
Joe. They don’t run around doing mischief.” 

“What if we prove they’re guilty?” I suggested. 

“Excuse me? How would we do that?” 

“Catch them in the act,” I replied. 

“Huh? This is nuts, Joe.” 

“Come on, Moose. We’ll do it tonight. We’ll sneak out, hide around the side 
of the house, and watch them.” 

Moose shook his head. “No way,” he answered. “I’m in big trouble after 
last night.” 

“And after the police finish, what kind of trouble will you be in then?” 

“Okay. Okay. I’ll do it,” he muttered. “But I think this whole thing is a big 
waste of time.” 

“We’re going to trap these gnomes, Moose,” I told him. “If it’s the last thing 
we do.” 

Ahhh! 

My alarm clock! It didn’t go off! 

And now it was nearly midnight. And I was late. I’d promised to meet 
Moose outside at eleven-thirty. 

I leaped out of bed, still dressed in my jeans and T-shirt. I grabbed my 
sneakers and ran outside. 

No moon. No stars. The front lawn lay blanketed in darkness. 

The yard was silent. Too silent. 

I glanced around for Moose. No sign of him. He probably went back inside 
when I didn’t show. 

What should I do now? Stay out by myself? Or go back to bed? 



Something rustled in the bushes. I gasped. 

“Joe. Joe. Over here,” Moose whispered loudly. 

He popped his head out from behind the evergreen shrubs in front of my 
house. And waved me over. 

I slid down next to him. 

Moose punched me hard on the arm. “I thought you chickened out.” 

“No way!” I whispered back. “This was my idea!” 

“Yeah, your crazy idea,” Moose replied. “I can’t believe I’m hiding behind 
a bush. In the middle of the night. Spying on lawn ornaments.” 

“I know it sounds crazy, but—” 

“Shhh. Did you hear something?” Moose interrupted. 

I heard it. A scraping sound. 

I reached into the shrub and parted the thick green branches. The needles 
clawed at my hands and arms. I jerked my arms out quickly. Too quickly. Blood 
dripped from my fingers where two needles had pierced right through my skin. 

The scraping sound came closer. 

My heart pounded in my chest. 

Closer. 

Moose and I sat there. We exchanged frightened glances. 

I had to look. I had to see what was making those sounds. 

I parted the needles once again. And stared through the mass of needled 
branches. Two small, glowing eyes met mine! 

“Get it, Moose! Get it!” I cried. 

Moose jumped up from behind the bush. Just in time—to see it scamper 
away. 

“A raccoon! It was only a raccoon!” 

I let out a long sigh. “Sorry, Moose.” 

We sat there a while longer. We parted the branches every few minutes to 
check on the gnomes. My arms were scratched raw from the rough needles. 

But the gnomes hadn’t budged. They stood grinning into the night in their 
silly suits and caps. 

I groaned. My legs felt stiff and cramped. 

Moose checked his watch. “We’ve been out here for over two hours,” he 
whispered. “Those gnomes aren’t going anywhere. I’m going home.” 

“Wait a little longer,” I begged him. “We’ll catch them. I know we will.” 

“You’re a pretty good guy,” Moose said as he parted the bushes for the 



millionth time. “So I hate to tell you this, Joe. But you’re as crazy as—” 

He didn’t finish his sentence. His mouth dropped open, and his eyes nearly 
popped out of his pudgy head. 

I peered into the shrubs—in time to see the gnomes come to life. They 
stretched their arms over their heads. And stroked their chins. 

They shook out their legs. And smoothed out their shirts. 

“They—they’re moving !” Moose cried. 

Too loudly. 

And then I lost my balance and fell. Right into the bush. 

They’ve seen us, I realized. 

Now what? 



19 


“No. Oh, man. No!” Moose whispered. He tugged me to my feet. “They’re 
moving. They’re really moving!” 

Squinting through the branches, we both stared in horror at Hap and Chip. 

The gnomes bent their knees, limbering up. Then they each took one stiff 
step. Then another. 

I was right. They are alive, I thought. Very alive. 

And they’re coming for Moose and me. 

We have to run, I told myself. We have to get out of here. 

But neither of us could take our eyes off the living lawn gnomes! 

The full moon suddenly appeared low over the trees. The front lawn lit as if 
someone had turned on a spotlight. The stocky figures swung their short, fat 
arms and began to run. Their pointed hats cut through the air like sharks’ fins. 

They scrambled toward us on their stumpy legs. 

Moose and I dropped to our knees and tried to hide. My whole body was 
trembling so hard, I was making the bush shake! 

The gnomes ran closer. So close that I could see the dark red of their evil 
eyes and the white gleam of their grins. 

I clenched my fists so tightly, my hands ached. 

What were they going to do to us? 

I shut my eyes—and heard them run past. I heard thudding footsteps. 
Whistling breaths. 

I opened my eyes to see them racing across the cement walk and around the 
side of the house. 

“Moose—they didn’t see us!” I whispered happily. 

We helped each other to our feet. I felt dizzy. The dark ground tilted. My 
legs felt soft and rubbery like Jell-O. 

Moose wiped his sweaty brow. “Where are they going?” he whispered. 

I shook my head. “I don’t know. But we have to follow them. Come on.” 

We gave each other a quick thumbs-up and stepped out from our hiding 
place. I led the way. We moved across the cement walk and past the front porch. 
Toward the side of the house. 



I stopped when I heard their raspy voices, talking low. Just up ahead. 

Moose grabbed my shoulder, his eyes wide open in alarm. “I’m getting out 
of here. Now!” 

I turned around. “No!” I pleaded. “You’ve got to stay and help me catch 
them. We have to show our parents what’s been going on here.” 

He heaved a long sigh. It made me feel a little better to know that a big, 
tough guy like Moose was as frightened as I was. Finally, he nodded. “Okay. 
Let’s go get them.” 

Keeping in the dark shadow of the house, we made our way around to the 
back. I saw Buster, sound asleep beside his dog house in the center of the yard. 

And then I saw the two lawn gnomes. They were bent over the pile of paint 
and brushes and drop cloths the painters had left beside the garage. 

Moose and I hung back as Hap and Chip picked up two cans of black paint. 
They pried the cans open with their thick fingers. 

Giggling, the two gnomes swung back the open cans, then hurled the black 
paint at the side of my house. The black paint spattered the fresh white paint, 
then dripped down in long, thick streaks. 

I clapped a hand over my mouth to keep from screaming. 

I knew it. I’d know it all along. But no one would believe me. The gnomes 
were behind all the trouble around here. 

The gnomes returned to the pile for more paint. “We’ve got to stop them,” I 
whispered to Moose. “But how?” 

“Let’s just tackle them,” Moose suggested. “Tackle them from behind and 
pin them down.” 

It sounded simple enough. They were little, after all. Smaller than us. 
“Okay,” I whispered, my stomach fluttering. “Then we’ll drag them into the 
house and show my parents.” 

I took a deep breath and held it. Moose and I started to inch forward. 

Closer. Closer. 

If only my legs weren’t wobbling like rubber bands! 

Closer. 

And then I saw Moose go down. 

He toppled forward—and hit the ground hard, letting out a loud “Oooof! ” 

It took me a second to see that he had tripped over Buster’s rope. 

He struggled to get to his feet. But the rope had tangled around his ankle. 

He reached down with both hands. Gave it a hard tug. 



And woke up Buster! 

“Rrrrrrowwwwwf! Rrrrrrowwwwwf!” Buster must have seen the gnomes 
because he started barking his head off. 

The gnomes spun around. 

And fixed their eyes on us. In the bright moonlight, their faces turned hard 
and angry. 

“Get them!” Chip growled. “Don’t let them escape!” 



20 


“Run!” I screamed. 

Moose and I bolted toward the front of the house. 

Buster was still barking his head off. 

And over the barking, I heard shrill giggles. The gnomes giggled as they 
chased after us. 

Their feet slapped sharply on the grass. I glanced back, saw their stubby 
legs moving fast, a blur of motion. 

I pumped my legs, gasping for breath, and rounded the side of the house. 

I could hear the high-pitched giggles of the two gnomes close behind us. 
“Help!” Moose cried. “Somebody—help us!” 

My mouth hung open. I struggled to breathe. They were gaining on us. 

I knew I had to run faster. But my legs suddenly felt as heavy as bricks. 
“Hellllp!” Moose called. 

I glanced at the house. Why wasn’t anyone waking up in there? 

We ran around the house and kept running. 

Why were Hap and Chip giggling like that? 

Because they knew they were going to catch us? 

I felt a stab of pain in my side. “Oh, no!” A cramp. 

I felt Moose tugging me. “Don’t slow down, Joe. Keep going!” 

The pain sharpened, like a knife in my side. “Can’t run...” I choked out. 
“Joe—keep going! Don’t stop!” Moose cried, frantically pulling my arm. 
But I doubled over, holding my side. 

It’s all over, I thought. They’ve got me. 

And then the front door swung open. The porch light flashed on. 

“What’s going on out here?” a familiar voice called. 

Mindy! 

She stepped out, pulling at the belt of her pink bathrobe. I saw her squint 
into the darkness. 

“Mindy!” I called. “Mindy—watch out!” 

Too late. 

The gnomes grabbed her. 



Giggling loudly, they pinned her arms back. Dragged her down the porch 
steps. Carried her to the street. 



21 


Mindy thrashed her arms and kicked her legs. But the giggling gnomes had 
surprising strength. 

“Help me!” Mindy called back to Moose and me. “Don’t just stand there— 
help me! ” 

I swallowed hard. The pain in my side faded. 

Moose and I didn’t say a word. We just started chasing after them. 

They had already carried Mindy to the street. Their feet slapped on the 
pavement. In the light from the street lamp, I saw Mindy struggling to free 
herself. 

Moose and I hurtled down the driveway. “Put her down!” I shouted 
breathlessly. “Put my sister down—now!” 

More giggles. They scurried past the McCalls’ house. Past the next two 
houses. 

Moose and I ran after them, shouting, begging them to stop. 

And then—to our shock—they did stop. 

In the shadow of a tall hedge, they set Mindy down. And turned to us. “We 
mean you no harm,” Chip said. 

The gnomes’ expressions were serious now. Their eyes peered at us through 
the darkness. 

“I don’t believe this!” Mindy cried, straightening her robe. “This is crazy! 
Crazy!” 

“Tell me about it,” I muttered. 

“Please listen to us,” Hap rasped. 

“We mean you no harm,” Chip repeated. 

“No harm!” Mindy shrieked. “No harm! You just dragged me from my 
home! You—you—” 

“We only wanted to get your attention,” Hap said softly. 

“Well, you’ve got it!” Mindy exclaimed. 

“We mean you no harm,” Chip said once again. “Please believe us.” 

“How can we believe you?” I demanded, finally finding my voice. “Look at 
all the trouble you’ve caused. You’ve ruined the gardens! You splashed paint 
everywhere! You—” 



“We can’t help it,” Hap interrupted. 

“We really can’t,” Chip echoed. “You see, we’re Mischief Elves.” 

“You’re what?” Mindy cried. 

“We’re Mischief Elves. We do mischief. That’s our mission in life,” Hap 
explained. 

“Wherever there is mischief in the world, we’re there,” Chip added. 
“Mischief is our job. We can’t help ourselves.” 

He bent down and broke off a chunk of the concrete curb. Then he pulled 
open the mailbox across from us and shoved the piece of concrete inside. 

“See? I can’t help myself. I have to do mischief wherever I go.” 

Hap giggled. “Without us, the world would be a pretty dull place— 
wouldn’t it?” 

“It would be a much better place,” Mindy insisted, crossing her arms in 
front of her. 

Moose still hadn’t said a word. He just stood and stared at the two talking 
lawn gnomes. 

Hap and Chip made pouty faces. “Please don’t hurt our feelings,” Chip 
rasped. “Our life isn’t easy.” 

“We need your help,” Hap added. 

“You want us to help you do mischief?” I cried. “No way! You’ve already 
gotten me into major trouble.” 

“No. We need you to help get us our freedom,” Chip said solemnly. “Please 
—listen and believe.” 

“Listen and believe,” Hap echoed. 

“We lived in a land far from here,” Chip began. “In a forest deep and green. 
We guarded the mines and protected the trees. We performed our mischief 
innocently. But we also did a lot of good.” 

“We were hard-working people,” Hap told us, scratching his head. “And we 
were happy in our forest home.” 

“But then the mines were closed and the forests were cut down,” Chip 
continued. “We were captured. Kidnapped. And taken far from home. We were 
shipped to your country and forced to work as lawn ornaments.” 

“Slaves,” Hap said, shaking his head sadly. “Forced to stand all day and 
night.” 

“That’s impossible!” Mindy cried. “Don’t you get bored? How do you stand 
so still?” 



“We go into a trance,” Chip explained. “Time passes without our realizing 
it. We come out of the trance at night and go about doing our job.” 

“You mean mischief!” I declared. 

They both nodded. 

“But we want to be free,” Hap continued. “To go where we want. To live 
where we choose. We want to find another forest where we can live in freedom.” 
Two tiny gnome tears rolled down his fat cheeks. 

Chip sighed and raised his eyes to me. “Will you help us?” 

“Help you do what?” I demanded. 

“Help our friends and us escape?” Chip replied. 

“There are six others,” Hap explained. “They’re locked in the basement. At 
the store where you bought us. We need your help to set them free.” 

“We can climb into the basement window,” his friend continued. “But we 
are too short to climb back out. And too short to reach the doorknob to let 
ourselves out through the door.” 

“Will you help us escape?” Hap pleaded, tugging the bottom of my T-shirt. 
“You just have to climb down into the basement. Then help our six friends out 
the basement door.” 

“Please help us,” Chip begged, tears in his eyes. “Then we’ll be gone. To a 
deep forest. And we will never cause you any more mischief.” 

“That sounds good to me!” Mindy exclaimed. 

“So you’ll do it?” Hap squealed. 

They both began tugging at us, chirping, “Please? Please? Please? Please? 
Please?” 

Moose, Mindy, and I exchanged troubled glances. 

What should we do? 



22 


“Please? Please? Please? Please?” 

“Let’s help them,” Moose said, finally finding his voice. 

I turned to Mindy. I didn’t usually ask her advice. But she was the oldest. 
“What do you think?” 

Mindy bit her lower lip. “Well, look how much Buster hates to be tied up,” 
she said. “He only wants to be free. I guess everything deserves to be free. Even 
lawn gnomes.” 

I turned back to the gnomes. “We’ll do it!” I declared. “We’ll help you.” 

“Thank you! Thank you!” Chip cried happily. He threw his arms around 
Hap. “You don’t know what this means to us!” 

“Thank you! Thank you! Thank you!” Hap squealed. He leaped into the air 
and clicked the heels of his boots together. “Hurry! Let’s go!” 

“Now?” Mindy cried. “It’s the middle of the night! Can’t we wait until 
tomorrow?” 

“No. Please. Now,” Hap insisted. 

“In the darkness,” Chip added. “While the store is closed. Please. Let’s 
hurry.” 

“I’m not dressed,” Mindy replied. “I really don’t think we can go now. I 
think—” 

“If we stay here longer, we’ll have to do more mischief,” Chip said with a 
wink. 

I sure didn’t want that to happen. “Let’s do it now!” I agreed. 

And so the five of us crept along the dark street and up the steep hill toward 
Lawn Lovely. Wow, did I feel weird! Here we were, walking around in the 
middle of the night with a couple of lawn ornaments! About to break into the 
store and set six more lawn ornaments free! 

The old pink house was a strange enough place during the day. But at night, 
it was totally creepy. All those lawn animals—deer and seals and flamingos— 
stared at us through the darkness, with blank, lifeless eyes. 

Were they alive, too? I wondered. 

Hap seemed to read my mind. “They’re only for decoration,” he sneered. 
“Nothing more.” 



The two excited gnomes made their way quickly across the wide lawn and 
around the side of Mrs. Anderson’s house. Moose, Mindy, and I followed 
behind. 

Mindy clutched my arm with an ice-cold hand. My legs still felt wobbly. 
But my heart was pounding with excitement—not fear. 

Hap and Chip pointed to the long, low window that led down to the 
basement. I knelt down and peered inside. Total darkness. 

“You’re sure the other gnomes are down there?” I asked. 

“Oh, yes,” Chip declared eagerly. “All six. They’re waiting for you to 
rescue them.” 

“Please hurry,” Hap pleaded, shoving me gently to the window. “Before the 
old woman hears us and wakes up.” 

I lowered myself to the edge of the open window. And turned back to my 
sister and Moose. 

“We’re coming right behind you,” Moose whispered. 

“Let’s rescue them and get out of here,” Mindy urged. 

“Here goes,” I said softly. 

I crossed my fingers and slid down into the darkness. 



23 


I bumped over the window frame and landed on my feet. A few seconds later, I 
heard Moose and Mindy slide in after me. 

I squinted into the blackness that surrounded us. I couldn’t see a thing. I 
licked my dry lips and sniffed the air. A sharp smell, like vinegar, filled the hot, 
damp basement. Sweat, I thought. Gnome sweat. 

I heard a low giggle from outside. Chip and Hap hurtled over the window 
ledge and thudded to the floor. 

“Hey, guys—” I whispered. 

But they scampered off into the darkness. 

“What’s going on here?” Moose demanded. 

“We’ve got to find the light switch,” Mindy whispered. 

But before we could move, the ceiling lights all flashed on. I blinked in the 
sudden blaze of brightness. 

And then gasped as I stared across the vast basement—at a sea of lawn 
gnomes! 

Not six! Six hundred ! Row after row of them, jammed against each other, 
staring at the three of us. 

“Whoa!” Moose cried. “It’s a mob!” 

“Hap and Chip lied to us!” I cried. 

Their shirts were different colors. But the lawn gnomes all looked exactly 
alike. They all wore pointed caps and black belts. They all had staring red eyes, 
wide noses, grinning lips, and large pointy ears. 

I was so startled to see so many of the ugly creatures, it took me a while to 
spot Hap and Chip. Finally, I saw them at the side of the room. 

Hap clapped his hands three times. 

And three more times. Short, sharp claps that echoed off the basement 
walls. 

And then the crowd of gnomes came to life, stretching and bending, 
grinning and giggling, chattering in shrill, excited voices. 

Mindy grabbed my arm. “We’ve got to get out of here.” 

I could barely hear her over the chattering, giggling mob of gnomes. I 
glanced up at the basement window. It suddenly seemed so high, so far away. 



When I turned back, Hap and Chip had moved in front of us. They clapped 
their hands for attention. 

The hundreds of gnomes instantly fell silent. 

“We have brought the young humans!” Hap announced, grinning happily. 

“We have kept our promise!” Chip declared. 

Giggles and cheering. 

And then, to my horror, the gnomes began moving forward. Their eyes 
flashed excitedly. They reached out their stubby arms toward us. The pointed 
hats bobbed and slid forward, like sharks on the attack. 

Mindy, Moose, and I backed up. Backed up to the wall. 

The gnomes crowded up against us. Their little hands plucked at my 
clothes, slapped my face, pulled my hair. 

“Stop!” I shrieked. “Get back! Get back!” 

“We came to help you!” I heard Mindy scream. “Please—we came to help 
you escape!” 

Loud giggling. 

“But we don’t want to escape!” a grinning gnome declared. “Now that 
you’re here, it’s going to be so much fun!” 



24 


Fun? 

What did he mean by fun ? 

Hap and Chip pushed their way back to the front and stepped up beside us. 
They clapped their hands together to silence the giggling, chattering crowd. 

The basement instantly turned silent. 

“You tricked us!” Mindy screamed at the two gnomes. “You lied to us!” 
They giggled in reply and slapped each other’s shoulders gleefully. 

“I can’t believe you fell for our sad story,” Hap said, shaking his head. 

“We told you we’re Mischief Gnomes,” Chip sneered. “You should have 
known we were playing mischief!” 

“Great joke, guys,” I said, forcing a hoarse laugh. “You fooled us. Way to 
go. So now let us go home, okay?” 

“Yeah. Let us go home!” Moose insisted. 

The whole room erupted in laughter. 

Hap shook his head. “But the mischief has just begun!” he declared. 

Cheers and giggles. 

Chip turned to the crowd of excited gnomes. “So what shall we do with our 
lovely prisoners? Any ideas?” 

“Let’s see if they bounce!” a gnome called from near the back of the room. 
“Yeah! Dribble them!” 

“A dribbling contest!” 

“No—bounce them against the wall. Bounce and catch!” 

More cheers. 

“No! Fold them into tiny squares! I love it when we fold humans into 
squares!” 

“Yes! A folding contest!” another gnome cried. 

“Fold them! Fold them! Fold them!” several gnomes began to chant. 

“Tickle them!” a gnome in front suggested. 

“Tickle them for hours!” 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

The room rang out with their excited chants. 



“Fold them! Fold them! Fold them!” 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

“Dribble! Dribble! Dribble! Dribble!” 

I turned to Moose. He stared out at the crowd of chanting gnomes, dazed 
and frightened. His eyes bulged and his chin quivered. 

Mindy had her back pressed up against the basement wall. Her blond hair 
was matted to her forehead. Her hands were jammed into the pockets of her 
bathrobe. 

“What are we going to do?” she asked me, shouting over the excited chants. 

Suddenly I had an idea. 

I raised my arms high over my head. “Quiet! ” I screamed. 

The room instantly grew silent. Hundreds of red eyes glared at me. 

“Let us go!” I demanded. “Or the three of us will scream at the top of our 
lungs. We will wake up Mrs. Anderson. And she will be down here in a second 
to rescue us!” 

Silence. 

Had I frightened them? 

No. The gnomes burst into loud, scornful laughter. They slapped each 
other’s shoulders, hooted, and giggled. 

“You’ll have to do better than that!” Hap grinned up at me. “We all know 
that Mrs. Anderson can’t hear a thing.” 

“Go ahead and shout,” Chip urged. “Shout all you want. We like it when 
humans shout.” He turned to Hap, and the two of them slapped each other’s 
shoulders and fell on the floor, giggling gleefully, kicking their feet in the air. 

Over the vast basement, the chants started up again. 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

“Fold them! Fold them! Fold them!” 

“Dribble! Dribble! Dribble!” 

With a long sigh, I turned to my frightened sister and friend. “We’re 
doomed,” I muttered. “We don’t have a chance.” 



25 


“Tug of War! Tug of War!” 

A new chant started in the back of the room and swept up toward the front. 

“Yes!” Hap and Chip declared happily. 

“Excellent mischief!” Hap cried. 

“A Tug of War! We’ll tug them till they stretch!” Chip shouted. 

“Stretch them! Stretch them!” 

“Tug of War! Tug of War!” 

“Joe—what are we going to do?” I heard Mindy’s frightened voice over the 
enthusiastic chants. 

Think, Joe, I urged myself. Think! There has to be a way out of this 
basement. 

But I felt so dazed. The chants rang in my ears. The grinning faces leered 
up at us. My thoughts were a jumbled mess. 

“Stretch them! Stretch them!” 

“Fold them! Fold them!” 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

Suddenly, over the shrill gnome voices, I heard a familiar sound. 

A dog’s bark. 

Buster’s bark. 

“Buster!” Mindy cried. “I hear him!” 

“I—I did too!” I exclaimed, turning and raising my eyes to the window 
above our heads. “He followed us! He must be right outside!” 

I desperately wished Buster could talk. Could run home and tell Mom and 
Dad that we were in terrible trouble. 

But he could only bark. Or... could he do more? 

I suddenly remembered how frightened Hap and Chip appeared whenever 
Buster came around. The terrified expressions on their faces. 

My heart fluttered with hope. Maybe the gnomes are afraid of dogs. Maybe 
Buster can scare them into letting us go. Maybe he can even frighten them back 
into their trance. 

I edged closer to my sister, my back pressed against the wall. “Mindy, I 



think the gnomes are afraid of Buster. If we get him down here, I think he can 
save us.” 

We didn’t hesitate. All three of us started shouting up to the window. 
“Buster! Buster! Come here, boy!” 

Could he hear us over the chanting gnomes? 

Yes! 

His big head peered down at us through the window. 

“Good boy!” I cried. “Now, come here. Come down here, Buster!” 

Buster’s mouth opened. His pink tongue drooped from his mouth, and he 
started to pant. 

“Good doggie!” I crooned. “Good doggie—come down here. Fast! Come, 
boy! Come, Buster!” 

Buster poked his head into the window. And yawned. 

“Down, Buster!” Mindy ordered. “Come down here, boy!” 

He pulled his head out of the window. And settled down on the ground 
outside. I could see his head resting on his paws. 

“No, Buster!” I shrieked, shouting over the chants. “Come, boy! Don’t lie 
down! Come! Buster, come!” 

“Rowf?” He pushed his head back into the window. Farther. Farther. 

“That a boy! Come on!” I pleaded. “A little more... a little more. If you 
come down here, I’ll feed you doggie treats five times a day.” 

Buster cocked his head to the side and sniffed at the damp, sweaty air of the 
basement. 

I held my arms out to the dog. “Please, Buster. You’re our last chance. 
Please—hurry! Come down here.” 

To my dismay, Buster pulled his head out of the window. 

Turned. 

And trotted away. 



26 


Mindy and Moose let out long, disappointed sighs. “Buster deserted us,” Mindy 
said softly. Her shoulders sagged. Moose dropped to his knees on the floor, 
shaking his head. 

“Trampoline! Trampoline!” 

The chant had changed. 

Hap grinned up at us. “Maybe we’ll use you for trampolines! That would be 
fun!” 

“It’s almost time for a vote!” Chip added, rubbing his hands together 
eagerly. 

“Trampoline! Trampoline!” 

“Tug of War! Tug of War!” 

I held my hands over my ears, trying to block out the sound of their shrill 
voices. 

Silence. Please let me have silence, I thought. 

Silence. 

The word gave me an idea. 

Silence. Buster’s dog whistle was silent! 

Suddenly, I knew how to bring Buster back! 

“Mindy!” I cried “The dog whistle! Buster always comes when I blow the 
dog whistle!” 

Mindy raised her head and brightened. “That’s right!” she cried. “Hurry, 
Joe!” 

I grabbed for the shiny metal whistle under my T-shirt. It felt slippery with 
sweat. This has to work, I thought to myself. It has to bring Buster back. 

I pulled the whistle out. 

“The whistle!” several gnomes shrieked. 

The room instantly grew silent. 

I raised the whistle to my lips. 

“Quick—blow it!” Mindy screeched. 

To my surprise, Hap and Chip both dove at me. 

They leaped up and slapped at the whistle. 



The whistle spun out of my hands. 

“Noooo!” I cried in despair. 

I grabbed frantically for it. 

But it rolled and tumbled away, sliding across the basement floor. 



27 


Mindy, Moose, and I all dove for it. 

But the gnomes were quicker. 

A gnome in a bright blue shirt raised the whistle, clutched tightly in his 
little fist. “I’ve got it!” 

“No, you don’t!” Moose cried. He leaped at the gnome. Tackled him around 
the knees. 

The gnome let out a yelp as he went toppling to the floor. 

The dog whistle fell from his hand. 

And bounced across the hard floor toward me. 

I scooped it up. Started to raise it to my lips. 

Three gnomes leaped onto my shoulders, giggling and grunting. 

“Noooo!” I uttered a cry as they batted the whistle from my hand. I dropped 
to the floor, three gnomes on top of me. 

I finally shook them off and jumped to my feet. My eyes searched for the 
whistle. 

I saw a bunch of gnomes diving for the floor, scrambling for it. A few feet 
away, Moose struggled against four or five gnomes who had formed a line to 
block him. Mindy was battling another group of gnomes, who held her back, 
their tiny hands around her legs and waist. 

And then I saw Hap raise the whistle high. 

The gnomes stepped back, clearing a circle around him. 

Hap set the whistle in front of him on the floor. Then he raised his foot 

high. 

He was about to crush it! 

“Noooooo!” Another long cry escaped my throat. I scrambled over the 
floor, half-crawling, half-flying. 

As Hap’s heavy plaster foot came down, I stretched out my hand. 

Fumbled for the whistle. 

Grabbed it. 

Rolled away as the gnome’s foot tromped down heavily. It thudded inches 
from my head. 



I sat up. Raised the whistle to my lips. 
And blew as hard as I could. 

Now what? 

Would the whistle work? 

Would Buster come running to rescue us? 



28 


I blew the silent whistle again. 

And turned to the window. Buster, where are you? 

The gnomes must have been asking the same question. Because they froze 
in place, too. The excited chattering, giggling, and chanting stopped. 

The only sound I could hear was my own shallow breathing. 

I stared up at the window. A rectangle of blackness. No sign of Buster. 

“Hey—!” Moose’s cry made me turn around. 

“Look at them!” Moose’s voice echoed through the silence. 

“Look—they all froze!” Mindy declared. She placed both hands on the red 
cap of a gnome—and pushed the gnome over. 

It clattered to the floor. And didn’t move. A hunk of plaster. 

“I don’t get it!” Moose scratched his crew cut. 

Still gripping the dog whistle tightly, I moved around the room, examining 
the frozen gnomes, pushing them over. Enjoying the silence. 

“Back in their trance state,” Mindy murmured. 

“But how?” Moose demanded. “Buster never showed up. If they weren’t 
terrified of the dog, why did they all freeze up again?” 

I suddenly knew the answer. I raised the whistle and blew it again. “It was 
the whistle,” I explained. “It wasn’t Buster. I had it wrong. They were afraid of 
the whistle. Not the dog.” 

“Let’s get out of here,” Mindy said softly. “I never want to see another lawn 
gnome as long as I live.” 

“Wait till I tell my parents about this!” Moose declared. 

“Whoa!” I cried, grabbing his shoulder. “We can’t tell anyone about this. 
No way!” 

“Why not?” he demanded. 

“Because no one will believe it,” I replied. 

Moose stared at me for a long moment. “You’re right,” he agreed finally. 
“You’re definitely right.” 

Mindy moved to the wall and stared up at the window. “How do we get out 
of here?” 



“I know how,” I told her. I picked up Hap and Chip and stood them beneath 
the window. Then I climbed onto their caps, lifted my hands to the window, and 
pulled myself up. “Thanks for the boost, guys!” I called down. 

They didn’t reply. 

I hoped they were frozen for good. 

Mindy and Moose followed me out. Of course, Buster was waiting for us in 
the yard. His stubby tail began to wag as soon as I appeared. He came running 
over and licked my face till I was sopping wet and sticky. 

“Sorry, fella. You’re a little late,” I told him. “You weren’t much help— 
were you!” 

He licked me some more. Then he greeted Mindy and Moose. 

“Yaaaay! We’re out! We’re out!” Moose cried. He slapped me so hard on 
the back, I thought my teeth were going to fly out! 

I turned to my sister. “Tickle! Tickle! Tickle! ” I chanted. 

“Give me a break!” Mindy cried, rolling her eyes for the thousandth time 
that day. 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” I made tickling motions with my hands and started 
to chase her down the street. 

“Joe—stop it! Don’t tickle me! I’m warning you!” 

“Tickle! Tickle! Tickle!” 

I knew I’d never forget those high-pitched chants. I knew I’d hear them in 
my dreams for a long, long time. 

The next evening, Mindy and I were watching MTV in the den when Dad came 
home. “Be nice to your dad,” Mom had warned us earlier. “He’s very upset that 
somebody stole his two lawn gnomes.” 

Yes, the two gnomes were missing when he woke up. 

Big surprise. 

Mindy and I were so happy, we didn’t have a single argument all day. 

And now we were happy to see Dad—except that he had a strange 
expression on his face. “Uh... I’ve brought home a little surprise,” he 
announced, glancing guiltily at Mom. 

“Now what?” she demanded. 

“Come and see.” Dad led us out to the front lawn. 

The sun was disappearing behind the trees, and the sky was gray. But I 
could still see clearly what Dad had purchased at Lawn Lovely this time. 



An enormous, brown plaster gorilla! 

At least eight feet tall, with gigantic black eyes and a bright purple chest. 
The gorilla had paws the size of baseball mitts and a head as big as a basketball. 

“It’s the ugliest thing I ever saw!” Mom cried, both hands pressed to her 
face. “You’re not really going to put that horrible monster on our front lawn— 
are you, dear?” 

Anything is better than those lawn gnomes, I thought. Anything is better 
than lawn gnomes who come alive and do terrible mischief. 

I glanced at Mindy. I had a feeling she was thinking the same thing. 

“I think it’s a beauty, Dad,” I said. “It’s the best-looking lawn gorilla I ever 
saw!” 

“It’s great, Dad,” Mindy agreed. 

Dad smiled. 

Mom turned and hurried back to the house, shaking her head. 

I glanced up at the gorilla’s enormous purple-and-brown painted face. “Be a 
good gorilla,” I murmured. “Don’t be like those awful gnomes.” 

Then, as I started to turn away, the gorilla winked at me. 
